Please use this link for better formatting and images: https://docs.google.com/document/d/1k_OFBEr-UeAbFYDBEgDSdetO3rg-pH5ZSHOx5P1nvqo/edit?usp=sharing

Guild Wars 2 Notes
General
Good combat, mixture of action and tab targeting.
Targeting sometimes gets annoying when mobs surround / get behind you. Skills won’t fire until you manually face them which is fine for the action combat skills, very annoying for the enemy targeted ones. Something like FFXIV’s legacy camera movement would work wonders and make the targeting feel less clunky.
Has stamina + dodging, no active blocking. Most abilities are ground targeted or enemy targeted w/ tab targeting.
No trinity, but the most efficient way to play for endgame stuff is with pseudo trinity anyway (tank / kiter, healer, DPS, support = buff & healer / DPS hybrid).
Quickness + Alacrity buffs shape the meta. Do not like these buffs as it feels awful not to have them, whereas no Might (+Damage) or Fury (+Crit chance) don’t feel nearly as bad when you don’t have them. This differs from Heroism / Bloodlust from WoW because they have a 100% uptime (optimally) whereas in WoW it’s on a CD.
Wiki integration is great, and would be perfect if there was an in-game client rather than having to open it in a browser.
Again, spoilt by FFXIV with having all classes on 1 character, really miss that since I end up creating either 1 character but cloning it for other classes (GW2), using almost default presets for the non main classes (BDO) or just not having more than 1 class (WoW).
Feels like this is just so they can get you to pay for character slots.
Can’t have every crafting profession on the same character, forced to have multiple characters for that.
There is sort of a shared levelling system post level 80, but they’re for utilities rather than combat stuff (auto-loot which should’ve been basekit, special crafting, mount skills, etc).
There are racials but they almost never matter (except some Sylvari racial skill was used in one of the raids, don’t really know the details).
Awful microtransactions, lots of FOMO. Should strictly be for cosmetics and not convenience. Even more insulting is that equipment & skill loadouts are both separate and character bound, so if you play more than 1 character it’s absolutely overpriced.
Loot. Boxes.
Being able to buy currency in exchange for in-game currency is bad. The effects aren’t too awful as the game has horizontal progression that’s somewhat easy to reach the highest level but still, being able to buy progression (via gear, materials, etc) is dumb.
People often laud the fact that it’s horizontal progression and they feel like they don’t need to grind anything on a gear cycle, but end up permanently grinding for gold to achieve anything. Sometimes I feel bad that I’m not grinding the most profitable content for gold.
That being said, there are a lot of open world events that are both profitable and fun. It’s just when it becomes a grind that sucks out the enjoyment of it.
Little instanced content that I feel like I could quickly jump into, both because there’s very few and the party finder is absolute trash.
Global trading post is great, except when the gold barons are able to manipulate it.
Inventory management is annoying, junk being dropped by everything taking up space and since you have to pay for gear sets your gear will be sitting in the inventory too. Also filled with random items that have very specific uses like teleporters & keys, etc.
Way too many currencies & keys & materials.
Imagine paying 300g to unlock basic party leadership functionality.
Mounts are great, but some are redundant (Springer vs. Skyscale, Skimmer vs. Skiff).
UI needs more customisation, currently only size & where minimap is.
Buff bar is awful, a tiny row of icons that doesn’t seem to have any priority. This excludes boons (positive buffs) and conditions (negative buffs) which are common across all classes; these have their own row.
Skill tooltips are nice and detailed, they also have easy to understand icons.
Infusion stacking is the worst visual design I’ve seen in my life in a game. Not being able to turn it off / hide those players is just as awful.
There is so much visual clutter when doing large meta events. This is allegedly being fixed in June w/ a filter, 10+ years after launch.
Way too much RNG in everything: loot boxes, random skin unlocks, microtransactions (can’t even choose what skin you want for mounts most of the time), gear, mob drops, even enemy prefix augments like in PoE (ones that require you to stay melee / ranged on a boss that teleports randomly, great design), etc.
Balance split between PvE & PvP took years but eventually happened, meaning some skills that are useless are now less useless in their respective modes (separate numbers, slightly different effects, etc).
There is underwater combat with its own set of weapons & abilities, but it’s not that great. Not awful but not really part of the game at all, so won’t include it here at all.
There’s also a couple of skills when you’re downed / drowning (downed underwater). Won’t be including those either as they’re mostly damage / helping you survive long enough to get saved.
Combos are an interesting mechanic but they’ve pretty much been unchanged since release. Their importance and effectiveness have gone down while new classes, specialisations, weapons + skills have made them even more irrelevant. Why bother comboing for boons when another class can press a couple of buttons for permanent buff uptime.
Every interaction being bound to F is very annoying.
Why does logging into a character re-order it in the character select screen?
Elementalist
Elementalist Combat
Love the concept, execution could be better.
Swap between 4 elements: fire, water, air & earth.
Fire is designed to have heavy damage & burning (DoT).
Water is designed to have support (utility) & healing.
Air is designed to have heavy damage & CC.
Earth is designed to have DoTs & defense.
Each element has its own set of weapon skills.
Utility skills are the same but some change depending on current element (glyph).
In exchange for 4 elements, Ele’s cannot swap weapons in combat.
Most of the time, the best way to play the class is to stick to 2 elements, meaning half the kit is ignored.
This coupled with the fact that it was originally designed to have more but slightly less impactful / specific skills makes it feel bad to ignore half the kit.
The only builds that go through all elements are Weaver (with Weave Self) and hammer Catalyst (with Grand Finale).
The fact that you can’t swap weapons in combat means that you’re sometimes useless when forced to be ranged if you’re using a melee weapon. This can be countered with fight knowledge / using ranged weapons / Conjures / sitting on your thumb.
Absolutely hate that Ele has very little HP and very little armour; they effectively have half the effective health of Warrior.
This is meant to be balanced by the fact that Ele has more active defense (shields, immunities) but they’ve all been nerfed / changed leaving a wet piece of tissue paper.
Understand that PvP is balanced around this, no reason for this to be the case in PvE.
Conjures are awful. Imagine having to pick up (F) a weapon. Completely replaces your weapon bar and (for DPS purposes) you’re encouraged to use the biggest damaging abilities then drop it. Damage is totally gimped if some random person takes your other weapon or it despawns because you have to go through a dumb pick up animation.
Power budget includes access to a lot of combo fields. The importance of combos has changed over the years so how much of the power budget it takes up should be adjusted (there are much easier ways to get boons these days).
Auras are also meant to be a prominent feature for Eles but they haven’t really been changed since release either. They last for very little time and are unaffected by boon duration stats, so their effects while decently strong are rarely felt, especially since it requires you to get hit.
Elementalist Abilities
Staff
Long range AoEs, being pushed to be more support oriented. 2H.

Staff Fire 1 - Fireball
Targeted projectile AoE for damage & Burn (only PvE, will only be doing PvE version).

All “1” abilities are the auto-attack so they’re going to be somewhat basic. Fits with the main theme of Fire which is direct damage and DoTs. Also fits the theme of a staff being ranged and slow. Won’t be mentioning if it fits the theme for other abilities, will only mention it if it doesn’t. Feels clunky with the cast time & it being a targeted skill in a mostly action combat game. Especially annoying since your character won’t turn to face and cast if they’re behind you.

Staff Fire 2 - Lava Font
Ground targeted AoE field for damage & Burn. Fire field for combos.

Simple ground targeted AoE for damage. It’s quick and has a low cooldown so not as heavily punished if things move out of it, which it will since its size is pretty small. Combo field lasts for 4s so there’s some time to get some combos off. 

Staff Fire 3 - Flame Burst
Targeted AoE damage, Burn & Blind.

Simple AoE around the target enemy. Same annoyances about enemy targeted skills apply. Blind is also an annoying condition because of how detrimental or useless it is. It completely negates the next singular outgoing attack. This makes it either extremely effective against slower classes or borderline useless against persistent DPS / AoE classes. Should be made more standardised by either making all attacks miss for a far lower duration or make it so it forces the affected to break targeting and darken the screen. The latter may be annoying as CC affecting the player (as in the person playing) isn’t that great by design; it’s annoying, frustrating and could be worked around by putting gamma up to a 100 or something. Blindness has the same issue as the old dodge stats from LoL, WoW and FFXIV where it’s frustrating when it happens and is a minor inconvenience to get rid of (reaching X accuracy or smacking something once in GW2’s case).

Staff Fire 4 - Burning Retreat
Backflip that leaves a burning field that damages, Burn and acts as a combo field.

Active mitigation is good as it fits the squishy mage archetype Ele has going on. There is also a point to be made about risk vs. reward in using this for damage vs. using it as a dodge. But the fact that it’s kinda janky and using an escape on an enemy that’s not actively engaging you / hitting someone else feels weird. Compare this to FFXIV Red Mage, which has Displacement (backflip w/ 1 instance of damage) & Engagement (same damage as Displacement, does NOT backflip), which both share charges. There’s still risk involved in using it and running into a situation where you need to disengage, but there’s no situation where you’re running away only to walk back in range again to continue DPSing. That is a fundamental difference in combat (FFXIV having all abilities available at all times, GW2 having a CD between certain “sets”) but the point still stands.

Staff Fire 5 - Meteor Shower
Big area, long range, long cast time. Think old GP ult where each ball does damage but you could conceivably get lucky and dodge all by sheer luck. Each hit reduces the damage of the next by 10% (not multiplicative), down to a minimum of 10%.

The first 3 points are good. It should cover a large area, it should be long range (staff) and it should have a long cast time for a powerful spell, both in damage and coverage. It was pulsing damaging field with an ICD / tick rate but was changed to this monstrosity for some reason. Adding randomness to the big cooldown spell makes it feel awful to use because of how unreliable it is. Even if you do land the hits, it will be miserable to see a meteor smack someone in the face and it does like 100 damage. If it was too strong they should’ve adjusted the damage, not making it both random and sucky when it does land.

Staff Water 1 - Water Blast
Targeted projectile AoE. Enemy is damaged, allies around it get healed.

Simple as expected from a 1 skill. Fits the purpose of Water which is support. Still has the clunky targeted ranged aspect. Not useful for DPS since damage and healing are separate stats. Could have included CC or some debuff that would interact with DPS to make it less horrible to use, like Hammer (will discuss later).

Staff Water 2 - Ice Spike
The only damaging ability in Water. Delayed ground targeted nuke which debuffs enemies for more damage & blasts combo fields.

Probably the best overall ability for staff Water. It damages so it’s usable by DPS, it debuffs so it fills the support role and it blasts combos which is versatile since blasting water fields = healing, but blasting a fire field = Might boon for allies, etc.

Staff Water 3 - Geyser
Ground targeted healing AoE w/ Water combo field.

Pure support ability. Not inherently a bad thing if the overall skill set is balanced between offense and defense but that’s not the case for staff Water. It’s a small field with a big cooldown due to a talent affecting it (where it also revives) so there’s some risk in using it, not being able to revive someone because you were healing.

Staff Water 4 - Frozen Ground
Ground targeted AoE Ice combo field. Enemies Chilled and allies given Frost Aura.

Until very recently, it was just the ice field + chill, you could tell how much stock was put into combo fields. The addition of the Frost Aura is welcome but the Ice Field & Chill aren’t that useful in PvE for Ele. Auras have no base effect if you’re not hit, and Chill isn’t all that impactful other than the slow and the defiance bar (CC) depletion. Ele has no talents that affect Chill like Reaper (Necromancer) does, where they do more damage against Chilled targets.

Staff Water 5 - Healing Rain
Big AoE Water combo field. Regening, cleansing & healing per cleanse.

Big support ability on a big cooldown. Used to not have the heal on cleanse so it was just regen & cleansing + a water field; same note above about combo field value. It’s fine for all of this ability's power budget being spent on support / utility, but the fact that there’s only 1 damaging ability in Water means there’s almost no reason to get into Water as DPS. If 3 or 4 (or both) was more DPS oriented and 1 also hit in an AoE on enemies (targeting in action combat games is a bit wonky sometimes, issues hitting the correct enemy) it would be a lot better.

Staff Air 1 - Chain Lightning
Bouncing lightning attack on target. Bounces 3 times and can bounce back to 1st.

The usual bouncing lightning attack. Sort of dumb that the max single target DPS requires a 2nd target; there’s no extra line about the target taking extra damage if it doesn’t bounce.

Staff Air 2 - Lightning Surge
Targeted AoE that also blinds.

Somehow only just now realising that this is the same as Fire Staff 3, but without the burn. Same notes apply.

Staff Air 3 - Gust
Long range knockback.

Some self peel, but this feels like a PvP balanced ability that’s left there for PvE. The knockback isn’t that strong relative to other CC and that’s all it does. It’s on a big cooldown and the only thing that’s going for it is that it’s long ranged. Doesn’t necessarily need damage, but it could use another effect that goes along with the peeling or CC aspect. Honestly if this skill came out recently I could see it being straight up merged with the next one, with some minor adjustments.

Staff Air 4 - Windborne Speed
AoE movement cleanse & movespeed buffs.

Previously only had the 1 Swiftness (+33% movement speed) boon, recently added 3s of Superspeed (+100% movement speed) onto it. So there’s a quick burst of movement and then the weaker but longer boon too. Would be merged with Staff Air 3 if this was created this decade. Otherwise, can’t add Quickness to it due to the problematic nature of it and Alacrity. Those 2 boons can’t be base kit otherwise you would be able to apply both and cover 2 support roles in 1.

Staff Air 5 - Static Field
Ground targeted AoE lightning combo field. Veigar cage w/ stun on edge.

The only other damaging ability for Staff Air and it does less damage than the auto. Only reiterates the fact that 3 & 4 should be merged and another damaging ability should be added. Ability itself is small but long range and is a good zoning tool but overall means Air is almost exclusively meant for CC only. Meaning dipping out of Fire for damage is more often than not detrimental to DPS.

Staff Earth 1 - Stoning
Single target (!) combo projectile w/ Weakness (-Endurance / Stamina regen, attacks can’t crit and deal 50% damage) debuff.

There’s no reason why auto-attacks deal AoE damage in an action game. It reduces the cases of janky targeting and wouldn’t be detrimental in PvP since most people aren’t stacking right on top of each other, except in WvW but if you’re in range of that many people you’re probably gone anyway since it’s mostly zergs. It’s guaranteed to act as a projectile for combos but those effects aren’t that useful. Honestly the only useful combo are the boon ones since they actually last for a while. Weakness debuff is only half useful in PvE for the damage reduction but it’s not powerful enough to camp Earth for it.

Staff Earth 2 - Eruption
Delayed ground targeted AoE w/ Bleed, Cripple (slow) & combo blast.

A good overall skill. Delay means you can cast it & put down a field afterwards to blast it for some actual decent combo effects. There is a long cast time though which takes some getting used to since it doesn’t feel like something that would require a channel (in fact you can move during that time).


Staff Earth 3 - Magnetic Aura & Transmute Earth
Self buff w/ Magnetic Aura, reflecting all projectiles for 4s. Turns into Transmute Earth while you have a Magnetic Aura, letting you deal PBAoE damage, granting Stability (hard CC immunity stacks) to allies & blasting combos.

Magnetic Aura has a 30s cooldown for some reason, and it only affects yourself. Would be understandable if it also affected allies & gave them Protection (damage reduction) or some other effect. Right now it’s just a single aura which is somewhat insulting to be 30s and take up an ability slot (which you don’t choose). Transmute Earth was added 6 years into the game, so Magnetic Aura was infinitely worse before then. It makes the overall ability a lot less crap and provides some utility (damage is minimal). It has 3x the cooldown in PvE for some reason, as if to prevent it from being used twice since no one is going to camp Earth for > 10s. Could also have a Bleed effect to contribute to the Earth theme.

Staff Earth 4 - Unsteady Ground
Creates a line that enemies can’t cross (they’ll be knocked back).

It’s a pretty barebones ability. There’s no damage, no DoT and it barely counts as a “defensive” ability for the Earth theme (it’s the same thing as saying damage is CC since enemies can’t hurt you if they’re dead). Previously damaged and Crippled enemies that move through it. Needs an initial effect when placed like deals X damage and puts a Bleed on them or something. 30s CD too.

Staff Earth 5 - Shock Wave
Targeted combo projectile that damages, Bleeds and Immobilizes (roots) all hit (piercing up to 5).

Good skill: damages, DoTs and CCs. No real complaints other than the 25s CD, meaning you’re encouraged to dump CDs and go to the next element but that’s not too feasible since there are some real crappy skills in some of the other Attunements (cough Water & Air).

Scepter
Mid-long range, damage & control. Main hand only.

Scepter Fire 1 - Flamestrike
Targeted AoE 2 part attack. 1st is targeted, 2nd is wherever the 1st was after a brief delay. Both damage & Burn.

The usual ranged targeted attack, w/ the 2nd part delay twist. This gives it a bit of counterplay in PvP and a lot of grief in PvE if the mobs move out of it.

Scepter Fire 2 - Dragon’s Tooth
Targeted delayed AoE. Damages, Burns & blasts.

Originally targeted, then became ground casted, meaning it would miss. A lot. Being changed to targeted means more reliability = more damage & less frustration. It doing good damage & blasting combos fits the animation.

Scepter Fire 3 - Phoenix
Ground targeted piercing attack that damages & Burns before exploding for more damage & Blasting combos. It returns again doing more passthrough damage & Burn while cleansing self & providing Vigor (stamina regen).

Good overall ability, with somewhat random utility attached to it that’s normally reserved for Water. Damage requires aiming both directional and ground targeted so it’s not exactly the same as Scepter Fire 2. Utility is nice but again, would be better suited to Water or Earth even.

Scepter Water 1 - Ice Shards
Single target attack w/ 3 instances of the same damage. No other effect, but should be a chance combo projectile like Scepter Earth 1.

Bit annoying with the targeted single target attack. Otherwise somewhat boring as it has no other effects. It’s almost identical to Scepter Earth 1 but without the bleed (understandable) and without the combo projectile chance. It having 3 instances of damage makes it less likely to be screwed over by crit RNG, if it wasn’t for the fact that power DPS builds build around having 100% crit.

Scepter Water 2 - Shatterstone
Ground targeted delayed AoE that damages & Chills.

The usual ground targeted AoE ability. Used to apply Vulnerability (increased damage taken) but was replaced with Chill, specifically for the next ability. Slight delay means there’s some counterplay but not that important in PvE. Low cooldown so can be spammed, who doesn’t love exploding ice everywhere?

Scepter Water 3 - Water Trident
Multitarget (3) attack. Damages & heals you per target hit (up to double base amount w/ 3 hits). Damage increased against Chilled targets (+50%). 2 charges.

Great ability imo. Homes in on nearby enemies so doesn’t require enemies to be on top of each other. Damage synergy with previous ability w/ Chill conditional, but not at an absurd level like 100%. Heals for some sustain without going too crazy in single target vs. AoE situations. Charge based so you’re not punished for holding onto a charge to heal, acts as another pseudo active mitigation / recovery tool that Eles need for their awful survivability. You can definitely tell this was recently revamped (was ground targeted damage enemy heal allies AoE, no charges, no Chill damage modifier).

Scepter Air 1 - Arc Lightning
Channelled multitarget beam attack. Damage is backloaded.

Encourages you to keep an eye on the attack channel for max value as the last 4 tickets deal 4x the first portion and 2x the 2nd portion. Even though it’s a beam attack it still hits more than 1 target, unlike someone else.

Scepter Air 2 - Lightning Strike
Multitarget damage & Vulnerability. No cast time (doesn’t interrupt channels).

Synergies with Scepter Air 1 since you can keep channelling and also use this ability to damage and debuff the enemy. Previously it was just damage and ONLY on the primary target, modernising it with some utility and AoE.

Scepter Air 3 - Blinding Flash
Multitarget Blind & Weakness. 2 charges, no cast time.

Same notes about Blind & Weakness as before.
Same notes about no cast time as above.
2 charges allow some flexibility in the skill, either layering it on the same target or spreading it out.

Scepter Earth 1 - Stone Shards
Single target attack w/ 3 instances of the same damage & Bleeds. 20% chance each hit is a combo projectile.

This is almost exactly the same as Scepter Water 1, except it bleeds and can act as a combo projectile. Doesn’t seem to be a good reason it isn’t. Adding more RNG to the combat isn’t the greatest, especially if it’s for a mediocre effect. But do agree that 100% chance might be a bit too strong. Otherwise, the same notes apply.

Scepter Earth 2 - Rock Barrier & Hurl
Self HP shield, Toughness (stat) buff & Resistance (ignore non-damaging conditions) boon. Gives access to Hurl, consuming the Toughness buff & shooting 5x projectiles for 5 instances of damage, Bleeding and combo projectile.

Originally only had the Toughness buff, so you know it’s bad if you had to triple the amount of effects an ability has. All 3 effects contribute to survivability, as dictated by the Earth theme. Hurl presents some risk vs. reward in consuming the defensive buff for damage, though it’s generally not a life or death situation in PvE. Piercing would be preferred so it’s less reliant on tab targeting in an action combat game.

Scepter Earth 3 - Dust Devil
Ground targeted AoE. Damages & Cripples Bleeding enemies 3x. 1st hit blinds.

Small field that does a bit of damage & some conditional CC. Not particularly the best skill around but it’s somewhat better than what it was before. Previously just did 1 instance of damage at target & AoE around them. Pulsing damage & CC is more flexible. There’s synergy with the other Earth skills w/ bleeding but the effect isn’t strong enough to warrant it being conditional CC. Could’ve been basekit Cripple but additional damage & Bleed if already Bleeding.

Dagger
Short range & fast. Note that Dagger is main hand (1, 2, 3) & off hand (4, 5). Meaning you can mix and match and not necessarily have to take all 5 (or 20) Dagger skills at once.

Dagger Fire 1 - Dragon’s Claw
Short range piercing shotgun.

Dagger is for short ranged (not quite melee) combat and this is a good example of it. Rewarded for getting up close when you manage to land all 3 shots on a target. Piercing to make it feel not horrible in AoE situations.

Dagger Fire 2 - Drake’s Breath
Channelled frontal cone; can move. Damages & Burns.

Same premise as the above. Channelled makes it even riskier since it’s close ranged, but does big damage especially for DoT builds.

Dagger Fire 3 - Burning Speed
Slide forward & damage in an AoE at the end. Leave behind a fire combo field that damages and Burns. Has an Evade (dodge) component.

Interesting skill that could be better. Evade component gives it skill expression, but there’s a 0.75s cast time so it’s pretty hard to pull off the dodge on higher ping. Recently it was changed to stop at the target. This means the fire field won’t ever hit the enemy if you have 1 targeted, which you should since it auto-targets if you don’t have 1 and you use an ability. Fire field should also happen at the end point. Other than that it’s a pretty good skill. Could possibly argue that it should also have a Combo Leap component but the skill is somewhat overloaded as is. Maybe only in PvE since Leap isn’t as impactful there as it is in PvP.

Dagger Fire 4 - Ring of Fire
PBAoE fire combo field. Damages, Burns on cast & Burns on passthrough.

Just a fire combo field that spawns underneath you. Short ranged, matching weapon. Combo field matching Eles “strengths”. Fire because, well, Fire Attunement.

Dagger Fire 5 - Fire Grab
Short ranged frontal cone. Damages, +60% if they’re burning.

Simple ability that synergises w/ the rest of the weapon / Attunement. Same notes about being short ranged apply.

Dagger Water 1 - Vapor Blade
Mid range piercing boomerang, damages & applies Vulnerability.

Pretty cool ability. Damage & debuff aren’t enough to warrant sticking around and using it though, making it a mediocre filler. Could have a heal attached to it to make it more attractive to the support side or apply more / longer Vulnerability stacks.

Dagger Water 2 - Cone of Cold
Healing version of the fire breath. 0.25x the damage and 2x the cooldown but gets a heal on it instead!

Pretty much just the healing fire breath. The exchange for the heal does seem pretty bad but player health pools compared to the enemy is a big difference. Only issue I have is that targeting is weird when you have a beneficial + damaging ability in 1. The game will auto-target the enemy and focus the breath on them, but you’ll probably try and move to position the breath to hit your allies which it won’t do because it’s still aiming at the enemy. Can de-target or position so allies are in between but doesn’t that make it any less janky in general.

Dagger Water 3 - Frozen Burst
PBAoE combo blast. Damages & Chills.

Damage is pretty weak and Chill isn’t more useful for Ele than other classes like it is for Reaper (Necromancer). Only real useful part is the Blast combo component for Aoe boons / auras / conditions / healing / cleanse, etc depending on the combo field.


Dagger Water 4 - Frost Aura & Transmute Frost
Self buff w/ Frost Aura, reducing damage taken by 10% & Chilling enemies that hit for 2s (1s ICD per attacker). Turns into Transmute Frost when affected by a Frost Aura, letting you deal PBAoE damage, heal & Regen.

Exact same comments as Magnetic Aura & Transmute Frost. This at least only has a 10s cooldown vs. 30s but its effect still should be AoE by default (there’s a talent which I’ll go into later). Transmute Frost also shouldn’t be on a 10s CD compared to PvP where it’s 3s. Other than that, its effects are what you expect from the Water version. It could maybe use 1 more offensive effect like Vulnerability or Chill or something. 

Dagger Water 5 - Cleansing Wave
PBAoE heal & cleanse.

Pretty simple ability; does what it says and fits Water theme & dagger constraints.

Dagger Air 1 - Lightning Whip
2x frontal attack, small cleave.

Simple ability since it’s a 1 skill. Borderline melee lightning attack; ticks the boxes.

Dagger Air 2 - Convergence
Delayed PBAoE. Damages, applies Weakness & grants Fury per enemy struck.

Used to be a frontal cone w/ the same effects, the delayed PBAoE makes it more interesting as you can prepare it. It’s also just more unique rather than having another frontal cone (yes it’s a PBAoE, but it’s delayed). Same notes about Weakness apply (stam regen penalty not that useful in PvE, damage reduction not reliable either). Fury is handy but in group content the healer / support will have it covered. Solo it’s useful because of the “per enemy struck” clause, making it last long enough to be useful.


Dagger Air 3 - Shocking Aura & Transmute Lightning
Self buff w/ Shocking Aura, stunning enemies that attack you for 1s (2s ICD per attacker). Turns into Transmute Lightning when affected by a Shocking Aura, letting you deal PBAoE damage & Stun.

Same comments as Magnetic Aura & Frost Aura. Also 10s but this is definitely a PvP skill as a 1s stun won’t really help if you get downed in like 5 hits as a squishy Ele. Could increase the stun duration or also apply Weakness to help survive. Transmute Lightning also should be a 3s CD. It could also have an additional effect like applying Swiftness because right now it’s just some damage and a stun.

Dagger Air 4 - Ride the Lightning
Gapcloser w/ PBAoE damage if it hits an enemy. Half cooldown if it does hit.

Simple gapcloser. Can be used as part of your damage rotation at the cost of some mobility. Auto-targeting may cause issues, launching you in unexpected directions.

Dagger Air 5 - Updraft
Evading short backflip w/ Swiftness & delayed CC.

Defensive dodge w/ CC attached. Use for CC or hold as an extra Evade, so there’s some risk involved. CC was changed to be delayed because of PvP, could’ve kept it separate. Even a little bit of damage would make sense on it since you’re launching a bunch of enemies into the air.

Dagger Earth 1 - Impale
Single target damage & Bleed.

No reason for this to be single target, especially since it’s very short ranged. Damages & Bleeds like every other Earth ability.

Dagger Earth 2 - Ring of Earth
2x PBAoE damage, Bleed & Cripple. Blocks projectiles.

Pretty cool animation, launching self into air and then crashing down into the earth. Damage & condition effects make sense w/ animation & theme. Extra skill expression w/ projectile blocking but that’s more of a PvP thing.

Dagger Earth 3 - Earthen Rush
Earth version of the Fire dash. Damages, Immobilizes (roots) enemies while Evading & combo Leaping.

Pretty much the same notes as Burning Speed. Has the Evade too but this one has 0.5s cast time as opposed to 0.75s for some reason. Also was made to stop at the enemy if targeted, meaning it won’t be hit by the trail of spikes behind. Acts as a Leap combo but since there are no Combo fields in Earth you’ll have to use one from another weapon / Attunement.

Dagger Earth 4 - Earthquake
PBAoE stomp that damages, knocks down and Blasts combos.

Very good damage and CC as well as Blasting combos. The only issue is that it’s VERY easy to cancel for some reason compared to other abilities with cast times. Cancelling with dodging makes sense but it’s also cancellable with a movement input, which honestly should be buffered. Should only be cancellable via dodging or sheathing w/ Z or pressing Esc.

Dagger Earth 5 - Churning Earth
Long cast PBAoE Cripple (slow) which explodes for Damage, Bleeding & Blasts combos.

Risk vs. reward since it has a long channel time where you’re vulnerable to CC & damage but the pay off is in big damage and to a lesser degree a combo Blast. It’s also VERY easy to cancel with movement input. Can also be comboed with Lightning Flash (utility blink, discussed below) to reposition the PBAoE without cancelling it, a nifty little combo.

Focus
Defensive & Utility oriented. Off-hand only.

Focus Fire 4 - Flamewall
Ground targeted Fire combo field that damages & Burns.

Fire combo field that can be placed at range, making it versatile. Other than that it’s just like every other Fire combo field.

Focus Fire 5 - Fire Shield & Transmute Fire
Self buff w/ Fire Aura, burning enemies that attack & granting Might each time (1s ICD per attacker). Turns into Transmute Fire when affected by a Fire Aura, damaging & Burning enemies while granting allies Might.

Same note about aura application not being AoE. Same not about the Transmute not also being 3s in PvE. Skill itself is fine with its 3 effects, possible combo related effect if they want to lean into that.

Focus Water 4 - Freezing Gust
Single target Chill w/ a bit of damage.

There’s really no reason why this can’t have a small AoE around the target, especially since the chill is 3s and it’s on a 25s CD. Other than that, it needs something else since Chill doesn’t do much and the skill is practically unchanged since the release of the game.

Focus Water 5 - Comet
Targeted, slightly delayed AoE damage & Daze (same as stun, except players can still move whereas mobs can’t so it’s effectively a stun). Also Blasts combos.

A fine CC skill as there’s a bit of a delay so you can avoid it in PvP. Other than that it’s just CC with some damage. Blast is at the centre of the enemy hitbox which isn’t always that great depending on the hitbox.

Focus Air 4 - Swirling Winds
PBAoE area that blocks missiles.

Powerful defensive spell, lasts 6s so there’s enough time to get full value out of it unlike that 1 Earth spell that lasts 2s. Could stand to maybe also increase ally movespeed while in the field for a bit more utility, via a unique buff or Swiftness.

Focus Air 5 - Gale
Single target ranged unblockable knockdown.

Strong for PvP but in PvE it should just also be AoE. Other than that, it’s a dedicated CC spell on a huge cooldown which also should be reduced in PvE only.

Focus Earth 4 - Magnetic Wave
PBAoE damage & Cripple while also cleansing 3 Conditions & 3s projectile reflection. Also Blasts combos.

Strong skill that does a whole bunch of things at once. Only thing that could improve it is if there was some way to include Bleed into it, maybe rocks flying out as shrapnel in the animation just so it works more w/ DoT builds like other Earth skills.

Focus Earth 5 - Obsidian Flesh
3s of invulnerability. Channelled so you can only move.

Nerfed in PvE for no reason. Was formerly both 4s and wasn’t channelled. It’s already on a huge 50s cooldown so there’s already some risk in using it incorrectly, there was no need for it to be made into a channel.

Healing
Choose 1.

Arcane Brilliance - Arcane
PBAoE damage. Base heal, increased w/ per target hit. Blasts combos.

Arcane’s gimmick is that they always do critical damage, not that it matters since builds in PvE all revolve around getting to 100% crit anyway. Since there are only 5 Arcane skills, there’s no build revolved around Arcane to warrant not building crit. 

Skill itself specifically is the most offensive of the heals since it’s the only one that damages and potentially the biggest burst of healing. Tradeoff is that it’s the longest cooldown and is conditional for the amount healed, becoming weaker in single target. Bit of extra utility with the Blast component.

Ether Renewal - Cantrip
Channelled heal & cleanse per pulse. Pulses 8 times.

Cantrips are all defensive spells that activate instantly and this is no different. Does a medium amount of healing but the main reason you choose it is because of the huge cleansing component. The tradeoff is that it’s 2.25s of channelling where you’re both vulnerable and not attacking. In PvE there are better ways of cleansing, reserving this for PvP.

Glyph of Elemental Harmony - Glyph
Medium heal burst + a Boon depending on current Attunement.

Glyphs secondary effects change depending on the current Attunement. In this case, Fire = Might, Water = Regen, Air = Swiftness & Earth = Protection. However these Boons aren’t the main reason to take this heal as they don’t last long enough or they don’t scale that well (Regen won’t do much if you don’t have Healing Power). It’s the biggest non-conditional burst heal out of the base Healing skills.

Signet of Restoration - Signet
Passively heal per spell cast (so any weapon skill). 
Active is a low heal burst.

Signets have both passive & active components. Passives are on cooldown while recharging by default, so there’s some downside to using the active if you don’t absolutely need it. This heal has the most passive healing but is the worst in terms of burst healing.

Utility
Choose 3.

Arcane Blast - Arcane
Single target ranged crit nuke. 3 charges. Acts as a combo Projectile.

Decent single target damage, which is what’s advertised. Charges allow holding at least 2 until burst phase if needed, some extra skill layered in. Not that interesting though, especially since it’s a non-Elemental spell for the Elementalist class.

Arcane Power - Arcane
PBAoE buff that guarantees crits on attacks per stack. Also grants Ferocity (crit damage stat) per stack. More stacks for self than allies (4 vs 2).

Absolutely awful since stacks are consumed per hit, meaning a weak attack consuming the stack would completely gimp its effectiveness. Could try and time it but there’s usually a lot going on in terms of attacks going out. Could really be duration based rather than stack based, especially since this is a 45s CD probably because of PvP.

Arcane Shield - Arcane
Block the next 3 attacks. Explodes for crit damage if it blocks all 3. Also breaks stun.

Mostly used to break out of a stun. Same note about stacks vs. duration, at least in PvE. Compared to other defensive Utilities that break stun, it’s more on the defensive side without completely stopping you from attacking.

Arcane Wave - Arcane
AoE version of Arcane Blast. 2 charges. Blasts combos.

Literally just the AoE version of Arcane Blast, except it actually Blasts combos.

Armor of Earth - Cantrip
Break out of stuns, grant self Protection & Stability & Barrier per boon you have.

The other defensive stun break that doesn’t gimp damage. Offers more mitigation rather than blocking the attacks, meaning you could still get downed. The mitigation is standardised at 6s though as opposed to the stacks. Conditional barrier is kind of stupid though. It should have a base amount and then increase per boon. Luckily it grants the Protection & Stability then the barrier in terms of logic so there is a bit of a base value, technically.

Cleansing Fire - Cantrip
Cleanse 5 conditions & Burn enemies in PBAoE. Gain Might per condition cleansed. 2 charges.

An actual good & safe cleansing option without sacrificing too much damage. Charges allow some flexibility, possibly even using it offensively. Might per condition cleansed also rewards cleansing properly but not that useful in group content since you should have max Might anyway. Possibly extra Burn stacks instead.

Lightning Flash - Cantrip
Blink to & damage an area.

No reason why this shouldn’t also act as a stun break in PvE (which was removed 10 years ago). Other than that it’s just kind of boring. Yes you can use it to reposition certain skills but other than that it needs something else other than some pitiful damage, maybe AoE Swiftness & Weakness per enemy hit.

Mist Form - Cantrip
Breaks stun & Invulnerability for 3s. You can move very quickly but cannot attack.

The most defensive of the stun breaks. The trade off is that it’s a huge cooldown of 60s and you cannot attack at all. Can change Attunements during this so there’s some flexibility in that regard. Might also need a healing or cleansing component attached to it (in PvE) to make it stand out because right now it’s strictly a PvP ability.

Conjure Earth Shield - Conjure
Creates an Earth Shield in your hands (replacing weapon skills) & target location. Wielders get Toughness (armour stat) and Vitality (health stat).
a) Shield Smack: Melee damage & Bleeding cleave.
b) Shield Smash: Melee damage & more Bleeding cleave.
c) Crippling Shield: Line boomerang damage & Cripple. Double damage & Bleeding if you have any Barrier.
Stone Sheath: Block next attack within 2.25s & PBAoE damage & Bleed. Gain Barrier if an attack is blocked.
Magnetic Surge: PBAoE damage & Daze and grant self Magnetic Aura.
Magnetic Shield: PBAoE damage & pull. Grant self Barrier & Protection per enemy pulled. Unblockable.
Fortify: Invulnerable but unable to move or attack at all. Can blink with Lightning Flash.

Conjure’s gimmick is that they create a weapon in both your hand and at target location. This differs from Engineer’s Kits where only they get the weapon. It seriously should just act the same because a) having to run up and press F to pick up a weapon is the dumbest thing ever and b) someone stealing your weapon is the most frustrating thing ever. Get rid of the passive stats and the 2nd weapon and make it like Kits.

Onto the actual weapon, it’s the most defensive of the 5 as expected. Works around Barriers & Bleeding which fits the Earth theme of DoTs and defence. Also has CC and pulls to help being a melee weapon. Don’t get much use out of this in PvE and even if it was better in PvE, you’d only use 1 or 2 abilities before dumping it immediately. This can be resolved by it becoming more like Kits, where you can jump into the weapon anytime and use what you need at the time.

Conjure Flame Axe - Conjure
Creates a Flame Axe in your hands & target location. Wielders get Power (direct damage stat) & Condition Damage (DoT damage stat).
a) Lava Axe: Single target ranged damage & Might for self.
b) Double Lava Axe: same as above, but there are 2 projectiles.
Explosive Lava Axe: ground targeted AoE damage & Blast. Grants Fired Up, allowing Double Lava Axe to be used.
Burning Retreat: almost identical to the Staff version. Also grants Fired Up.
Ring of Fire: almost identical to the Dagger version. Also grants Fired Up.
Flame Leap: Combo Leap to enemy, dealing Damage, Burning & Fired Up.

Not a really good look if 2 of the 5 abilities are the same as abilities from other weapons. There’s some auto attack weaving involved w/ Fired Up (doesn’t stack) so there’s some nuance involved. There’s some Burning involved but they don’t last very long. Could use a lot more Burning (possibly via Fired Up buff) to make it a contender for DoT builds because right now, no one ever uses this Utility.

Conjure Frost Bow - Conjure
Creates a Frost Bow in your hands & target location. Wielders get Condition Duration (DoT duration stat) & Healing Power (healing stat).
Water Arrow: Targeted damage & AoE heal. Grants Water Arrow stacks (up to 2, 5s duration).
Frost Volley: Multiple single target attacks. Damages, applies Vulnerability & acts as a Combo Projectile per shot. Damage increased per Water Arrow.
Frost Fan: Ashe W that shotguns and pierces. Damages & Chills. +1 arrow per Water Arrow stack (base 7 arrows).
Frost Storm: Ground targeted AoE. Damages w/ dumb damage reduction per hit & Bleeds. More projectiles per Water Arrow stack (base 24 impacts).
Deep Freeze: Single target damage, Chill & Stun after cast time. +0.5s duration to Stun per Water Arrow stack (base 3s).

More utility & damage based than the usual Water skills. Requires uptime of Water Arrows for max value on skills. Should remove healing from this skill and create a separate Water based Conjure under Healing Utilities, leaving this to be the support / utility option w/ some damage. Other than that the skills synergise with the auto due to the Water Arrow stacks, except for the weird Bleeding on Frost Storm. Could’ve added a “deal X more damage if chilled” clause somewhere too. Same note about the dumb damage reduction on “storm” type abilities, make it pulsing & consistent.

Conjure Lightning Hammer - Conjure
Creates a Lightning Hammer in your hands & target location. Wielders get Ferocity (crit damage) & Precision (crit chance).
a) Lightning Swing: melee cleave.
b) Static Swing: melee cleave.
c) Thunderclap: melee AoE, damaging, Blinding & Blasting combos.
Lightning Leap: Combo leap to target, damaging in an AoE & granting Quickness (skill animations are faster).
Wind Blast: Damage & Launch back a single target. Also grant Superspeed.
Call Lightning: PBAoE damaging strikes w/ damage reduction per hit.
Static Field: Almost identical to the Staff version.

Damage & CC, fitting the Air theme. Same notes about Conjures apply. Melee weapon so skills fit together in keeping up uptime on enemies. Same notes about damage reduction per hit apply. Standardise that. Could do with an actual unique 5th ability, but at least this time there’s only 1 copied ability. Maybe an initial stun around self and then a lightning field that follows. Possibly too strong for PvP but oh well, not like that game mode gets any updates (no I’m not bitter about PvP ruining things for PvE ☺️).

Glyph of Elemental Power - Glyph
Stun break. Gain 5 stacks. Each stack makes your attacks deal increased damage & apply a Condition depending on Attunement when used: 
Fire: Burn | Water: Chill | Air: Vulnerability | Earth: Bleeding

Weird to have a stun break associated with this skill when you want to use it on cooldown. Yes there’s something that could be said about risk vs. reward but it would’ve fit better on Lightning Flash (no I’m not bitter). Used to be duration based rather than stack based, probably because of PvP shenanigans. Overall this ability is just more damage on something you’re already doing (using spells) w/ some consideration on when to use it as the Conditions don’t change after it’s used.

Glyph of Lesser Elementals - Glyph
Summon a weak elemental depending on Attunement: 
Fire: Burns & grants Might | Water: Chills & provides Ice Combo field | Air: is ranged, grants Swiftness & cleanses Cripple, Immobilize or Chill | Earth: applies Weakness, tankier. 
40s CD but lasts for 120s, cap of 5 summons.

Don’t like pets, won’t ever like pets. Unlike other pets though, these despawn on mount which is very annoying. There’s also a case where you need to precast a bunch before a boss fight which is more downtime and variance if you can’t spawn 5 of them in time (using mushrooms / potions or whatever that reset your cooldowns). Pets themselves are weak and apply non-comparable things, like boons vs. a combo field vs. a cleanse vs. being tankier. They should all do their unique things via the same method (boons, conditions, etc).

Glyph of Renewal - Glyph
Ranged res with a cast time. 
Fire: GA effect for 15s on res-ee | Water: full heal on res | Air: res & pull them to your location | Earth: PBAoE res (3).

PvP ability w/ some use in PvE (raid situations). Provides some safety since it’s a ranged res vs. having to run up to someone and press F (which is used for practically everything). Opportunity cost of taking a safe res vs. any of the other utilities.

Glyph of Storms - Glyph
Ground targeted AoE storm. 
Fire: pulsing burning field | Water: projectiles that chill and have that dumb damage reduction per hit | Air: same but vulnerability instead of chill | Earth: pulsing bleeding & blindness field.

First complaint about this is the projectile damage reduction per hit for Water & Air. If the damage was too high, it should’ve been reduced linearly. Second complaint is the varying cooldowns per Attunement. If Air was too strong (which it was, to be fair), reduce the damage, don’t make it ~3x the cooldown of Fire. Finally, they all have differing durations, why? Just standardise them so they’re more comparable and you choose depending on what you need more clearly. Other than that they all do what you expect each Attunement to do, though Water could use more in the support category since Chill is, again, not that good in PvE in general.

Signet of Air - Signet
Passive: movespeed. 
Active: Breaks stun, damage, blind & apply Vulnerability to target & nearby enemies.

Good example of a stun break since you only want to use it in defensive situations (blinding the enemy helps survivability).

Signet of Earth - Signet
Passive: toughness (armour stat). 
Active: Damage, Bleed & Immobilize target.

Other than the Immobilize, this doesn’t really help with tankiness. Possibly needs a Barrier aspect associated with it. Also needs to be AoE. Could keep Immobilize to be a single target only if that’s an issue because of ~PvP~.

Signet of Fire - Signet
Passive: precision (crit chance). 
Active: Damage & Burn target & nearby enemies.

Fine, not too interesting. Used to need it to reach crit cap for Power builds (non-DoT). Now only used in Condition builds because of the huge Burn on a low cooldown.

Signet of Water - Signet
Passive: -20% Condition duration on self. 
Active: Damage & Chill enemies while healing & reviving (not a complete revive) allies around ground targeted area.

The passive isn’t really helpful as you’re still being affected by those Conditions. Also doesn’t really fit w/ the rest of the ability. It’s one of the few Utilities that heal and is really the only reason to take it since the damage is low, Chill isn’t that helpful and the revive is 5% of their downed health bar (reaching 100% = revive). Passive could be changed to be increased healing power or boon duration to fit better.

Elite
Choose 1.

Conjure Fiery Greatsword - Conjure
Creates a Fiery Greatsword in your hands & target location. Target location is also damaged & Burned. Wielders get Power (direct damage stat) & Condition Damage (DoT damage stat). Randomly casts Lesser Fiery Eruption, damaging & Burning in an AoE every 6s.
Flame Wave: Medium ranged piercing projectile that damages.
Fiery Eruption: Medium ranged targeted AoE that only Burns, no direct damage.
Fiery Whirl: Tryndamere E. Damages, Cripples, Evades & Whirls combos.
Fiery Rush: Dash to enemy, damaging & leaving damaging Fire (not field) behind. Ignores movement speed slows. No Burning.
Firestorm: Ground targeted pulsing damage field.

Decent Elite, if not for the fact it’s a 3 minute long cooldown. Target damage & Burn isn’t needed, seems to be there just to fit the animation. Randomly cast abilities are annoying & unreliable. What doesn’t make sense is that it does the same amount of Burning as the activated version, but also does direct damage making it objectively better than an activated ability but is called “Lesser”. Technically has a 1s higher CD but doesn’t require a cast. Auto is fine, could use some Burning interaction since you’re whacking someone with fireballs. Fiery Eruption needs direct damage, it doesn’t make sense otherwise. Fiery Whirl is okay; it does more damage against bigger hitbox enemies which is dumb and should be standardised. Fiery Rush needs to have Burning on it considering it leaves a Fire section behind. Also needs to be a combo field to make it consistent with its animation. Otherwise get rid of the fire wall because it forcibly doesn’t generate if you use it while in a hitbox, meaning stationary enemies are never hit by the fire field. Firestorm just needs some burning, otherwise it being a pulsing field rather than damage reduced projectiles is great.

Glyph of Elementals - Glyph
Summon a better pet. Can be commanded for an extra ability.
Fire: Burns & applies Might. Command for more damage & Burning.
Water: Chills & creates Ice Combo fields. Command for knockback, heal & cleanse.
Air: Ranged, applies Swiftness & cleanses Crippled, Immobilized & Chilled. Command for a stun.
Earth: Tanky, applies Weakness on enemy. Command for Protection for allies & Cripple & Immobilize for enemies around it.

Bigger & better version of Glyph of Lesser Elementals, but you can only have 1 which is much more manageable in terms of balance. Pets are still going to act like pets so if you don’t like pets (like me), you won’t feel good about using it. Take Fire for damage, Water for healing, Air for CC & Earth for something to tank & CC. Also for some reason Water lasts 60s despite the tooltip saying all last 120s.

Tornado - Cantrip
Grant self Stability & turn into a tornado, replacing weapon skills, preventing Heal or Utility skills from being used or changing Attunements. Pulse every 3s for 4 pulses which damages & knocksback. Become a walking Lightning combo field that’s constantly Whirling for automatic Lightning Whirls.
Electrified Tornado: shoot out bouncing lightning, damaging enemies.
Dust Tornado: shoot out dust devils, damaging & blinding enemies.
Debris Tornado: shout out debris, damaging & knocking back enemies.
Elemental Requiem: shoot out random effects, damaging & applying Vulnerability, Bleeding or Cripple.
Dust Charge: Charge forward, damaging & launching enemies.

Honestly one of the worst skills Eles have. Trading everything away for a bunch of nothing. May have once been useful in PvP but the fact that it has a 150s CD (it’s lower in PvP for some reason???) and it takes away your ability to do anything else makes it absolutely garbage. Also where’s the Elemental part of it? It also doesn’t fit the Cantrip theme either since it takes 1 second to activate and only applies Stability or CCs enemies. You’re still vulnerable to damage & CC during all of this.

Traits
Non-coloured Traits are auto picked if the tree is chosen. Coloured Traits are a choice of 1. Can only pick 3 trees.
Fire - Damage & Burning

Empowering Flame
Grant Power while in Fire.

More damage while in Fire Attunement, fitting its theme. Could also make it give power in general and doubled in Fire to make the other Attunements stronger / less crappy like Power Overwhelming below. Maybe something for Condition builds too, like Condition Damage in addition to Power.

Burning Precision
Increased Burning duration you inflict & crits have a chance to inflict Burn.

More damage for both power & condition builds (less DoT duration stat you need, the more can be put into DoT damage).

Conjurer
Gain Fire Aura when someone picks up your Conjured weapons.

Absolutely garbage in PvE. Requires Conjures to be taken and puts a lot of value into the Fire Aura.It could be interesting to have a theme around Auras if they weren’t some crap by themselves.

Burning Fire
Cast Lesser Cleansing Fire when you have 3 conditions on you.
Lesser Cleansing Fire: Cleanse 3 conditions on self & PBAoE Burn. Gain Might per condition cleansed.

Survivability trait. Strictly for PvP since cleansing 3 conditions every 40s isn’t that useful.

Sunspot
Gain Fire Aura & PBAoE damage when switching to Fire / Overload (Tempest). Cannot crit.

More benefits for switching to Fire. Benefits match the theme, all round fitting trait. Crit modifier was added due to PvP, not sure why it’s in PvE.

Burning Rage
Sunspot inflicts Burning & radius is increased. Condition Damage is increased.

Upgrades Sunspot to be better for Condition builds; take it if you’re building for DoTs.

Smothering Auras
Fire Auras have +33% increased duration. Applying auras removes 1 condition to the recipient. Transmuting Auras removes 2 conditions.

Support choice for this portion. Not too useful in PvE since Conditions are only an issue in PvP.

Power Overwhelming
While >= 10 Might stacks, gain Power. Doubled while in Fire.

More power damage almost all the time in grouped content. Take it if building power.

Pyromancer’s Training
Fire weapon skills (1 - 5) have 20% reduced cooldown. Deal +10% strike (direct, not DoT) damage against Burning enemies.

More cooldown reduction = more abilities = more player agency = more fun! More damage against Burning enemies fits the theme, realistically it’s a flat +10% damage.

Persisting Flames
Fire Fields from weapon skills last 2s longer. Fire Fields grant a stack every time they hit an enemy, up to 10 for +10% strike damage.

Damage up for both DPS builds. Fields lasting longer means more damage + Burning. Stacks obviously mean more power damage.

Pyromancer’s Puissance
Gain Might when using any skill (1 - 5) while attuned to Fire. Leaving Fire or finishing Fire Overload activates Flame Expulsion.
Flame Expulsion: consume Might on self for PBAoE damage, Burning & Might for allies, increased per Might consumed.

Bit of a weird trait / skill. Granting others Might suggests it’s a support ability, but the damage & Burning suggests it’s a DPS ability. Damage & Burning don’t outweigh what you get from Persisting Flames and it also costs you 10 Might. Might granted lasts a decent amount of time though, which makes it lean closer to a support trait. However, it does require going into Fire meaning you’ll miss out on the other trees in exchange for mediocre damage since you’re not building for it or utility that’s not useful in PvE.

Blinding Ashes
Blind enemies that you Burn. 8s ICD per enemy.

PvP option. A blind every 8s isn’t that useful, especially compared to the others.
Air - Mobility, Crit & CC

Zephyr’s Speed
+5% crit chance. +25% movespeed while in Air.

Crit chance added here due to the rework of a problematic set of unique class buffs (Ranger in particular). Fits because if you are speccing Air, you’ll want crit. Movespeed is handy but again, would’ve been nice to have half the effect in the other elements.

Zephyr’s Boon
Grant 5s of Fury & Swiftness to allies you grant Auras to (self included).

Support choice based around Auras; makes them less crap. Crit + movespeed buffs fit the Air theme. Could also add an effect specific to Shocking Aura, even just a longer duration on the above Boons.

One with Air
Gain Superspeed when attuning to Air.

Can only see this being useful in PvP where crits are less likely & you won’t get much opportunity to apply Auras to allies.

Ferocious Winds
Gain Ferocity based on 7% of Precision.

Raw damage buff, building upon what’s already present in Power builds.

Electric Discharge
Single target damage & Vulnerability when switching to Air / finishing Air Overload. Crits for +100% the usual amount.

More benefits for switching to Air. Could’ve done with a Shocking Aura in PvE too. This one retains the ability to crit because it’s in Air I guess.

Inscription
Gain a Boon when casting a Glyph. -20% Glyph CD.
Fire: Might | Water: Regen | Air: Swiftness | Earth: Protection

Boons given are pretty bad as it’s 1 stack of Might, Regen requiring Healing Power to scale, Swiftness being easily given / not needed and Protection only lasting 3s. Glyphs recharging quicker might be useful but not enough to warrant choosing them if you’re not already using them. Big opportunity cost compared to the others.

Raging Storm
Crits grant 4s Fury, 8s ICD. Gain Ferocity while under Fury.

Helps sustain Fury duration and makes Fury a little better for yourself. Better in open world solo play.

Stormsoul
Deal +10% strike damage to hard CC’d (cannot attack) or defiant (CC immune) enemies. Outgoing Stun duration increased by 33%.

+10% damage in boss fights is huge since they’re almost always CC immune. And when they’re not, the group will CC it to make it even more vulnerable. Damage multipliers on top of damage multipliers. Stun duration increase is nice but not that many skills apply Stun specifically. Might’ve been better to be hard CC in general. Take if doing group content with a boss.

Aeromancer’s Training
Gain Ferocity, doubled in Air. -20% Air weapon skills CD.

More damage via Ferocity and via more Air skills. Same notes about CDR apply. Little bland though, could use something relating to Swiftness or CC or critting.

Bolt to the Heart
+20% strike damage against enemies below 50% HP.

It’s extra damage under a threshold, nothing else to say.

Fresh Air
Recharge Air Attunement cooldown on crits. Gain Ferocity buff when attuning to Air.

Allows a huge amount of flexibility when critting (so always), especially with Tempest Overloads. Even though it’s more fun & interactive, it loses out to Bolt to the Heart in terms of raw damage which is the name of the game at the end of the day.

Lightning Rod
Cast Lightning Rod when you hard CC an enemy.
Lightning Rod: Damage & apply Weakness.

PvP option. There’s not enough CC in the kit to justify taking this over the other 2, and even then it’s only really taken for the Weakness.
Earth - Tankiness & Bleeding

Stone Flesh
-7% strike damage taken while in Earth.

Become tankier while in Earth, makes sense. Could use something for Condition builds though, like Condition Duration if Condition Damage is going on Fire. Same note about half effect in other elements too.

Earth’s Embrace
Gain Barrier when attuning to Earth from another element.

On demand Barrier for more survivability & sustain. Attunements have a 10s cooldown when leaving by default, 8s total to leave and re-enter Earth for Weaver and 20s if Overload Earth was used by Tempest. While it’s a sound idea for a defensive trait, its effects aren’t strong enough for its effective cooldown, not to mention you’d be screwing yourself over just entering and leaving Earth for a shield. 

Previously casted Armor of Earth when below 50% HP, granting Protection, Stability & breaking stuns. So its main function has changed too from emergency defense to sustain. Possibly re-adding Protection / Stability if the Barrier breaks w/ an ICD.

Serrated Stones
+20% Bleeding duration you inflict. +5% damage against Bleeding enemies.

Offensive option. Revolves around DoTs which fits the theme.

Elemental Shielding
Auras you grant also grant Protection.

Support option. Makes Auras a little bit better. Could also have something specific for Magnetic Aura to make it stand out even more from the other Aura traits. Probably not Stability as that’s more of an emergency / on demand Boon rather than 100% uptime like Protection. Perhaps Resolution, the Condition version of Protection.

Earthen Blast
PBAoE damage & Cripple when attuning to Earth / completing Earth Overload. Cannot crit.

Earth version of the Fire PBAoE, so the same notes apply. Could also use Bleeding somewhere, either in base or another trait. Can’t crit because of PvP, yippee.

Strength of Stone
Gain Condition Damage based on 10% of Toughness. Bleed enemies you Immobilize (3s ICD).

More DoT damage the tankier you are. Pick if you chose this tree for the DoT damage. Also adds some more Bleed for rooting enemies (requires specific weapons or utilities taken though). Could be changed to CC in general to make it more universal.

Rock Solid (you will lose!)
PBAoE Stability when attuning to Earth from another element.

Support option for on demand Stability. Same notes about the effective cooldown apply here. Whilst Stability is very powerful when used correctly, building around it and messing up your rotation isn’t worth it, especially for 2 whole seconds of it.

Earthen Blessing
-33% duration of Chilled, Cripple & Immobilize on self. Restore endurance when receiving any of them.

PvP option, there’s no way those 3 Conditions are prevalent enough in PvE to warrant taking it.

Geomancer’s Training
-10% strike damage from nearby enemies. -20% Earth weapon skills CD.

General tankiness from enemies in close range. More Earth skills, you know the drill. It being direct damage reduction as opposed to Toughness does seem like it’s trying not to make Strength of Stone too powerful.

Diamond Skin
Remove 1 condition when hit while >= 75% HP. 1s ICD.


Some utility to reward being tanky. ICD is understandable, don’t want it too strong in multitarget fights but HP conditional seems like it’s only there because of PvP, it should be reduced. Could also be changed to be Conditions removed every X seconds in combat, X reduced every time hit to make it a viable option for when you’re successfully dodging / blocking.

Written in Stone
-20% Signets CD & retain passives while recharging.

Technically the offensive option as it means more Signet of Fire, the big Burn utility (and also Signet of Healing but to a lesser degree of effectiveness). Out of all the Utility specific traits, this has got to be the most effective and useful of the lot since it changes functionality in a good way rather than slapping on a small Boon / Aura.

Stone Heart
Gain a buff for 4s when entering Earth and 2s when exiting where you cannot be crit.

Hyperspecific active mitigation. Don’t believe most PvP builds have a high chance of critting except for very specific ones. PvE mobs also don’t have a high chance of critting either. Should just be changed to strike damage reduction instead. Keep the buff implementation though, it allows flexibility as opposed to the original “can’t be crit while in Earth” variation.
Water - Healing & Utility

Soothing Mist
PBAoE HoT over 10s while in Water, refreshing duration every 3s.

Extra form of healing while in Water. Base form is not effective for non-Healing builds though (DPS / Support). Unfortunately there’s nothing that directly makes it better for those builds either. Could’ve possibly had a trait that made it debuff enemies for the Ele only (to avoid having to take Ele specifically for this buff for other players). Additionally could be made into Regen so it’s affected by other traits; will require adjustments like the cleansing Regen one (like a higher refresh timer).

Soothing Ice
Gain Regen & Frost Aura when crit, 20s ICD.

Requires both being hit and being crit and has a big CD. Almost the default option if not needing the Burning & Chilled cleansing for support / low damage builds.

Piercing Shards
+33% Vulnerability duration inflicted by you. +10% strike damage against Vulnerable foes (any stacks), doubled in Water.

Offensive option. Plays into the Vulnerability (support) theme of Water (which is support & healing). That being said, Vulnerability is so common amongst even 5 players so the increased duration isn’t even that useful. Possibly change it to applying extra stacks or Vulnerability is twice as effective for the Ele, like every other trait from other classes that improve Vulnerability.

Stop, Drop, and Roll
Dodging removes Burning & Chilled from self & nearby allies. 10s ICD.

Some extra on-demand cleansing. Worthless if the fight has no Burning or Chilled, which means the default choice for support builds would be Soothing Ice by elimination.

Healing Ripple
PBAoE heal when attuning to Water from another element or Overload Water.

Water version of the “do X when changing to Y” trait. Crit heals don’t exist so it’s just an extra bit of healing. No reason not to in PvE to be honest. Makes crit not a dead stat for healers and it’s less miserable to see a crit of 100 damage when you crit for 5k healing. Other than that, could use something for support like a cleanse or Chilling / applying Vulnerable to enemies.

Soothing Disruption
Cantrips grant Regen & Vigor.

Equally as bad as the Conjure and Glyph ones. Same notes for them apply. At least the Glyph one reduced the cooldown.

Cleansing Wave
PBAoE Condition cleanse when attuning to Water.

This could easily be merged with Healing Ripple (at least in PvE) to grant another slot here. Something Healing related as none of the 3 are currently Healing based.

Flow like Water
+10% strike damage while >= 75% HP. Blocking / Evading an attack heals you.

Offensive option. Adds another layer of keeping your HP above a certain level, though if you play like me you want to be topped off always because of how squishy Eles are. The 2nd portion helps maintain the 1st portion, synergising with itself.

Aquamancer’s Training
+15% Healing to others. -20% Water weapon skills CD.

Constant healing to others increase. More Water skills = you know the drill 2.0.

Cleansing Water
Granting Regen also cleanses 1 Condition on the recipient.

Fine option if cleansing is needed. Following along with the idea of Soothing Mist being a Regen instead of a unique buff, this entire section could be changed to revolve around Soothing Mist and have a utility, offensive and healing option.

Powerful Aura
Auras granted to self also granted to nearby allies.

This should be basekit for the weapon skills that grant Auras and be changed to apply Regen on Auras. Could also be moved to where Cleansing Wave currently is and replaced with an offensive option for Soothing Mist so there’s a choice between utility, offense and healing.

Soothing Power
Soothing Mist’s healing is twice as powerful.

Healing option, nothing else to be said.
Arcane - Attunements

Arcane Prowess
Gain 1 stack of Might when switching Attunements.

Gives you a bit of a benefit when switching Attunements but seriously, 1 Might? Used to be 2s of Fury which was at least somewhat useful. Going off of my dislike for Quickness & Alacrity as a shareable Boon, this could be changed to grant a couple seconds of Quickness to self so that the first skill or 2 when swapping go out quicker, making it feel more dynamic when you switch.

Arcane Precision
Crits have a 33% chance to apply a condition based on Attunement, 3s ICD:
Fire: Burning | Water: Vulnerability | Air: Weakness | Earth: Bleeding

Double layered RNG, gross. At least crit is usually 100%. Not sure if ICD is for all or just each Attunement, either way it should be just per Attunement to streamline it. Other than that, it’s the only damaging option of the 3 (and only if in Fire or Earth, Water doesn’t count as enemies will almost always have max Vuln).

Renewing Stamina
Gain Vigor on crit. 10s ICD.

At least this one is guaranteed on crit. 50% uptime so it’s useful for extra dodges = active mitigation and whatever dodge related traits taken. Better off leaving it to a support / healer though.

Arcane Restoration
Heal self when swapping Attunements.

Some sustain when swapping Attunements. More of a PvP trait as PvE usually doesn’t call for sustained healing that otherwise can’t be done by a healer.

Elemental Attunement
PBAoE Boon when swapping to a new Attunement:
Fire: Might | Water: Regen | Air: Swiftness | Earth: Protection

AoE Boons which match the Attunement’s theme. Helpful for maintaining Boons, ignoring the fact that Fire is still 1 Might (cap is 25).

Arcane Resurrection
Cast Geyser (Staff Water 3) when reviving an ally. Geyser partially revives allies. Also gain an aura based on Attunement when beginning a revive on an ally:
Fire: Fire Aura | Water: Frost Aura | Air: Shocking Aura | Earth: Magnetic Aura

Good trait since it adds some functionality to an existing skill. That said, it somewhat forces you to take that weapon just for that skill to get max value. Aura line isn’t really useful in PvE unless traited into Aura traits. Support / heal skill, take if building that.

Elemental Lockdown
Whenever you hard CC an enemy, gain a Boon based on Attunement, 1s ICD:
Fire: Might | Water: Regen | Air: Fury | Earth: Protection

Requires hard CC which is few and far between. Not useful in PvE generally because bosses are immune to CC. ICD to standardise between single target and multi target.

Final Shielding
Cast Lesser Arcane Shield when using an Elite skill. 20s ICD.
Lesser Arcane Shield: same as Arcane Shield, but doesn’t break stun or crit.

Used to be a stun break and shield block when hit <= 50% HP, now it’s tied to the most disappointing part of Eles. None of the skills have a CD anywhere near 20s other than the Elemental one and that requires it to stay alive and spam its Command almost on cooldown (15s). Also requires holding Elites for the defensive effect, it’s not really a “Final” Shielding in most cases where you want to use your powerful ability.

Elemental Enchantment
Gain Concentration (bonus boon duration stat) & -15% Attunements CD.

The Concentration is generally the reason to go down this tree (+ the ressing trait) which bodes pretty poorly for the tree in general if the best thing is a stat increase. Lowering the cooldown of Attunements is nice but not at all needed. Cooldown of the element left shouldn’t matter as you should use all you need before leaving and the cooldown between non-used elements is negligible.

Evasive Arcana
While in combat, cast a skill while Dodging based on Attunement, 10s ICD per skill:
Fire: Flame Burst = PBAoE damage & Burn.
Water: Cleansing Wave = PBAoE heal & cleanse.
Air: Blinding Flash = PBAoE Blind.
Earth: Shock Wave = PBAoE damage, Bleeding, Cripple & Blast.

Another good trait that adds functionality to existing mechanics in a non-Boon / stat buff way. Buffs the dodge to add additional effects, most useful being the Water & Earth ones. Definitely looks as though the Earth one is overloaded compared to Air though, could use some additional effects for the weaker ones.

Elemental Surge
-20% Arcane skills CD, grant a Ferocity buff & inflict a Condition based on attunement:
Fire: Burning | Water: Chilled | Air: Blindness | Earth: Immobilize

Possible to maintain a high uptime on this by using multiple Arcane skills but it doesn’t feel like they fit in on an Elementalist. I wouldn’t miss it if this tree was removed, its traits merged into the other 4 and the associated skills were gone. The effect itself is pretty cool, gives you a buff to maintain but not strong enough to do so due to power creep & opportunity cost for the Utility skill slots.

Bountiful Power
Deal +2% strike damage per unique Boon on you, max 24% (12 Boons).

It is very rare to maintain 12 Boons as some are scarce / don’t last long. Requires relying on others for max value as there are some Boons that Ele don’t get access to at all. Other than that it’s kind of boring since it’s a damage boost you generally can’t control. Could use an extra effect relating to Boons to differentiate it from the other 3 traits that do the same thing (2 of which have another effect like increased Concentration and grant allies Boons when using a Profession mechanic). Maybe increased effect of certain Boons depending on current Attunement.

Tempest Combat
Same as core Elementalist, but has the following changes:
Gains access to Warhorn, allowing new skills which are support oriented.
Gains access to Overloads after staying in an Attunement for 6s, a powerful channelled skill which then puts that Attunement on a 20s cooldown. Very annoying if interrupted.
Gains access to Shout skills, PBAoE effects for both allies and enemies.
Gains access to the Tempest traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specialisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Tempest Abilities
Overloads

Overload Fire
Breaks stun. Channelled Fire combo field around self while combo Whirling. Grant Might to allies & Burning to enemies. Leaves a tornado that continues pulsing effects.

All Overloads break stun, allowing you to begin channelling anytime. This gives them an extra layer of decision making: use now for damage / utility or save for a stun break. 

Effect itself matches the Fire theme: damage, Burning & Might (which is in turn more damage). Extra combo fields are always nice, especially Fire for damage reasons.

Overload Water
Breaks stun. Channelled pulsing heal & cleanse. Burst heal, AoE Regen & Vigor at the end of cast.

Non-damaging heal & cleanse. However, it’s only used in emergencies since using an Overload puts that Attunement on a 20s cooldown. Meaning you’ll be forced to stay in Water if you want to keep up the Soothing Mist HoT, which you should be doing if you’re caring about using Overload Water. Otherwise other builds can use it as another way to cleanse but it’s better off being left for the support / healers. Effects all match the Water theme: healing & cleansing. Could use some more offensive leaning effects like Chill or any combo related effects like a Water / Ice field.

Overload Air
Breaks stun. Channelled PBAoE strikes of damage & Vulnerability. PBAoE buff that deals extra damage on attack & lightning combo field that continues the strikes at the end of cast.

Damage & debuffs all related to Air: strike damage. Leaves the rare Lightning field for use too. Damage buff only applies to the next hit on a single target so there’s some jankiness in AoE situations but other than that, it’s a decent skill. Possibly could use Swiftness just to match the other 3 Overloads, maybe some CC since that’s meant to be the trademark of Air: strike damage & CC.

Overload Earth
Breaks stun. Grant self Stability & pulse Protection, damage, Cripple & Bleeding. Immobilize, Blast combos & leave an AoE (not field) dealing the same pulsing effects at the end of the cast.

Provides defensive Boons and Bleeding, matching the Earth theme. Only real issue is that it doesn’t leave a combo field, but that’s most likely because there’s no such thing as an “Earth” field. Only Poison and Smoke are remotely close to Earth and even then it’s a stretch. Blasting Poison is just AoE weakness, which might work but thematically a bit weird. Blasting Smoke is AoE stealth which would absolutely overload this skill.

Warhorn
Support oriented. Off-hand only.

Heat Sync
Grant Might to self, then spread current stacks of Might & Fury to allies.

These Warhorns skills can be divided into 2 categories: support & AoE. This is the support skill and is essential to providing Might & Fury uptime to your subgroup (group of 5, raids / strikes are 10. This only hits 5). Usage itself isn’t that interesting. Stack up Might & Fury at the beginning then use this on cooldown.

Wildfire
Frontal Fire combo field that damages & Burns.

Just another Fire combo field. Damages & Burns which is all we can ask for. Does damage evenly without RNG unlike other skills for this weapon.

Tidal Surge
Frontal AoE heal & Regen for allies, damage & knockback for enemies.

Due to the offensive & defensive nature, you’re presented with an option to use it as part of healing or save it for when CC is needed. Fight knowledge helps with that and its versatility makes it a useful skill to have.

Water Globe
Frontal moving Water combo field that heals.

Healing AoE field, with the unique property of moving forward. Not always useful and just ends up requiring you standing behind the group and facing the boss but there’s something extra to play around as opposed to a standard frontal AoE.

Cyclone
Frontal AoE that damages, & Pulls enemies while granting allies (+self) Swiftness.

Since Swiftness isn’t in high demand, this is exclusively saved for CC. Unfortunately that makes the skill slightly less interesting than Tidal Surge. Still, it is the only source of Pull for Eles excluding using the Earth C*njure.

Lightning Orb
Frontal moving orb that fires non-piercing projectiles, damaging & applying Vulnerability to enemies.

An incredibly problematic skill because of its RNG. 42 projectiles are fired and since they’re non-piercing, they might not hit the intended target. On an average sized target, a target will be hit 14 times which is a HUGE difference from the 42 on a large sized hitbox. Make the projectiles piercing and it should resolve the RNG issue as having damage be dependent on hitbox makes for inconsistency which never feels good for anyone involved. Other than that, it’s just damage & Vulnerability 42 times which is a huge number.

Sand Squall
Grant Protection to self & allies. Increase duration of all Boons on self & allies by 3s. Grant self Magnetic Aura. Blast combo fields.

Part of the Boon support skills. Generally used after Fire Overload -> Heat Sync -> Earth Attunement -> Sand Squall to blast the Fire field from Fire Overload. That being said, since it’s part of maintaining Boon uptime, it’s just used on cooldown using the above combo, so the Magnetic Aura won’t usually ever be timed to block something on purpose. Same applies to Protection but at least that stacks in duration with other sources.

Dust Storm
Summon dust storms randomly around self that damage, Bleed & Blind enemies.

The other problematic skill. Randomly spawned storms, a total of 4. On average enemies will be hit by 1 or 2. This needs to be changed to be a PBAoE that follows for consistency’s sake. It being short ranged will also fit with the Earth theme since its tree has traits that only work while near enemies. Otherwise make it spawn underneath the target a single storm.

Shouts

“Wash the Pain Away!” - Heal
PBAoE channelled, pulsing & front-loaded heal w/ cleanse at end.

Party heal option. Front-loaded so can technically cancel if needed but you’ll need to fully channel for both max value and the cleanse. Take it if playing healer / support. Not that great for solo since the heal is on the medium/low end and there are better sources of Condition cleansing, if that’s even needed in PvE. Other than that, it’s a medium range PBAoE like the others. Strong party effects that require you to get somewhat close for usage.

“Feel the Burn!” - Utility
PBAoE Might & Fire Aura for allies & damage & Burning for enemies.

A whole bunch of fire related buffs and debuffs in 1 go. For some reason, the PvP version has 2 charges of this skill, allowing stockpiling or using 1 and keeping the other just in case. No real reason for that other than possibly helping with Might generation but there’s also no reason why PvE shouldn’t also get it.

“Eye of the Storm!” - Utility
PBAoE stun break, Superspeed, Swiftness & Stability for allies.

Everything needed to break allies out of a stun and escape safely. Only thing missing is the Shocking Aura in PvE. Possibly thinking skill is already overloaded with stuff but the Aura would’ve been handy for Aura related traits, especially since Auras are meant to be a defining aspect of Elementalist.

“Aftershock!” - Utility
PBAoE Protection, Aegis & Magnetic Aura for allies & damage, Cripple & Immobilize for enemies. Also Blasts combos.

If you thought the above was overloaded, wait until you see this one. Convinced the above should have the Shocking Aura now. Whole bunch of the usual Earth effects but its most important aspect is that it’s on-demand Aegis & Magnetic Aura, allowing you to completely bypass some mechanics if timed properly.

“Flash-Freeze!” - Utility
PBAoE Regen & Frost Aura for allies & damage & Chilled for enemies.

A lot more tame compared to the previous 2. Water version, not much else to say. Possibly could use Resistance (timed buff to ignore non-damaging Conditions, soft CC) for allies & Vulnerability for enemies to make it a bit more impactful in both offensive & defensive directions. Meaning there’s more of a choice on when to use it because right now, it’s exclusively used for the Regen & Frost Aura.

“Rebound!” - Elite
PBAoE Fury & buff for allies that ignores the next lethal attack & heals instead. If death buff expires naturally, gain an Aura based on current Attunement.

Very powerful Elite that can ignore mechanics, if used perfectly. Otherwise it’s an incredibly mediocre Fury & Aura buff. That being said, if you’re going a support build it’s a pretty decent choice, but only because the other options absolutely suck compared to it. Just requires a bit of fight knowledge for it to be useful. Which means it won’t be that useful in open world stuff where it’s just chaos usually.

Traits

Singularity
Gain access to Overloads & Shouts.

Only including this because you need to put points into it and it’s technically the first trait in the tree.

Gale Song
PBAoE Protection when using a healing skill.

Bit of extra survivability. Used to be an automatic party stun break when CC’d via an “Eye of the Storm!”. Could lean more into that and also make it so healing skills gain the break stun effect on self, on a cooldown. Also side note, that previous effect had a 5 minute cooldown in PvP. Yikes.

Latent Stamina
PBAoE Vigor when attuning to Water. Granting Vigor also restores Endurance to recipients.

Bit of extra Boons when attuning to Water. Seems a little bit too specific compared to the other traits though, but that’s fine. Just something I noted. Endurance related trait so it’s more active mitigation; defensive w/ some utility if the dodge traits were chosen. Not sure why there’s an ICD since you can’t enter Water more than once every 10s as a Tempest anyway.

Unstable Conduit
Overloads grant an aura based on the Attunement upon completion.
Fire: Fire Aura | Water: Frost Aura | Air: Shocking Aura | Earth: Magnetic Aura

Overload related trait. If it was on cast rather than end, it would definitely make it safe for Overloads to be started but there’s a huge discrepancy in terms of defensiveness when comparing a Fire Aura and a Magnetic Aura, so it makes sense for it to be at the end. That being said, it’s not that useful. Out of the 3 options, none of them are really offensive.

Gathered Focus
Gain Concentration. Doubled if >= 90% HP.

A whole lot of extra Boon duration stats. Pretty much solidifies this spec as the support spec (which inversely means its DPS capabilities kind of suck in comparison). Health threshold is not that important except in solo / PvP.

Tempestuous Aria
Shouts grant Might to allies & apply Weakness to enemies, in addition to base effects.

Little bit of extra Might & Weakness isn’t really worth taking this trait, especially compared to the other 2. Used to also increase the number of targets hit from 5 to 10 but all of those have been removed when they decided AoE Boon related things are capped at 5 for balance purposes (2 Booners + 3 DPS per subgroup). Possibly also make Shouts have charges in PvE for more flexibility?

Harmonious Conduit
Gain Stability & Swiftness when starting an Overload.

Most important part is the Stability which lasts just long enough to help make sure the Overload completes (unless you get CC’d twice). Extra buffer of protection which means more reliability = more practical damage & other effects.

Invigorating Torrents
Auras you grant also grant Regen & Vigor.

Aura support related trait. Makes Auras better with healing & endurance regen = more active mitigation.

Hardy Conduit
Gain Protection when starting an Overload. Protection is stronger on self (33% -> 39.6% damage reduction).

Even more survivability during Overloads when you’re most vulnerable. Nothing else to be said; it achieves that via 2 different ways (technically both Protection but yeah).

Transcendent Tempest
Overloads are available after 4s instead of 6s. Completing an Overload grants 15% all damage bonus.

DPS Overload option. More (unique) Overloads + damage buff = more damage. Also makes it so you want to save your most damaging skills for after Overloads, which is what you would be doing naturally anyway since they’re available from the start of combat.

Lucid Singularity
Overload pulses & successful completion grant Alacrity (increased recharge speed).

Support Overload option. Only way for Elementalists to provide Alacrity. Since this is an Elite specialisation and base Eles have no way of providing Quickness or Alacrity to others, it will never run into an issue where it can provide both causing a balance nightmare. Feelings about Quickness and Alacrity are still the same. Wouldn’t mind it providing a unique buff to the Elementalist only with the same effect of Quickness and/or Alacrity though, giving Overloads even more of a high in combat.

Elemental Bastion
Heal allies you grant Auras to. Grant Frost Aura to self & allies when hit <= 75% HP. 30s ICD.

Even more utility to Auras. This honestly could be merged with Invigorating Torrents and be changed to be the healing Overload option. The 2nd portion is just a bit more survivability when under fire.

Weaver Combat
Gains access to Sword, allowing new skills which are melee ranged.
Attunements always have a 4s cooldown. This, in theory, provides a lot more flexibility when switching Attunements since the cooldown is lowered for the exited Element but it raises the cooldown for switching to a new Attunement from 1s to 4s, sacrificing 2 Attunements for 1 which you would’ve already used the abilities for. Balance wise it makes sense and fits the theme of flowing through the elements but it feels bad compared to being able to quickly react.
Swapping out of an Attunement will put it in your offhand for weapon skill purposes (4, 5).
Attunement you swapped into will be in your main hand for weapon skill purposes (1, 2).
The 3rd weapon skill will be a unique Weaver Dual Attack skill if main hand and offhand are different Attunements, regardless of element order (Fire + Water is the same as Water + Fire). If they’re the same, it will be the usual core Elementalist skill.
Gains access to Stance skills which are generally self buffs / effects.
Gains access to the Weaver traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specilisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Weaver Abilities
Sword
Short ranged & versatile (offensive, defensive, mobility). Main hand only.

Fire Strike -> Fire Swipe -> Searing Slash
Frontal cleave, damage.
Frontal cleave, more damage.
Frontal cleave, most damage & Burning.

Each of the 1 attack combos for Sword pretty much do the same thing and have most of the damage & effects being backloaded, but with their own Elemental twist. In Fire’s cast, there’s burning. That being said, part 1 and 2 of the combo for Fire is actually the weakest of all elements. It does less damage than Air and the same as Water & Earth but they have the heal & Bleed components. Fire combo 1 & 2 should have more damage or also have Burning on them.

Tracking where you’re up to in the combo takes some getting used to: there’s so much visual noise that trying to see where you’re up to is difficult. Eying the HUD at the bottom isn’t that great either since it will hurt your ability to do mechanics. Also can’t really keep a count in your head because of the difference in speed between with Quickness and without.

Flame Uprising
Combo Leap forward then AoE Fire Combo field, damaging & Burning. Very long animation lock.

Pretty cool ability if it weren’t for the horrendous animation lock. It takes 0.75s to fire and you’re also locked into the animation until it’s done. This is supposed to be the mobility skill out of the 3 and it doesn’t act like it at all. Other than that it does damage & Burns which is part of the Fire theme. 

Cauterizing Strike
Frontal cleave, damaging & Burning. 60% bonus damage if enemy is already burning.

Basic frontal AoE that does Fire related damage. Extra conditional for Burning targets to take more damage (which they should be almost always in PvE).

Seiche -> Clapotis -> Breaking Wave
Frontal cleave, damage. Heal per target hit.
Frontal cleave, more damage. Same heal per target hit.
Frontal cleave, most damage. PBAoE heal.

Same notes for Sword autos apply. Water provides healing as expected. All 3 skills don’t have Chill or Vulnerability at all so that could be added somewhere, maybe the 3rd part of the combo or Aqua Siphon.

Riptide
Visually spin & Evade backwards, damaging & applying Regen to self. Leave a Water combo field that pulses healing.

It's a bit annoying that you’re spinning away but don’t have a combo Whirl component. The Evade is probably the only useful aspect to it for DPS since the damage is low (honestly didn’t realise there was a damage component) and the healing & regen from the skill & water combo field are weak and don’t scale with DPS. If the spinning damage also Chilled enemies it would make it a lot more useful in terms of self peel for DPS (in PvE, this is a very good skill in PvP).

Aqua Siphon
Frontal single target attack, damaging the enemy & healing & applying Regen to allies.

Does very little damage but has a decent heal attached. It being single-target doesn’t really matter since it’s not used for the damage, but will be an issue if Chill / Vulnerability is added to it as per the notes above. The issue is that it takes at least 4s to get to and requires you to attune to Water twice which is at least 8s of being stuck with Water skills. This is very bad for DPS as they are all seemingly geared towards healing or CC. If you feel like you need to use this skill for the healing, you’re probably already dead. It would be a lot better if the Attunement ICD was lower.

Charged Strike -> Polaric Slash -> Call Lightning
Frontal cleave, damage.
Frontal cleave, more damage & grant self Swiftness.
Frontal cleave, most damage & extra lightning strikes for more damage.

Same notes for Sword autos apply. Air providing the most damage out of the 4 as expected. Can’t attach hard CC to an auto so this is as good as it’s going to get.

Polaric Leap
Instant combo Leap to a single enemy to damage & Daze. If the enemy is interrupted, gain Superspeed.

Strictly used for mobility or CC as the damage is minimal & using a skill just for the combo Leap is silly. Issue about Attunement ICD applies though; if you need mobility or CC when you just switched to Fire + Earth means you’re locked out for 4s. Extra line about Superspeed is mostly for PvP since you’re never going to interrupt anything in PvE due to CC immunity or having only instant attacks.

Quantum Strike
Single target attack w/ lightning strikes for more damage & Vulnerability.

This being a single target attack feels bad since it’s a lot of damage that could go on the wrong enemy. There’s no reason for it not to cleave since it’s both melee and has a long-ish cooldown like all the other Sword 3 skills. Damage itself is very good despite it being a reskinned Call Lightning (same lightning bolts, but purple). More Vulnerability for more damage; that should be a shared theme w/ Water.

Crystal Slash -> Crystalline Strike -> Crystalline Sunder
Frontal cleave, damage & Bleed.
Frontal cleave, more damage & Bleed.
Frontal cleave, most damage, Bleed & Cripple.

Same notes for Sword autos apply. Earth applying Bleeding & Cripple as expected. Could add a small defensive aspect to it as well, maybe a small barrier on the 3rd hit.

Earthen Vortex
Visually spin into the ground, Evading attacks. Burst out to damage, Bleed, Cripple & Blast combos.

Same note about visually spinning and not having a Whirl combo. Whirls aren’t even that strong or reliable since the projectiles spun out are sent out randomly. It does an okay amount of damage but is mostly just used for the combo Blast or Evade since the other skills (and even Autos) do more damage.

Rust Frenzy
Channelled frontal cleave w/ windup animation, damaging & Bleeding. 

Very easy to interrupt because it’s the only channelled skill on Weaver Sword where you can’t move. Plus it has a windup & channel so there’s even more opportunity to mess it up. That said it’s very rare to even use this skill since it requires Attuning to Earth twice; the same note as Aqua Siphon applies.

Dual Attacks
Sword

Twin Strike - Fire + Water
Frontal 2 hit cleave, damaging, Burning & Chilling enemies.

Does decent damage and it’s pretty quick too. Generally don’t go into Water as DPS so this is strictly only used during Weave Self which requires cycling through all the Elements for max value. Since you’re in Water, you might as well use it.

Pyro Vortex - Fire + Air
Frontal cleave, damaging & leaving behind a Fire (not a combo) field on each enemy. Field damages & Burns.

Fire & Air share the common theme of damage. Does a lot of damage through the fire (not combo) fields which means there’s some counterplay by moving out of them. 

Lava Skin - Fire + Earth
Self buff for Barrier & Stability. Pulse damage & Burning for enemies, Barrier for self.

Fire & Earth share the theme of DoTs so this ability having a bunch of Burning makes sense. It being a one off cast means you can swap into it, use it and then swap out without any hassle. Barrier isn’t strong enough to warrant it being saved as a defensive skill, but there is some sustain since it’s pulsing as opposed to 1 big burst of shielding. Being both melee & squishy, we take what we can get.

Shearing Edge - Water + Air
Frontal mid-ranged projectile that damages, Chills & Bleeds.

Does decent damage and provides some extra utility. Being ranged is also helpful but not enough to save it for downtime, 12s CD anyway. Bleed is sort of random, if they wanted more damage they could’ve upped the direct damage and add Vulnerability instead, which was a shared theme between Water & Air.

Natural Frenzy - Water + Earth
Frontal channelled volley of non-piercing projectiles which damage, Bleed & apply Vulnerability.

You’d think Water + Earth would lean towards defensive / healing. Instead, it goes for DoTs & “support” (Vulnerability). It being channelled & non-piercing / single target makes it feel really janky to use. Damage itself is fine but since you’re going into both Water & Earth it’s overall weaker since you’re stuck in either one of them when you could be in Fire or Air.

Gale Strike - Air + Earth
Frontal cleave, damaging, Bleeding, applying Vulnerability & Floating (knocking up / suspending like Nami Q) enemies.

Does okay damage but you’d only use it if you’re desperate for CC. Same issue about taking a lot of time to switch to Air & Earth applies. By the time you get to it you would’ve missed the opportunity to apply the CC.
Staff

Pressure Blast - Fire + Water
Ground targeted projectile that heals allies it passes through. Explodes when hits the ground or an enemy, Regening allies + damaging & Blinding enemies.

Ground targeted AoE that damages & heals. The explosion should have the same heal as the passthrough heal to make it consistent. Damage is pretty low and there’s no burning. If they want to pass Staff as the support weapon, add combo fields to it. Either Fire or Water (can’t be both because each combo activator can only do so once and it’s seemingly random).

Plasma Blast - Fire + Air
Frontal projectile that explodes on contact or max range for damage.

This only does damage, not a Burn in sight. Other than that it’s a slow moving exploding projectile, so there’s some skill involved in getting it to hit. Pretty basic, could also use a Fire field if pushing Staff to be support.

Pyroclastic Blast - Fire + Earth
Ground targeted AoE Fire Combo field. Damages & Burns on impact + on pulse.

Like any other ground targeted Fire AoE, except there’s a bit of a delay w/ the launching. There’s nothing about it that says Earth though. Possibly Cripple or Bleed from shrapnel exploding, or Barrier on hit / for allies for more support?

Monsoon - Water + Air
Front travelling projectile that damages & Chills enemies + Regens allies per tick.

Forward wave of small damage & Chill + Regen. Apparently acts as a Water field despite not being labelled as one, not sure if intended or not but if it is that’s some extra utility. Vulnerability should also be added as per Water + Air.

Lahar - Water + Earth
Ground targeted AoE that damages & Cripples enemies. Grant self Stability.

Another ground targeted AoE, feels like Dual attacks were a bit of an afterthought for Staff. Nothing about it says Water either. It leaves a puddle but isn’t labelled as any type of Field when it could easily be Water. Also another situation where an Earth field could be useful (Poison and Smoke don’t count). Should have Bleed on it since a “Lahar” is a slurry of rock & water. Going through that would definitely cut & bleed you.

Pile Driver - Air + Earth
After a channel, launch a piercing Combo projectile that damages & Dazes enemies.

High damaging attack after a channel which makes sense. Also pierces & Dazes, building on the big damaging channelled attack idea. Could slap a Bleed on it to make it more Earth-y too since right now the only the CC is remotely Earth-y.
Dagger

Steam Surge - Fire + Water
Dash while Evading, damaging enemies & healing allies at the end. Also leaves a short Water combo field.

Bit of extra mobility for the short ranged Dagger. Damages & heals for Fire & Water. Water field only lasts for 2s, not really enough for most combos. Evade useful for iframes, skill expression. Could use some Burning since it’s hot steam.

Plasma Burst - Fire + Air
Short ranged damage & Burning cleave that Blasts combos.

Don’t know why this gets Burning but not the Staff version, they both even have Plasma in the name. Basic cleave that damages & Burns for Fire & Air. Added bonus of Blasting combos which Ele usually need (ways to exploit combos they place).

Ashen Blast - Fire + Earth
Short ranged damage, Burning & Blinding cleave.

Same as the above but trading in the Blast for a Blind which helps with survivability, albeit for a very short amount of time.

Katabatic Wind - Water + Air
Short ranged damage, Chill & Daze cleave. Regen for self. Also Blasts combos.

Lots going on but mostly for the CC since you need Water attunement. Bunch of small added bonuses. Same not about Water + Air = Vulnerability applies.

Mudslide - Water + Earth
Dash while Evading, damaging & Knocking down enemies. Leaves a trail of mud that also knocks down. Also knocks down in an AoE at the end.

Almost entirely Evade & CC, damage is negligible. Covers all cases w/ the knockdown: hitting w/ the animation, the residual field and the end so you’re not forced to aim and slide through a hitbox to get value unlike other moving skills.

Grinding Stones - Air + Earth
PBAoE damage & Bleeding. Stability & reduced damage taken for self.

Defensive buff that damages around self. Damage is reasonable but it’s the only aspect of Air involved. It’s primarily Earth with the Bleed, Stability & damage reduction. Could use some movespeed while near enemies or something like that for Air; it would synergise well with the melee range damage while not making it too strong of an escape.
Scepter

Fiery Frost - Fire + Water
Dodge & fire a single target projectile that damages, Burns & Chills.

Can be “saved” for a dodge (see note about swapping between Attunements and skills not being readily available) or used for damage. Not sure why it’s single target though. Damage, Burning & Chilled fit the skill.

Plasma Beam - Fire + Air
Channelled single target beam of damage. No movement penalties.

This one at least somewhat fits the single target nature. It should also damage in between caster and target like Scepter Air 1. Feels good to use since there’s no movement speed penalty while channelling.

Fracturing Strike - Fire + Earth
2 part single target damage, Burning & Vulnerability. 1st is instant, 2nd is delayed.

Also single target when it’s a meteor crashing and exploding? Damages, & Burns which makes sense. Vulnerability is nice but doesn’t really fit with either Fire or Earth. Bleed would’ve made more sense. Doesn’t need to have defensive aspects since Scepter is longer ranged & not support oriented usually.

Glacial Drift - Water + Air
Forward moving projectile that damages & Chills. Also grant self Stability.

Same as the other forward moving projectile AoEs. Damages & Chills which is fine. Stability is sort of random though. This is the skill that could use Fracturing Strike’s Vulnerability instead.

Stone Tide - Water + Earth
Ground targeted AoE that pulses damage, Bleeding & Vulnerability.

Another ground targeted AoE. Damage, Bleeding & Vulnerability all fit Earth & Water respectively. Doesn’t necessarily need to be a Water field since Scepter doesn’t have any field primers normally.

Earthen Synergy - Air + Earth
2 part AoE attack. 1st part damages, 2nd part is delayed, does less damage & Stuns.

Bit of damage and CC, primarily CC. This fits the Air + Earth theme. Not sure why this is AoE when Fiery Frost & Fracturing Strike aren’t. Targeted, ranged AoE CC is pretty strong.

Stances

Aquatic Stance - Healing
Small heal then self buff. Additional healing for self & allies around enemies you hit. 1s ICD. 2 charges.

Pretty mediocre heal. There’s enough time to proc the AoE heal 4 times due to ICD. Assuming all 4 heals are procced, it heals self for a medium amount and allies for a low amount. Only reason to take this is if you need party healing on a Weaver since base Ele doesn’t have party healing. 

Primordial Stance - Utility
PBAoE pulsing damage & conditions based on current Attunements. Full Attunements = double Conditions. 2 charges.
Fire: Burning | Water: Chilled | Air: Vulnerability | Earth: Bleeding

Extra damage and some debuffs depending on the current Attunements, meaning switching Attunements will update the debuffs accordingly. For max damage, generally used while exiting Fire + Air into Fire + Fire. Otherwise, can be used wherever if certain Conditions are needed but that’s generally for PvP. Skill is pretty cool in that it updates to match current Attunements.

Stone Resonance - Utility
Pulsing Barrier for self. Also grants self Stability on cast. 2 charges.

Some sustain in the form of Barrier. Gaining Barrier while having Barrier will not extend the duration of the 1st application, so it’s most effective against sustained damage. Basically, the tanky Stance.

Unravel - Utility
Temporarily fully Attune to elements, losing Dual Attacks. Gain Boons based on Attunement. Reset Attunement cooldowns. 2 charges.
Fire: Might | Water: Vigor | Air: Fury | Earth: Protection

Offers a little bit of leeway regarding swapping between Attunements. Buff lasts barely long enough to swap fully Attune twice (5s w/ 4s ICD). Honestly feels like this should either be basekit as the 5th profession button or the ICD be reduced. Remove the Boons if necessary.

Twist of Fate - Utility
Stun break, Evade & grant self Superspeed. 2 charges.

Stun break / Evasion stance. Does exactly what it says. Immune to everything except DoTs after breaking out so usually you’re safe unlike some other stun breaks. Charges allow leniency in using it as a stun break or an Evade.

Weave Self & Tailored Victory
Give self buff for 20s w/ following effects. Reduced Attunement cooldown to 2s. Gain Woven Element buff on use and when entering an Attunement. Entering all 4 Elements will get rid of Weave Self buff & grant Perfect Weave for 10s which is all 4 Woven buffs combined. Also grants access to Tailored Victory.
Woven Fire: +20% Condition Damage.
Woven Water: +20% Boon Duration, +20% Healing to Others.
Woven Air: +50% Movespeed, +10% Strike Damage.
Woven Earth+ -20% Strike Damage Taken.
Tailored Victory: Ends Perfect Weave for PBAoE damage & Float. Unblockable.

Probably the only Elite that is actually good. Reduces Attunement recharge to 2s (which I believe should be base or at least lowered to 3s for more dynamic combat). Each buff from the Attunements fit the Attunements. That said, it took almost 6 years to add the +10% damage to Woven Air, meaning this was useless offensively for power builds. But now it’s an amazing skill for both versions of DPS Weaver with the manic cycling through elements. Tailored Victory active itself is probably the only letdown as the damage is weak and there’s a cast time. If it was automatic on expiration that'd make this Elite perfect. Do that change in PvE only if you have to, it shouldn’t suffer just because of another game mode.

Traits

Weaver
Allows dual wielding Attunements, reducing all recharges to 4s. Gain access to Dual Attacks & Stances.

Only placing this here because like Tempest, it’s technically the 1st trait in the tree.

Superior Elements
Dual Attacks Weaken enemies. Attacks against Weakened enemies have +15% chance of critting. 4s ICD.

Offensive option. Not that useful for DoT builds since they don’t build crit chance or damage but it’s better than nothing. Weaken should always be on the enemy in instanced content so this is basically +15% crit for power builds. Not sure why this has an ICD in PvE. The only thing this does is mess up how often it’s applied if the Weaver has Alacrity (CDR) as there’s a 4s cooldown between swapping Attunements which is affected by Alacrity to recharge quicker.

Elemental Pursuit
Gain 2s of Superspeed when inflicting Immobilize, Chilled or Cripple on enemies. 10s ICD.

Mobility option, but with all the blinks on some Ele weapons + Utility skills, there’s no need for this in PvE. It’s definitely more of a PvP trait. Grants mobility in an active way (you need to apply the CC) so it’s more involved w/ you the player.

Master’s Fortitude
Gain Vitality when wielding a Sword. Gain Vitality based on 5% of Power & 5% of Condition Damage.

Extra HP that scales with damage stats. Helps the (usually) melee Weaver survive better, especially since Ele base stats suck the most out of all professions. Since it’s just passive stats, it’s not all that interesting but you may get use out of it if you’re not building crit / power, especially paired with Elements of Rage which increases crit chance based on Vitality stat (see below).

Elemental Refreshment
Grant self & allies barrier when using a Dual Attack.

Barrier is pretty small and the ally clause was only added 5 years after release. Still, it’s some free constant sustain since it’s always chosen if you're a Weaver and you should always be cycling through the Attunements anyway.

Weaver’s Prowess
Gain +10% Condition Damage & +20% Condition Duration when Attuning to a different element (from the main hand Attunement).

More Condition Damage & Duration for DoT builds. The buff lasts long enough to cover entering & exiting an Attunement twice (so Fire + Air -> Fire + Fire -> Earth + Fire will all be covered with the buff). That said it should just be on any Attunement swapping as that line is only affecting Unravel which is rarely used in general and never used in Condition builds. Reduce the duration if needed. Otherwise, encourages active cycling between Attunements which is what Weaver is about: flow.

Swift Revenge
Gain Swiftness when using a Dual Attack. +15% Strike Damage while under Swiftness or Superspeed.

Power damage option for this section. Swiftness is by far the easiest Boon to get so it’s basically +15% damage. Less interesting compared to the above in terms of application.

Bolstered Elements
Gain Barrier when using a Stance. Use Lesser Stone Resonance when hit <=50% HP. 70s ICD.
Lesser Stone Resonance: same pulsing Barrier as Stone Resonance but no Stability.

Used to give Stability instead of Barrier (we can all guess what game mode caused that to be changed). Give PvE Stability! It feels awful to be constantly knocked about as a squishy melee character, especially since you’d be forced to take this trait to try and counter it and miss out on damage for both power & DoT builds. Also has an emergency defensive measure but if you get spiked you’ll get downed anyway since the Barrier is pulsing.

Elemental Polyphony
Gain stats based on current Attunements. Dual attuned = gain both benefits but not double benefits if fully Attuned.
Fire: Power | Water: Healing Power | Air: Ferocity | Earth: Vitality

Some extra stats depending on your Attunements. No reason why this doesn’t give double stats while fully Attuned. In fact there’s a bug where you occasionally get double stats while fully Attuned if you enter a new map, meaning that’s probably the default case.

Elements of Rage
Gain +10% Damage & +10% Condition Damage when fully Attuning. Also gain Precision based on 13% of Vitality.

The damage option. Damage comes from specific Attunement combinations (full Attunements) so in a way it also encourages cycling through Attunements. Passive crit chance based on Vitality is also nice, but in a less exciting way. Somewhat synergises w/ Master’s Fortitude which grants Vitality based on Power & Condition Damage. Could open up a Hybrid build option, but since it’s the only trait that affects both types of damage, it doesn’t compete with a pure damage type build.

Woven Stride
Gain Swiftness when Immobilized, Crippled or Chilled. 3s ICD.
Also gain Regen when gaining Superspeed or Swiftness. No ICD.
Swiftness on self now grants 40% movespeed, up from 33%.

Mobility & sustain option. Focuses on healing damage rather than avoiding it. Definitely more of a PvP option since constantly being Conditioned is more prevalent there than it is in PvE.

Invigorating Strikes
Gain Vigor when using a Dual Attack. Dodging grants Barrier.

Also mobility & sustain option, this time focusing more on mitigating & avoiding damage in the first place rather than healing. More of a PvP option but more usable in PvE than the above since Barrier & Dodging are always welcome in PvE content whereas the above requires being constantly Conditioned which doesn’t really happen. That said, Barrier is tiny compared to the 2 Dodges you get every X seconds.

Catalyst Combat
Gains access to Hammer, allowing new skills which are both mid-ranged and melee depending on the Attunement (Fire + Air & Water + Earth respectively).
Don’t love the Hammer choice, but have grown to not hate it. Would’ve preferred a ranged Greatsword like Mesmer.
Gains access to a 5th Profession mechanic: Jade Spheres. Deploys a Jade Sphere which changes depending on the current Attunement, placing down a Combo field that damages & grants Boons to allies. Jade Spheres require 10 Energy (can hold 30 max Energy) which are gained for each instance of hitting an enemy while a Jade Sphere is not out. Each Sphere has a 15s CD. 
It really should not have both constraints as the Energy is there to prevent camping an Attunement and spamming a Sphere, but that was when the CD was 5s. Remove the Energy as it’s tracked by a tiny ass bar at the bottom of the screen and is completely uneven in single target vs. multitarget situations AND not gaining Energy while a Sphere is out is incredibly frustrating.
Sphere itself is kind of ugly. Don’t like mixing magic w/ technology. Especially if it’s green.
Gains access to Augment Utility skills which are self buffs that get enhanced if standing inside its relevant Jade Sphere field.
Gains access to the Catalyst traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specialisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Catalyst Abilities
Jade Spheres

Deploy Jade Sphere - Fire
Ground targeted Fire Combo field that pulses damage for enemies & Might for allies.

As mentioned above, there’s no reason for it to have a big cooldown as well as an incredibly restrictive resource cost which can’t be gained while any Jade Sphere is out. Remove the Energy cost since it’s not supported in the UI whatsoever as per this:

The bar is tiny, there’s no divider to indicate each 10 energy and you just have to look for when it’s full and use 3 in a row. Other than that it’s a dedicated button for both a Combo field & Boons, the former boosting damage via Traits and the latter for support builds.

Deploy Jade Sphere - Water
Ground targeted Water Combo field that pulses damage for enemies & Resolution for allies.

Same notes as the above. Resolution being chosen for Water makes it less locked into healing. It’d be great if that train of thought could be applied to the older Water skills too.

Deploy Jade Sphere - Air
Ground targeted Lightning Combo field that pulses damage for enemies & Fury for allies.

Same notes as the above. Lightning fields are pretty rare so this is pretty handy. Fury for Air fits as its theme is damage via crits.

Deploy Jade Sphere - Earth
Ground targeted Poison Combo field that pulses damage for enemies & Protection for allies.

Same notes as the above. Poison & Smoke are the closest to an Earth field in the game and while Poison is the only actual viable option in terms of theme & balance (giving Eles stealth would be dangerous), there are no Poison related traits in the Earth tree so the combo feels like it’s shoehorned in. Protection makes sense for Earth.

Hammer
Mid-ranged + melee w/ focus on AoE & control. 2H.

Singeing Strike
Single target mid-ranged attack, damages & Burns.

Ele Hammer is unique in that it has both melee & ranged skills in Water + Earth & Fire & Air respectively. This skill does exactly what a Fire auto would, damage + Burn. Could use a bit of AoE but other than that it’s okay.

Surging Flames
Frontal mid-ranged cleave, damages & Burns.

Sends out projectiles that pierce but can only hit an enemy once, meaning there’s no hitbox shenanigans. Mid-range, tick. Damage, tick. Burns, tick.

Flame Wheel & Grand Finale
Summon projectile that spins around you, “damaging” enemies & Burning them. Refreshes duration of all other similar projectiles. Also grants +10% Damage & +10% Condition Damage. Grants access to Grand Finale after a small ICD: send out all elemental projectiles that pierce, damage & act as Combo projectiles. Apply a Condition depending on the element.
Fire: Burning | Water: Vulnerability | Air: Weakness | Earth: Bleeding

Grand Finale is available after all Hammer spinning projectile skills.

Originally acted exactly like a projectile, meaning if you were inside a hitbox that was smaller than the radius it would straight up do no damage. Now acts as a pulsing damage field. The damage has been decreased then increased then decreased again in a matter of months. Who doesn’t love seeing a crit for 6 damage? Damage was nerfed via this skill and not the others to lower the skill floor by removing damage from an effectively passive source, keeping Ele as the higher difficulty class. The only reason it even has damage is because of the stupid Energy mechanic.

Condition = Burning which fits. Passive is damage for power & DoT which fits.

Grand Finale (+ the projectiles to a lesser degree) feel so integral to Catalyst that not using a Hammer just feels off. Tying the mechanic to the weapon instead of having it as the 5th profession mechanic and having Jade Spheres be like Tempest Overloads really limits build variety for Catalyst. If you’re playing Catalyst, you’ll be using a Hammer in 99% of cases. That said, the skill itself is a cool finisher that’s rewarding you for cycling through the Attunements and looks pretty cool when primed w/ the 4 orbs flying around you, even if they do <10 damage each. 

Launched Flame Wheel applies burning which fits too.

Triple Sear
Ground targeted AoE w/ 3 points of damage. Damages & Burns.

Multi section attack which unfortunately can hit a single target multiple times, effectively meaning the damage triples on a large target. Thankfully the variance isn’t as big as the “storm” skills, it’s on a 20s CD so it doesn’t happen too often and the spread between the spots isn’t that big but it really shouldn’t even have the ability to hit multiple times anyway. If it insists on having multiple hits, raise the base damage & make it so hits 2 & 3 only deal a percentage (not 10%).

Molten End
Delayed PBAoE, damages, & Blasts combos. Grants Might & Fury to self if it hits an enemy, increasing per enemy hit. Boons are frontloaded on 1 target.

Everything about this skill makes sense: delayed slam which does big damage around you, Blasts combos & grants offensive Boons to self. Boons themselves are frontloaded so there’s not a huge difference between single target and multitarget (6 stacks vs. 10).

Stream Strike -> Water Rush -> Chilling Crack
Frontal cleave.
Frontal cleave, same damage.
Frontal cleave, most damage & Chills.

Damage originally was different between hit 1 & 2. Could have at least made it slightly increase. Overall an offensive auto for Water; Chill is handy but still doesn’t interact with Ele in any way.

Rain of Blows
Frontal channelled cleave. If hit by all 4 strikes, become Chilled.

Pretty much the same as the above, but instead of being backloaded it’s all-loaded (?). Doesn’t mean much in PvE as all 4 hits will almost always happen unless phasing happens. Melee, cleave, damage, Chilled. As expected for Water.

Icy Coil & Grand Finale
Same as Flame Wheel, but applies Vulnerability & grants -15% Incoming Condition Damage.

Vulnerability is actually useful for Ele compared to Chilled. Reduced Condition Damage helps short ranged Ele survive better much more than increased healing (that was probably going to be only to others anyway).

Crashing Font
Combo Leap for AoE Damage. Heal if hitting an enemy, increased heal if multiple (frontloaded).

Heals for the same amount as the weaker dedicated heal buttons. Does okay damage and is a handy mid-ranged gapcloser but the main reason it’s used is for the Leap since (any) Combos are important for Catalysts due to certain Traits. Good thing it’s also frontloaded to reduce discrepancy between single target and multi target.

Cleansing Typhoon
PBAoE damage & combo Whirl. Cleanse conditions, increased # if multiple (frontloaded).

Same as the above, except instead of a heal it’s a cleanse. Not as frontloaded as the others (2 cleanses vs 5). Still handy, but again mostly for the Whirl.

Wind Slam
Single target mid-ranged damage.

Same as Fire, but trades in the DoT for more direct damage as per Air theme. Same notes apply; could use a tiny AoE at destination.

Hurricane of Pain
Ground targeted channelled AoE for pulsing damage & Vulnerability.

High damaging channelled AoE that also applies Vulnerability, matching Air theme. Since it’s ground targeted + channelled, there’s plenty of counterplay there. Only thing that would make it perfect is if there was a Whirl component on you since you’re rapidly spinning the entire time.

Crescent Wind & Grand Finale
Same as the other projectiles, but applies Weakness & grants +10% Crit Chance.

Weakness is the only other Condition associated with Air apart from Vulnerability which is taken by Water. Chill & Weakness are comparable in that they help you survive a bit better, w/ varying success since Weakness damage reduction is RNG. Crit chance for Air. This along with the damage up from Fire means you want to start your rotation with 1 or the other before moving to Water / Earth.

Wind Storm
Backstep to damage & knockdown enemies in front of you.

Decent amount of CC that can also kind of be used as an escape. It locks onto a target so you’ll have to position yourself carefully to move in a specific way. That said, I’ve been knocked back into the map / underground / stuck in a wall multiple times and am very hesitant to even use it because of this.

Shock Blast
Fire a projectile that damages enemies it passes through. Explodes for more damage, Stun & combo Blast.

A bit of damage and some more CC, but mostly for the combo Blast which works with some Traits. There isn’t much of an animation though so most of the time it doesn’t look like anything is happening other than a tiny pebble even when ignoring the visual vomit on the screen. Air = damage + CC.

Stonestrike
PBAoE damage.

It’s just PBAoE damage. Differs from the Water one which is a frontal cleave but it’s still melee. Could use a bit of Bleeding on it though, Hammer doesn’t really have good damage for DoT builds and that could help (their design philosophy is that if it can do damage it should be able to do it via both ways).

Whirling Stones
Visually spin, channelling PBAoE damage & Bleeding. Also blocks missiles / projectiles.

Yes the spinning is slow but it should still count as a Whirl. Other than that it’s a melee PBAoE damage + Bleed, fitting with Earth. Blocking missiles is a nice cherry on top and helps surviving while melee and not having a dedicated gap close outside of the one in Water.

Rocky Loop & Grand Finale
Same as the other projectiles, but applies Bleeding & grants -15% Incoming Strike Damage.

Earth for Bleeding. Strike damage reduction matching the usual Protection.

Immutable Stone
Channel for 1.5s, Blocking the next attack. If an attack was Blocked, gain Barrier & an Aura based on the current Attunement.

The fact it only blocks a single attack is a bit annoying. Yes there’s a Barrier that’s decently sized (25% of base Ele’s HP if building glass cannon) but it being eaten up by a stray attack from a random mob or being almost useless in a pack of mobs is annoying. Reduce the duration and block the entire time or keep the duration but block for 0.5s after 1st hit. If that’s an issue for PvP, split the balance between modes. Aura is whatever, mostly there for Aura related Traits. There’s some min maxing by swapping Attunements while this is channelling but not for PvE with a more structured rotation.

Ground Pound
Delayed PBAoe Damage, Immobilize & Bleed that also Blasts combos.

Earth version of the Fire slam. Sacrifices offensive Boons & direct damage for Bleeding & some soft CC. Same notes apply; it’s a great feeling slam skill.

Augments

Soothing Water - Healing
Heal & cleanse in pulses. -20% CD if used in Water Sphere.

Sacrifice all burst healing for persistent healing & cleansing that’s not channelled so you can do other things. Very rarely used within a Water Sphere since you can’t really schedule when you’re taking damage in your rotation in PvE, secondary effect more for PvP. No reason why healing was increased in PvP only though. During Beta it only cleansed if used in Water Sphere; Catalyst was a mess then.

Relentless Fire - Utility
5s buff for +10% damage. 10 attacks in 5s are Unblockable (separate buff). +3s if used in Fire Sphere.

Damage buff, more if used in Fire Sphere. Unblockable portion not relevant in PvE. Has a cast time so won’t be able to use it in the channelled abilities, which could be a cool mechanic since a couple of these are just damage buffs.

Shattering Ice - Utility
5s buff for extra AoE damage & Chill on each hit w/ 1s ICD. +3s if used in Water Sphere.

Also a damage buff but in the form of another attack rather than +X damage. Chill is also there but not that relevant in PvE. Sphere bonus is also useful as a CD reduction would mess up the flow in a rotation. Also could stand to be instant cast.

Invigorating Air - Utility
Breaks stun. 5s buff for double Endurance regen & Superspeed. -33% CD if used in Air Sphere.

Risky stun break as there’s nothing stopping you from getting CC’d again. Compared to other stun breaks, not as great but it does have a shorter cooldown. CDR rather than buff duration extension from Sphere interaction puts more weight on the active rather than the buff. Not sure why it got buffed in PvP but not in PvE.

Fortified Earth - Utility
Block attacks for 3s. Gain Barrier at end of channel. -33% CD if used in Earth Sphere.

Basically what I wanted for Hammer Earth 4. Total block for 3s > Barrier so the CDR is worth more than the buff duration extension (don’t think they can even increase Barrier duration). 

Elemental Celerity - Elite
Reset CD of all weapon skills in current Attunement. Gain Boon based on Attunement if used in a Jade Sphere.
Fire: Might | Water: Vigor | Air: Fury | Earth: Protection

Pretty boring Elite and it’s not even that good. It’s a 90s CD just like Weave Self and unlike that Elite, it just lets you use 4 abilities again quicker. Maybe if those abilities were incredibly strong but since the class is balanced around having 20 total abilities (16 non autos), only affecting 25% of the kit isn’t impressive. Would resetting all abilities be busted? Probably. Could at least reduce those ones by a little bit though. Sphere interaction is also pretty crappy since you’re guaranted those Boons in group content. Not worth the slot and honestly makes me wish you could take another Utility skill rather than be forced to use a subpar Elite.

Traits

Depth of Elements
Trait that grants access to Spheres & Augments.

Adding it here because it’s the 1st trait in the tree, etc, etc.

Hardened Auras
Gain a Damage Reduction buff (2%, max 10) when granting self an Aura. Gaining stacks refreshes duration of all stacks.

The Aura or Defensive option of the 3. As the newest spec, you can tell the Traits are set up to be going in a specific direction w/ certain groups in each choice. Not sure why this was changed to be only on Auras given to self as maintaining stacks is pretty simple w/ Elemental Epitome (below). All this does is remove edge cases which shouldn’t matter in PvE since this isn’t taken there & you should split balance between the game modes, even if it’s a functionality change.

Vicious Empowerment
Gain 2x Elemental Empowerment (+1% All Stats each) stacks (max 10) & Might when Disabling or Immobilizing an enemy. Stacks have their own duration.

The Buff or Offensive option. Doesn’t require the enemy to actually be CC’d like Bosses who are immune, just needs the ability to hit. Helps add stacks but not maintain since it doesn’t refresh the duration when gaining stacks and weapons don’t usually have more than 3 ways of applying w/ decently sized CDs. Since it’s All Stats up, it means you deal more damage & are tankier (some stats have a base value of 0 like healing power).

Energized Elements
Gain Energy (2 lol) & Fury when switching Attunements in combat.

Pretty sad option, it’s meant to be the Jade Sphere option. 2 Energy is 2 hits on an enemy when you’re allowed (gross) to gain Energy. With the amount of multi hitting abilities & AoE there are, 2 Energy is laughable. To make things worse, it’s 3 in PvP. Gaining Fury on Attunement swap is also something that used to exist in the Arcane trait line, making it seem like this was shoehorned in since they couldn’t think of a 3rd Jade Sphere related trait. The other 2 are related to the Boons given by the Spheres (adding another one and adding duration). Not much else you can do with Boons so this one could focus on the combo Field aspect of it instead, increasing duration of the fields or adding pulsing Boons to the spheres in addition to the base Boon application on use, anything but Energy which should be scrapped. Obviously rename it in that case since it won’t really have anything to do with energising.

Elemental Empowerment
Gain 3x Elemental Empowerment stacks while in combat. 15s duration, 15s refresh time. 10 max stacks.

Pretty much means you always have 3 stacks while in combat. The in combat thing only really matters in PvP.

Empowering Auras
10s +3% Damage stacks when granting self an Aura, max 15%. Duration refreshed upon stack applications.

The Aura or Offensive option, switching from the previous choice. Used to also be whenever anyone gave you an aura. Can get a 100% uptime via Elemental Epitome. Other than that, Aura = damage, nothing else to really say. Just means more combos are wanted.

Evasive Empowerment
Gain 2x Elemental Empowerment & Vigor while Evading an attack. 1s ICD.

The Buff or “Defensive” / PvP option. Doesn’t inherently make you tankier but rewards you for using active mitigation via dodging. There’s some synergy with the Dagger + Staff skills with the “Evade” tag on them. ICD is there for the cases where you dodge multiple attacks in a row, though is that necessarily needed? Not much use in PvE, there are easier ways to gain stacks and a big opportunity cost too.

Spectacular Sphere
Jade Spheres grant another Boon on use.
Fire: More Might | Water: Vigor | Air: Quickness | Earth: Aegis

The Trait that allows Catalyst to be a Support DPS option. Chosen just for the Quickness Boon, 1 of the 2 that caused so many balance issues (there was a timeframe where every group had a Chronomancer because they were the only ones who could apply any of those Boons). Previously had a -10% damage dealt modifier which was absolutely disgusting considering you’re already missing out on the +15% from Empowering Auras. Pretty sure it’s 1 of only 2 Traits that have a damage down modifier (the other is a Thief one which gives Pistols piercing at a damage reduction cost. It is also competing with an actual damage up Trait too). The other Boons range from nice to have (Might & Vigor) to useful in certain situations (Aegis).

Elemental Epitome
Gain an Aura based on current Attunement when you combo. Gain Elemental Empowerment whenever you gain an Aura. 10s ICD per Attunement.
Fire: Fire Aura | Water: Frost Aura | Air: Shocking Aura | Earth: Magnetic Aura

The Trait that allows you to keep generating stacks quickly. Since the ICD is per Attunement, you’re able to gain stacks constantly and then loop back again, playing into the flow aspect that’s encouraged with Hammer 3. Also niche interactions with Aura skills from other weapons / some Leap combos. Makes combos more useful than a small debuff thrown out randomly, etc.

Staunch Auras
Gain Stability when granting self an Aura.

The Aura or “Defensive” option. Quotation marks since it doesn’t directly stop you from dying, only CC’d. Can’t add Protection since there’s an Earth trait for it. Resolution is free but it’s somewhat specific to DoT damage which isn’t as common as direct damage. Possibly a Barrier as well as Stability for survivability. 

Empowered Empowerment
While at max stacks of Elemental Empowerment (10), double its effectiveness (+10% -> +20% All Stats).

The Buff or technically Offensive option. Effect itself is pretty boring, but rewarding maintaining 10 stacks adds more weight on the stacks. Put “technically Offensive” option there since a pure support / healing Catalyst doesn’t work & if you’re going Support DPS, you’ll want the below option anyway, leaving this as the “offensive” option.

Sphere Specialist
Boons applied from your Jade Sphere have 2x the duration (applied before Boon Duration).

The Sphere or Support option. It’s also pretty boring, but it makes you need less Boon Duration to be able to keep Boons up which means you get to spend more of your gear stats on offensive ones (or defensive for whatever reason).

Guardian
Guardian Combat
Like the archetype; it’s basically Paladin without the religion.
Standard 2 weapon skill bars, swapping in combat has a cooldown.
Profession Mechanics are Virtues, passives that can be sacrificed for a more powerful active.
Virtue of Justice: Burn every few attacks. Activate to make the next attack for you & allies Burn.
Virtue of Resolve: passively heal self. Activate to cleanse self and PBAoE heal.
Virtue of Courage: gain Aegis, refreshing every 40s. Activate to grant PBAoE Aegis.
Lowest HP in the game (tied with Elementalist & Thief) but highest base armour (tied with Warrior & Revenant). Also has a decent amount of active defensive skills, focusing on proactive tankiness rather than face tanking.
Low HP isn’t as big of a problem on Guardian compared to Ele but the difference still feels bad (11k vs 19k between lowest & highest).
It’s especially annoying on higher ping where you have less time to react.
Base Guardian focuses more on defensive / protective skills for self & allies, fitting with the theme & name really.
Guardian skills have a lot of light fields which generally result in cleansing effects. These are presented in the form of Symbols which are pulsing ground AoEs that benefit allies and hinder enemies.
Also has access to Wards which prevent enemies from passing over them.
Guardian Abilities
Virtues

Virtue of Justice
Passive: Burn enemies every 5 attacks.
Active: PBAoE buff that makes the next attack Burn for longer than the passive.

Offensive Virtue. Use the active during “Burn” phases, otherwise just keep the passive rolling.

Virtue of Resolve
Passive: Regen HP.
Active: PBAoE heal & self cleanse.

Healing Virtue. Passively healing is pretty low & burst healing is a lot more valuable so it’s effectively a second weaker heal w/ some condition cleansing for self. Use it when you’re low.

Virtue of Courage
Passive: Infinite duration Aegis to self every 40s.
Active: PBAoE Aegis.

Defensive Virtue. Use it when you think you’re able to be hit by something big, which is a bit annoying since it can be eaten up by random attacks but still handy in those cases.

Greatsword
High damage & slow attacks w/ cleave. 2H.

Strike -> Vengeful Strike -> Wrathful Strike
Frontal cleave.
Frontal cleave, more damage.
Frontal cleave, most damage & grant PBAoE Might per enemy hit.

Pretty simple auto chain for a melee weapon. Little bit of Might but it only lasts 5s so it can’t really be used to properly maintain / add stacks. It does have the same range as a 1H sword though, I think it’d make more sense if it was slightly longer ranged given the size difference between the weapons generally.

Whirling Wrath
Combo Whirl for PBAoE ticking damage. Also sends out projectiles that damage.

Optimal use is to use the skill while inside the enemy hitbox which is a no no in by book. Only way to fix this is to either get rid of the projectiles (which I assume were added to make it a more unique greatsword spin attack) or make them home in on the targeted enemy rather than fire out randomly. Another option is to split the damage so the majority of it is on the whirling blade, right now it’s 50/50. Combo Whirl makes sense, even if it’s slower than Ele’s Hammer Air 2 which doesn’t have it.

Leap of Faith
Combo Leap for PBAoE damage & Blind + healing for each enemy hit.

Gap closer which can be used can be used for damage, survivability (heal + Blind) or mobility. There’s some drawback if you use it for damage and end up needing the gap closer while it’s recharging, etc. Other than that it’s your usual gap closer with extra utility.

Symbol of Resolution
PBAoE Light Combo field, damaging enemies & pulsing Resolution for allies.

PBAoE damage & Resolution. If the Resolution buff seems out of place it’s because it used to be called Symbol of Wrath and gave Retaliation (thorns). Otherwise it’s just more melee damage that interacts with some Traits for more damage. Cleansing utility from Light field is also there.

Binding Blade -> Pull
Combo Whirl & send out projectiles to nearby enemies that damage & apply a unique DoT. Allows the use of Pull if at least 1 target is hit, surprisingly pulling enemies in and consuming the DoT damage.

Optimal single target damage use is to also use it while inside the enemy hitbox + have other enemies around. Fortunately most of the damage is via the DoT so it’s less reliant on the initial hit hitting multiple times and the Dot doesn’t stack with itself so there’s no multitarget shenanigans. DoT being consumed means you’ll have to time the CC or sacrifice the damage for the CC, which is more prevalent in PvE since the window for good use of CC is less than compared to PvP. Also acts as a Combo Whirl, which makes me realise that Ele weapons just suck in that department, having 1 or 2 Combo related skills while Guardian gets all 4. Yes there are 4 Attunements but cycling just for a combo isn’t generally worth it.

Hammer
Melee w/ focus on AoE & control. 2H.



Hammer Swing -> Hammer Bash -> Symbol of Protection
Frontal cleave.
Frontal cleave, same damage.
AoE Light Combo field between self & target, damaging enemies & pulsing Protection for allies.

The 2nd attack could use an extra effect or slightly more damage, just to make it differentiate from the 1st and feel like the combo is getting stronger. The whole combo takes 2.4s and the field lasts a base 2s, meaning it’s possible to get 100% uptime if Quickness is applied making it a strong defensive weapon option. It’s the only Symbol that can do that due to not technically having a cooldown, but requires constant auto attacking. The field does get placed in front of you so that might cause issues sometimes depending on the hitbox of the enemy.

Mighty Blow
Leap (not combo) forward & PBAoE damage & Blast combos. Teleport to an enemy if they have the Mighty Blow debuff.

AoE Damage & Blast. There’s a small leap but it doesn’t count as a Combo Leap for some reason, probably because the technology for 2 Combo using components on a single skill. Can sort of be used as a gap closer, though the leap is short and the Banish teleport requires you hitting it w/ a melee skill.

Zealot’s Embrace
Fire a projectile that damages & Immobilizes enemies. Gain Barrier for each enemy hit, Barrier amount frontloaded on 1st target.

Some CC & survivability to help a melee catch up & live respectively. Sets up the other Hammer abilities that require being in melee range. Doesn’t count as a Projectile for combo purposes, which wouldn’t be too crazy if it had it.

Banish
Single target damage & Knockback. Applies a debuff which will cause Mighty Blow to blink to the target.

Normally I’d say something about it being single target but due to the teleport mechanic w/ Mighty Blow, I’d have to agree w/ it being single target otherwise it might break something when it tries to teleport to multiple debuffed targets. It’s actually the hardest hitting Hammer ability so in PvE, there’s a choice between saving it for CC or using it for damage (only 15s CD so not too bad of a choice).

Ring of Warding
Places a Light Combo field ring that knocks back enemies that try to cross it.

Very easy to cancel with movement input; should also only be cancellable with dodges, sheathing or pressing Esc (and obviously being CC’d or downed). It’s purely a PvP skill though as mobs don’t try to escape and it’s a small circle. If it also provided some survivability for allies, this could be a useful skill but as of right now it’s at best just a combo field that can sometimes CC enemies if they try moving.

Staff
Support, AoE & control. 2H.

Bolt of Wrath -> Searing Light -> Seeking Judgement
Single target ranged damage.
Ranged projectile, explodes for more AoE damage.
Ranged projectile, explodes for the most AoE damage.

Used to be a weaker frontal cleave of damage but was changed 6 years into game life. Changed to be ranged and deal more damage. Projectiles become progressively slower meaning the back loaded high damage attack can be more easily dodged but that’s more of a PvP thing to keep a track of. Ranged = safer & gives base Guardian a 2nd ranged weapon, the more support oriented Staff.

Holy Strike
Ground targeted AoE that pulses healing for allies & nukes enemies at the end, Blasting combos.

Used to be a forwarding moving projectile that damages enemies & heals allies it touches. It had an option to detonate for more damage, healing & a Light aura (Resolution when hit on 1s ICD & -10% Condition Damage received) at the cost of a much higher cooldown (3x - 4x depending on which patch). Damage was okay but the heal was negligible and took too long. Reworked to be modernised with its effects packed together which better suits an action game. Also who doesn’t like Blasts?

Symbol of Swiftness
Ground targeted AoE Light combo field that pulses damage & Swiftness for allies.

Same notes as the other Symbol skills. Swiftness isn’t as important as the others due to how common it is.

Empower
Backloaded channelled PBAoE heal that also pulses Might.

Channelled heal which means it’s pretty easy to cancel. Its heal is also back loaded meaning there’s some risk involved if going for max value. Heal is decent but used to maintain Might, meaning there’s a choice presented on whether to keep buffing or save for the healing.

Line of Warding
Creates a Ward in the shape of a line, ground targeted. Acts as a Light Combo field.

Ground targeted line version of Ring of Warding. Same notes apply about it possibly having more of a use in PvE, since it’s effectively just a Light Combo field. If a boss needs to be CC’d, it’s usually not moving to trigger the knockback.

Mace
Support based melee. Main hand only.

True Strike -> Pure Strike -> Faithful Strike
Frontal cleave.
Frontal cleave, more damage.
Frontal cleave, most damage & PBAoE heal.

Same as the other Guardian auto combos, but also applies a heal. Most support / healing oriented auto chain that Guardian has, take it if defence is needed (PvP).

Symbol of Faith
PBAoE Light Combo field, damaging enemies & pulsing Regen for allies. Very long cast time.

For some reason this has the longest cast time out of all the Symbol skills at 1.25s vs mostly 0.5s (Hammer takes 1s but that makes sense since it’s meant to be slow). It would make sense if it provided immediate healing but it pulses Regen, a HoT (that lasts 1s so it’s just 1 tick). No reason for why it should have that long of a cast time. Other than that it’s more healing but this time in Boon form rather than a direct heal. Same notes about Symbols apply.

Protector’s Strike
PBAoE zone that follows you. Block only the next attack on self or allies in the zone, dealing PBAoE damage & granting PBAoE Protection & Aegis. Also fully charges Virtue of Justice.

Definitely feels more of a PvP ability since not only does it block 1 attack, it blocks 1 attack aimed at anyone near the player so it can be eaten by pretty much anything. Like other “block next attack” skills, the duration should either be lowered so it can block all attacks during that time or keep the duration but block for Xs after the 1st hit. Boons are defensive, matching the mace design w/ some extra damage from the Virtue of Justice passive charging. Possibly could use Resolution as well since that’s associated with Light fields / Guardian; might be overloading skill then.

Scepter
Mid-ranged damage & control. Main hand only.

Orb of Wrath
Single target ranged damage, slow moving.

It’s just single target ranged damage. It being slow doesn’t matter in PvE really.

Symbol of Punishment
Ground targeted AoE Light combo field that pulses damage & Might for allies. Also randomly deals extra damage within the field.

Matches the other Symbol skills except for the extra random damage. Why this can’t be merged with the damage from the Symbol to standardise the damage I don’t know, other than for the ~uniqueness~.

Chains of Light
Single target damage, Immobilize & Vulnerability.

Ranged targeted CC. Not useful in PvE at all since enemies are either CC immune or already capped at Vulnerability.

Sword
Short ranged & versatile (offensive, defensive, mobility). Main hand only.

Sword of Wrath -> Sword Arc -> Sword Wave
Frontal cleave.
Frontal cleave, more damage.
Frontal cleave, most damage. Damage split into 3 forks which are individual hits for Virtue of Justice stack purposes. Can technically be hit by less than 3.

Same notes about melee combos apply. 3rd attack is the most interesting in that it’s specifically split into 3 to help charge the Virtue of Justice stacks faster as opposed to just a big singular hit. 

Symbol of Blades
Blink to an enemy, damaging & Blinding. Drop a Light Combo field that damages & pulses Fury for allies.

Used to not drop a Symbol at all. Choice between keeping it as a blink for mobility or using it for damage. 1 of 3 Symbols that grant an offensive Boon, water combat excluded. Not useful for DoT builds though as there are no DoTs in any base main hand weapon other than the passive Virtue of Justice, rectified later by a spec.

Zealot’s Defense
Channel that blocks ranged attacks while firing projectiles (non combo) that deal damage.

Same note about sacrificing a block for damage or vice versa. Since it’s a channel it’s also very easy to cancel in an action combat game especially since it’s a 3s channel. Needs an option to not let movement input interrupt channels.

Focus
Defensive & Utility oriented. Off-hand only.

Ray of Judgement
Single target damage that only ticks if the 1st tick hits.

Doesn’t fit the Defense / Utility quote at all. Used to fire a projectile that bounced between allies & enemies, applying Regen & cleansing + damaging & Blinding respectively. Could’ve kept the Blind or add pulsing Regen around the enemy if hit, something to keep the Focus design going. That said, the damage is pretty good. Probably designed this way to differentiate itself from Shield.

Shield of Wrath
Blast combos & block the next 3 attacks on self. If it blocks less than 3 attacks, explode for PBAoE damage. No cast time so it can be used while CC’d.

Requiring the blocks not to be used for damage makes it somewhat awkward. Suppose there is some risk vs. reward involved in that you need to sacrifice some defence in order to do some damage. Blast is handy but requires relying on others for useful fields since Light fields only cleanse which isn’t always needed. Damage isn’t too high & the cooldown is pretty high so missing out on the damage isn’t too bad but could make it so rather than doing no damage it does less if the shield is broken or change it to heal instead since if you’re getting pummelled you probably want a heal.

Shield
Defence oriented. Off-hand only, also increases Defense stat.

Shield of Judgement
Frontal cone, damages enemies & granting Protection & Aegis to allies.

On demand mitigation via DR & Block. Helps survivability tremendously & while ranged it’s pretty short so some risk involved.

Shield of Absorption
PBAoE zone that knocks back enemies & follows you. Absorbs all projectiles & acts as a Light Combo field. Can be detonated for PBAoE healing.

Either use as CC, defence against projectiles which is a bit more niche or healing. Can be used for all 3 but having all 3 happen at the same time is more of a PvP thing.

Torch
DoT related. Off-hand only.


Zealot’s Flame & Zealot’s Fire
Grant Zealot’s Flame buff, PBAoE pulsing Burning. Incorrect tooltip saying final pulse applies additional Burning. It doesn't.
Allows use of Zealot’s Fire: single target ranged damage & Burning.

Ignoring the false advertisement, this skill is all about Burning. It’s the only DoT related base weapon for Guardian and it’s off-hand only too. There’s a Trait that grants Zealot’s Flame when you crit and it’s always taken on DoT builds because Zealot’s Fire has no cooldown, meaning crit proc = free damage & Burning. Skills themselves are just PBAoE Burning & single target ranged damage & Burning, nothing too interesting. Excitement is all from the Trait procs.

Cleansing Flame
Channelled frontal AoE that damages enemies & cleanses conditions from allies (not self). Final tick applies Burning.

Damage & cleanses pulse 10(!) times making it very powerful. Follows targeted enemy so make sure to position properly. A bit annoying that the cleanse doesn’t affect yourself but I suppose that’s because of PvP. Decent damage & very good Burning, a choice to be made between damage & cleansing but since cleansing is pretty niche, go with the damage.

Healing

“Receive the Light!” - Shout
Heal self then channel frontal pulsing healing.

Party healing option, sacrificing self healing for party healing. Risky since it’s a channel & it’s somewhat short ranged.

Litany of Wrath - Meditation
Heal self a little & grant self buff that heals you for 33% of damage dealt.

If you have nothing to attack, it heals for almost nothing. If you do have a target, you’re practically unkillable for 6s assuming you don’t get 1 shot.

Shelter - No Tag
Block for 2s & heal at the end.

Sacrifice healing for a 2s block. Take if you need the block but better off face tanking with the super healing from Litany of Wrath. The block is far more niche. It having no tag & hence interaction with any skill specific traits makes it a little weak. Could possibly edit it to be a Consecration (beneficial AoEs) and make it leave a healing field for the Guardian after the cast or something; don’t make it a party heal or it will overlap with the shout.

Signet of Resolve - Signet
Passive: Remove a condition from self every 5s.
Active: Burst heal & remove 2 conditions.

Strongest heal if there is no target & is the Condition cleansing option. Take if you really need cleansing, otherwise Litany of Wrath if you’re a DPS or “Receive the Light” if you’re a healer.

Utility
Choose 3.


Hallowed Ground - Consecration
Ground targeted Fire Combo field that pulses Stability & Resolution for allies.

Big defensive cooldown against CC, but needs to be used before you get CC’d since it doesn’t break stun by itself. Can also be used for a Fire field or help maintaining Resolution but there are better ways for both; more like a top up for those. 45s is a very large cooldown but it matches the effect of a party wide CC immunity. Only issue is that there are only 3 slots to choose for Utilities.

Purging Flames - Consecration
Ground targeted Fire Combo field that damages & Burns enemies while cleansing allies.

Handy cleansing utility but the damage & Burning is the reason why it’s taken. It has a relatively low cooldown, and with Condition Duration maxed out it has decent uptime too. Plus a Fire field which is always handy for Might & more Burning. Cleansing is mostly incidental and there are better dedicated ways to cleanse.

Sanctuary - Consecration
Ground targeted Light combo field that heals allies & Blocks missiles. Blocks enemies from coming in & pulses a knockback on enemies already inside.

Very long cooldown for another very defensive skill. An emergency button as it blocks most ranged attacks & knocks back melee enemies. However due to the limited slots, how rare emergency situations should happen & the large cooldown, this skill is primarily used for the huge CC if placed inside an enemy’s hitbox since it knocks back 5 times. Probably sees more use in PvP where the healing & blocking is more important. Light field is somewhat nice too.

Wall of Reflection - Consecration
Ground targeted Light combo line field that reflects projectiles.

Think Yasuo W but it reflects instead of blocks. Much more reasonable anti-projectile skill since it’s only a 25s CD. That said, it’s still very niche and w/ the limited skill slots, it’s not always taken. There’s also a Light field but it’s very narrow and you probably don’t want to accidentally walk in front of something that’s meant to be protecting you.

Contemplation of Purity - Meditation
Breaks stun. Convert all Conditions on self into Boons.

Very niche skill. For a stun break it’s pretty bad since nothing prevents you from being CC’d again. Fear & Taunt would convert into Stability but they’re removed by the stun break. For a Condition cleanse it’s pretty bad because of the 40s CD, leaving you out of a skill for 40s. If it also healed you per Condition cleansed it would make it a better defensive skill option.

Judge’s Intervention - Meditation
Breaks stun. Blink to target, PBAoE damage & Burning. No cast time.

Offensive gap closer. Stun break on a mobility skill is nice, wish all mobility skills had it (cough Lightning Flash). There’s some damage & Burning too but the main use is the blink. It’s instant cast too so you can do some cool stuff with channelled skills. That said, it’s mostly a PvP skill as gap closers aren’t usually needed in PvE and if they are you have permanent Swiftness & occasionally other classes to group port.

Merciful Intervention - Meditation
Blink to ally in ground targeted area, healing & partially reviving. If there are no allies in the targeted area, it doesn’t blink.

Healer gap closer, sort of. Requires an ally to be in the area otherwise it’s just a PBAoE heal + partial revive; makes the skill more reliant on ally positioning. Doesn’t break stun either so it seems like the skill is just to jump start reviving an ally or as a kind of restrictive gap closer. Not really a difficult choice on when to use it in PvE since gap closers aren’t really needed w/ the above mentioned Swiftness + group port.

Smite Condition - Meditation
Cleanse Conditions & PBAoE damage. More damage if any Conditions are cleansed.

Another niche skill. It only cleanses 2 in PvE (3 in PvP for some reason. Raise it in PvE) and does okay damage, and that’s pretty much it. 2 cleanses isn’t that much and the damage isn’t really worth warranting taking it as a skill, especially with a 20s and no charges. Adding some Burning on the cleansed conditional would make it better and fits thematically. Even just adding 1 charge would make it a lot better.

“Hold the Line!” - Shout
PBAoE Protection & Regen.

Defensive shout, take it if you need Protection & Regen. Has decent (50%) uptime with max Boon duration, which is pretty overkill since a bunch of other skills & traits give Protection without having to take up another slot whilst also providing other effects.

“Advance!” - Shout
PBAoE Swiftness & Aegis. 2 charges.

Versatile shout, mostly for the on-demand Aegis. 2 charges makes it even more versatile, though in PvE it’s going to be saved for the on-demand Aegis. Especially since Swiftness is not a rare Boon.

“Save Yourselves!” - Shout
Breaks stun. Draw all Conditions from nearby allies to self. Grant self Fury, Might, Protection, Regen, Resolution, Swiftness, Vigor & Resistance.

A very niche shout. Can be comboed w/ Contemplation of Purity to eat up everyone’s Conditions & cleanse them in PvP but that’s pretty much the only use. No situation in PvE calls for that combo and w/o the cleanse, it’s pretty likely it will get you killed even w/ the defensive Boons or it didn’t do enough to warrant taking it. It has a huge CD too w/ 50s.

“Stand Your Ground!” - Shout
Breaks stun. PBAoE Resolution & Stability.

Anti-CC shout. Almost as strong as Hallowed Ground but with the lower cooldown it’s more versatile. Also provides Resolution but that’s incidental, too.

Bane Signet - Signet
Passive: Gain Power.
Active: Single target damage & Knockdown.

Power DPS signet. Choice to sacrifice (a lot of) damage for CC. The sacrifice is pretty big so it makes the choice less interesting in that you’re almost never encouraged to use the active. If the active damage was better or also granted offensive Boons to help offset the damage loss it would be a better Signet design. Could also reduce the Power gained but then what would be the point of taking it in the first place?

Signet of Judgement - Signet
Passive: -10% Incoming Damage & Condition Damage.
Active: Breaks stun & PBAoE Resolution for allies & Burning for enemies.

Defensive signet. Sacrifice some tankiness for a stun break, DoT tankiness & Burning? Back when Retaliation was in the game, it made sense since it discouraged enemies from hitting you (at least in PvP, in PvE they just get punished). Before that was changed, the Burning used to be Weakness, further building upon that idea of a defensive Signet that protected the user through defensive effects. Adding Protection upon activation would help it achieve its original effects.

Signet of Mercy - Signet
Passive: Gain Concentration.
Active: Ground targeted revive of 1 ally w/ cast time.

A ranged res. Compared to the Ele one it’s nowhere near as versatile but it still gets the job done. Does come with sacrificing Boon Duration for a reasonably long time (50s) but in exchange for a pretty powerful effect. That said it’s rarely needed in PvE since you’re usually able to just walk up to them and res them. In PvP, Boon Duration is less needed so it’s almost exclusively wanted for the active.

Signet of Wrath - Signet
Passive: Gain Condition Damage.
Active: Single target damage & Immobilize.

Condition DPS signet. Choice to sacrifice DPS for a pretty weak CC, not sure why anyone would ever press this button outside of PvP or accidentally pressing it. For Condition builds it would be 12s of Immobilize but the timeframe to CC bosses is much lower than that.

Bow of Truth - Spirit Weapon
Ground targeted healing & Light Combo field. 2 charges.

Healing option. The healing is somewhat delayed in the animation so need to keep that in mind. If the skill was more responsive it’d be better, obviously. But this seems to be a result of it being changed from a pet skill to a temporary pet skill. Charges are great as always for versatility & the Light field is handy for cleansing.

Hammer of Wisdom - Spirit Weapon
Ground targeted damage & Knockdown + Blast Combo. 2 charges.

CC option. Also somewhat delayed so need to keep that in mind, but less so for PvE since there’s a window for CC breaks on bosses. Also has a Blast component but no one is going to sacrifice CC for that. Charges again make it versatile.

Shield of the Avenger - Spirit Weapon
Ground targeted AoE (not combo field) that Blocks missiles then damages & Weakens enemies. 3 charges.

Ranged version of Sanctuary without the CC. Weird how it’s not a Light combo field though. Does a little bit of damage & Weakens but that’s more of a PvP thing. 3 charges makes it very handy but its effect is pretty niche in PvE.

Sword of Justice - Spirit Weapon
Ground targeted AoE damage, Vulnerability & Cripple. 3 charges.

DPS option. Should be a Whirl considering the animation. Does damage & applies Vulnerability, all a DPS needs (+ Cripple). Charges make it very versatile but you’re probably just going to dump it during burst windows.

Elite

“Feel My Wrath!” - Shout
PBAoE Fury & Quickness. Quickness duration from this skill on self doubled.

Offensive option, sort of. Provides offensive buffs, not much else to say. The 2nd line is just there to force certain builds to put more Boon Duration or take more utility skills, keeping the personal DPS in check.

Renewed Focus - Meditation
Channel for 3s, becoming Invulnerable & recharging all 3 Virtues.

Defensive option. Gives 3s of immunity which can be very helpful in some mechanics, though it only affects you so not much use if everyone else is dead. More of a PvP skill. Recharging Virtues is somewhat useful, moreso on Firebrands who gain abilities via the Virtues.

Signet of Courage - Signet
Passive: PBAoE heal every 3s.
Active: Channel pulsing healing & Protection, Resolution & Stability. Back loaded heal at the end of the channel.

Healing option. Passive heal is pretty weak, especially since it’s pulsing so there’s no real choice between keeping or using the active. Burst heals are much more valuable & it giving all 3 defensive Boons makes it effective in all situations.

Traits
Non-coloured Traits are auto picked if the tree is chosen. Coloured Traits are a choice of 1. Can only pick 3 trees.

Zeal - Strike Damage & Symbols

Zealot’s Resolution
Cast Lesser Symbol of Resolution when hit <= 75%. 30s ICD.
Lesser Symbol of Resolution: same as Symbol of Resolution but less damage & higher (?) Resolution duration.

Pretty cool way of having an auto defensive buff when taking some damage while incorporating it w/ one of the unique mechanics of the class. It doing less damage compared to the regular Symbol makes sense, but giving a higher duration for the Boon is a little weird.

Wrathful Spirit
Aegis grants Resolution & Fury when it ends.

Little bit of offensive & defensive Boons for when you block an attack w/ Aegis (or it expires). There aren’t many ways to apply Aegis though, so it’s not that useful in keeping those Boons up. It’s basically just a little bit extra, nothing to play around. Just some stats.

Fiery Wrath
+7% Strike Damage against Burning enemies.

With how abundant Burning is even just within Guardian, let alone in a group, this is just a +7% Strike Damage buff. Conditional makes sense, it’s not something random like Poisoned.

Zealous Scepter
Gain Might when Virtue of Justice triggers, doubled when wielding a Scepter.

Unlike other weapon specific traits, this one doesn’t affect the cooldown of Scepter skills. All it does is add a little bit of Might which you can get from other methods like skills or openworld buffs like Jade Tech Offensive Overcharge. Otherwise in group content, the extra Might won’t be needed since it’s covered by support. Also require your Virtue of Justice passive to trigger to even get any effect. If it gave group Might then this “might” be a viable choice.

Symbolic Exposure
Symbols inflict Vulnerability. +5% Strike Damage against Vulnerable enemies.

Improves Symbols by making them debuff enemies & makes Vulnerability more effective for you. The stronger Symbols are, the more you’re inclined to use them before your other damaging skills, like a damage cooldown.

Furious Focus
While having Fury, attacks apply Vulnerability. 1s ICD.

Not really needed since Vulnerability is a very common Condition. ICD is there to prevent someone being blasted with debuffs I guess but put that in PvP since it’s only really a problem there. Or at least lower it. Fury conditional is not really an issue most of the time.

Zealous Blade
Gain Power, doubled w/ Greatsword. -20% Greatsword skills CD.

Power DPS option. What a weapon specific trait should look like. More damage stat & CDR = more DPS = more fun.

Kindred Zeal
Gain Condition Damage based on 10% Power.

Condition Damage option. A bit boring but not every trait needs to completely change an ability's functionality to get the job done.

Symbolic Power
Symbols deal +30% Strike Damage.

Symbols are even stronger. Same note about Symbols becoming a pseudo damage cooldown.

Eternal Armory
Spirit Weapons gain 1 charge, -20% CD & Burns on 1st hit (if it damages).

Makes Spirit Weapons a lot better. Extra charge is nice, recharging quicker is always great & the Burn is handy. This does encourage you to use up all 3 Utility slots on Spirit Weapons for max value, but since they all do different things you’ll end up with a “jack of all trades master of not really doing anything specific well” kind of build. 

Shattered Aegis
Whenever an Aegis you apply is consumed (consumed when blocking an attack), it deals PBAoE non-crit damage.

Bit of extra damage whenever any Aegis from you is consumed. Damage is small (can’t crit) and the area isn’t too big. Again, Aegis isn’t that common enough for a build to be built around it. If it included Blocks / Reflects it might be a bit more interesting as there’d be more opportunities for this to proc.

Symbolic Avenger
+2% Strike Damage whenever an enemy is hit by your Symbols, max 10%.

Makes Symbols even stronger. Pretty much as strong as Symbols are going to get; a bonafide damage cooldown now. Gives stacks to maintain, encouraging use of weapons that have a Symbol (they all do, main hand anyway).
Radiance - Burning & Virtue of Justice

Justice is Blind
Gain Light Aura & PBAoE Blind when activating Virtue of Justice.

Little bit of defensive utility when using the fire themed mechanic, fitting.

Inner Fire
Gain 8s Fury when hitting an enemy w/ >3 Burning stacks. 10s ICD.

Could be pretty useful in solo or PvP but since Fury is covered by other classes it’s not that useful compared to Fiery Wrath (above) which is a flat damage bonus.

Right-Hand Strength
Gain Precision. Gain Power w/ a One-Handed Weapon in main hand.

Bit of extra crit chance & Power if using a 1H weapon. The damage boost is pretty small and compared to Healer’s Resolution + Righteous Instincts, it’s overall less damage.

Healer’s Resolution
Gain 8s Resolution when using a Healing skill. 20s ICD.

Helps with Resolution uptime. ICD is only there because of Firebrand Mantra heal. Resolution uptime is important because if you’re going down this tree, you’re going for Righteous Instincts which increases damage & massively increases your crit chance, meaning less gear power budget spent on crit chance and more on Power / crit damage which is an overall damage boost. Placing it on the healing skill also adds a factor of risk vs. reward too, don’t want to be caught in need of healing without a heal. Less worrisome in group content, usually.

Renewed Justice
Reset cooldown for Virtue of Justice when killing an enemy. 1s ICD.

More buttons to press for more damage = more for the player to do, more fun. ICD is just there for Willbender which turns Virtue of Justice into a dash.

Wrath of Justice
Hitting an enemy w/ the active effect of Virtue of Justice casts Lesser Signet of Wrath: damage & Immobilize the target. 25s ICD.

An additional 3s root. Sneaky way of adding an extra Utility skill in w/ the 3 slot limit but its effects are pretty weak overall since it’s just the passive. Probably better in PvP.

Radiant Fire
Gain Zealot’s Flame when critting, giving you PBAoE Burning & allowing use of Zealot’s Fire if a Torch is equipped (10s ICD). Burning you inflict has +20% duration. -20% Torch skills CD.

Condi damage option & a great weapon specific trait. Not only does it recharge Torch skills faster (cough Scepter), it adds a proc to play around using the existing Torch skill; something else to keep track of. 

Retribution
+10% Strike Damage while having Resolution.

Power DPS option, putting more importance on Resolution as it’s now also increasing your damage dealt.

Radiant Power
+10% Crit Chance against Burning enemies. Gain Ferocity.

More crit chance against most enemies as they should always be Burning vs. you, especially in a group. Extra Ferocity to go with the crit chance.

Amplified Wrath
Burning you inflict deals +10% damage. +20% Burning duration from passive of Virtue of Justice.

Condi damage option. Flat damage boost is nice. Extra Burning duration is helpful but not as much as you think as a lot of Burning for Guardian comes from other skills, not just Virtue of Justice.

Perfect Inscriptions
-20% Signets CD, have improved passives & keep passives while recharging.
Resolve: Cleansing interval 5s -> 4s.
Bane: Power 180 -> 216.
Judgement: Damage Reduction 10% -> 12%.
Wrath: Condition Damage 180 -> 216.
Mercy: Concentration 120 -> 150.
Courage: Passive Healing +20%

Previously gave the passive effects to allies while recharging, making it a pseudo party buff. Changed when they did a pass and got rid of unique buffs to prevent making specific classes mandatory, but that leaves this trait feeling kind of meh compared to the other 2 options. If you’re running 5 Signets this could be useful. Even then the other 2 options are better offensively.

Righteous Instincts
Resolution grants +25% Crit Chance & grants Might every 1s.

Makes Resolution even more important. As mentioned before, frees up stat power budget from crit chance and more into damage or crit damage. Was 50% before which is a pretty big nerf, but still useful. Also a bit of Might but again, not that useful in group content.
Valor - Blocking, Aegis & Virtue of Courage

Valorous Defense
Gain 5s Aegis when hit <= 50%. 30s ICD.

Like other “get X when hit below Y” traits, it helps you survive.

Strength of the Fallen
Cleanse a condition every 10s. HP degenerates 33% slower while downed.

Not sure why anyone would take this. There are way better Condition cleansing methods & the downed portion shouldn’t ever be useful since you’re aiming to not be downed, especially in the defensive tree; the “Fallen” theme doesn’t really fit.

Smiter’s Boon
Cast Lesser Smite Condition when using a Healing skill. 16s ICD
Lesser Smite Condition: cleanse 2 conditions & PBAoE damage. More damage if a Condition is cleansed.

Also adds a 4th Utility skill without a 4th Utility slot. Lets you cleanse a couple Conditions when healing without choosing the Condition cleansing heal, freeing up your build a little. Otherwise not too interesting. 

Focus Mastery
Focus skills grant Protection & -20% CD.

Compared to the Torch one it’s a little boring. Get tankier in the tanky tree, works fine. None of these options have anything to do with Aegis or Blocking though, despite being advertised. Maybe this one can count with Protection. Maybe.

Steadfast Courage
Gain 3s Protection when blocking w/ Aegis.

Little extra bit of tankiness. Could be made more general / versatile by changing it to Block / Reflect in general rather than relying on Aegis only. Adjust duration if needed.

Stalwart Defender
Gain Toughness w/ Shield. -20% Shield skills CD.

Even more boring than the Focus one, which at least required a skill to be used to get its effect. A stat stick trait that does achieve its goal of tankiness.

Strength in Numbers
While in combat, PBAoE 3s Protection. 10s ICD.

Used to give a unique Toughness party buff which was culled along w/ the other unique party buffs. Party damage mitigation, useful in PvP. Most of this tree isn’t that useful in PvE due to not really having a tanking role, only a kiting role occasionally. 

Communal Defenses
Blocking attacks grants Aegis to allies. 15s ICD.

Does NOT grant Aegis to self. Good to see the restriction isn’t only Aegis only but any Blocks, making it a lot more usable. Does require you to Block something though, which would be a little janky since attacks usually go out in 1 go so if you Block something to get the effect, it might already be too late. Making it be on-demand would be a lot more powerful yes but also would work a lot better.

Might of the Protector
Gain Might when Blocking attacks. 1s ICD.

ICD isn’t really needed in PvE. If it’s a technical reason then surely reducing the ICD wouldn’t hurt. Especially since in PvP there’s a lot of targets being bombed with Conditions and it seems to run fine. Rewards Blocking, which is okay. If it gave party Might it “might” (wait I already made that joke) be more useful, an alternative option to stacking Might.

Altruistic Healing
Heal self when granting Boon to an ally, including self.

Since a tank role doesn’t really exist, it’s not that useful since it’s just self healing. Definitely more of a PvP trait where extra sustain always helps. It’s also a pretty unique way of adding some sustain.

Monk’s Focus
Meditation skills heal self, grant Fury to allies & -20% CD.

Little bit of extra Fury & self sustain. Not enough Fury to build around it though, more like an added bonus when using those skills. Overall, not that useful in PvE due to no tanks meaning less reliant on self heals.

Tenacious Defense
Whenever an Aegis you grant is consumed, reduce recharge of Virtue of Courage by 1s.

There aren’t that many ways to grant Aegis so the mileage from this trait is pretty low. Somewhat decent concept though, active cooldown reduction is more involved.
Honor - Dodging, Healing & Virtue of Resolve

Vigorous Precision
Gain 5s Vigor when you Crit. 10s ICD.

Little bit of extra dodging. Requires crit though which isn’t really used for healers since heals don’t crit. Definitely a relic of an age passed by where the trinity was purposefully avoided.

Invigorated Bulwark
+5% Outgoing Healing whenever you Block an attack, max +25%. -20% Mace skills CD & their Boons granted last 33% longer (caps are still the same).

Much better weapon specific trait. They don’t need all to have a similar impact on builds but they should be better than just being stat sticks. Rewards using some of the Mace skills well while also being able to be used w/ other weapons (namely Shield).

Protective Reviver
Cast Lesser Shield of Absorption when you begin reviving an ally. Detonation of Shield of Absorption partially revives allies.
Lesser Shield of Absorption: knock back enemies & create a Light Combo field which absorbs projectiles. Detonates automatically at the end to heal allies.

Helps w/ ressing. If you need that like in PvP, take it. It’s nice to have but ideally there shouldn’t be anyone needing a res; there are better options in this tree.

Protector’s Restoration
Cast Lesser Symbol of Protection when using a Healing skill. 20s ICD.
Lesser Symbol of Protection: same as Symbol of Protection but less damage and higher duration (since it’s not on an auto attack).

Helps w/ Protection uptime, pretty much the reason to take it. Also nice that it’s on demand, gives it a level of control and reliability.

Selfless Daring
PBAoE heal at the end of your dodges.

Extra healing; gives you a choice to save your dodges for survivability or use it to sustain the group.

Honorable Staff
Gain Concentration, doubled w/ Staff. -20% Staff skills CD.

It’s just a stat boost so it’s not that useful compared to unique buffs / healing like the other options even w/ a Staff.

Pure of Heart
Aegis that you apply heal when consumed.

Little extra healing but since Aegis is pretty rare it’s not all that useful. Still it is a unique method of healing and can’t be gained through stats on gear, making it more interesting than the 1st option.

Empowering Might
Grant PBAoE 8s 1x Might when Critting. 1s ICD.

Helps w/ Might uptime for the party. Requires critting though which again is not very likely for healers due to healer builds not putting any crit chance on. Not ideal but it’s the only offensive option.

Purity of Body
Virtue of Resolve passive also increases Endurance Regen by 15%.

Additive w/ Vigor (+65% total). Extra dodging to synergise the other dodge related traits. More dodges = more survivability & healing.

Pure of Voice
-20% Shout skills CD & convert 1 Condition into a Boon per ally.

Compared to the choices below it’s not that useful. Its unique effect isn’t strong enough to warrant choosing it, especially since there are already skills that cleanse Conditions. Turning them into Boons is nice but not worth a Trait for. Probably a lot more useful in PvP.

Writ of Persistence
Symbols are bigger, last 2s longer & heal allies.

Turns Symbols into a healing & Booning bastion. Bigger area means there’s more leeway and it lasting longer means more healing & more Boons being given, perfect for support healers.

Force of Will
Gain Vitality. +1% Outgoing Healing per 100 Vitality.

Little bit of tankiness & a little bit of extra healing. Does so via stats so it’s not as interesting as the other option.
Virtues - All Virtues, Generalist

Inspired Virtue
Virtues grant PBAoE Boons when activated. +1% Strike Damage per Boon on you.
Justice: 3 x Might.
Resolve: Regen.
Courage: Protection.

Each Boon fits into their respective Virtue, offensive, healing & defensive. Added damage buff is also very handy. A lot more powerful than the Ele version which is neither a minor Trait (doesn’t have to be chosen) nor gives an additional effect, just the damage.

Unscathed Contender
+7% Strike Damage w/ Aegis. +7% Strike Damage while >= 90% HP.

Used to only give +20% w/ Aegis and nothing without it. While it’s been normalised, it’s still pretty feast or famine especially w/ how rare Aegis is. Still it does reward not being hit by things, though there are a lot of random bits of damage flying about, in the open world at least. Could even be changed from Aegis to full health, lower the value if needed.

Resolute Subconscious
Gain Resolution & Aegis when Disabled. 30s ICD.

Defensive option, helps survive being CC’d.

Master of Consecrations
Consecrations last 2s longer & -20% CD.

Utility / Condition option. Since it increases the duration of Consecrations, it increases the duration of Purging Flames which is a big portion of Condition builds’ damage. An extra 2 pulses is huge. 

Virtue of Resolution
Gain Resolution when activating a Virtue. Resolution you grant lasts 25% longer.

An extra 3s of Resolution per Virtue, which all have pretty big CDs. Resolution is somewhat uncommon & the extra duration helps. Synergises w/ the Radiance tree & its Resolution traits & other Guardians w/ specced into that tree.

Inspiring Virtue
+10% Strike Damage for 6s after activating a Virtue.

Turns the Virtues into a damage cooldown. Adds a choice between saving the heal / block for their original use or to risk it on damage (fire active should be used during burst windows already).

Absolute Resolve
Activating Virtue of Resolve PBAoE cleanses 2 Conditions. Passive healing from the Virtue is 25% stronger.

Healer option as it improves the healing virtue which can be spread to others in the next choice. Extra Condition cleanse is also pretty nice to have.

Glacial Heart
Mighty Blow becomes Glacial Blow, dealing more damage, scaling better & Chilling enemies. (Non-crit) Damage & Chill enemies you Disable.

The leftover choice. Weird how there’s no Condition Damage option in this group, it ends up being this one by default. Should probably change Inspiring Virtue to be Condition Damage too. Trait itself is decent, upgrading Hammer’s specific skill rather than giving the usual -20% CDR. The Disable portion also technically upgrades the other Hammer non-auto skills too. Overall it’s a great weapon trait.

Power of the Virtuous
Gain Condition Damage based on 13% Vitality. -15% Virtues CD.

Forced Condition Damage trait which is weird. Virtues recharging faster is probably the most you’ll get for a Power build. More Virtues to use = more cooldowns for damage (especially if taking Inspiring Virtue).

Permeating Wrath
Passive of Virtue of Justice now triggers every 3 attacks from 5 & Burns in an AoE.

Offensive option. Burns more often & turns it into an AoE making it useful in those situations too. Works for both DPS builds, though mostly the Condition one since that actually scales the Burn damage & duration.

Battle Presence
Nearby allies gain the passive effect of Virtue of Resolve.

Healer option. Add passive healing to the party. Pretty simple but does allow you to keep it on cooldown for longer since the burst healing should be needed less often now.

Indomitable Courage
Active of Virtue of Courage breaks stun & grants Stability to allies. Passive down from 40s to 30s recharge.

Defensive option (PvP). Builds upon the defensive Virtue & helps survive more often.

Dragonhunter Combat
More offensive than base Guardian.
Gains access to Longbow, allowing new skills which are long range & offence oriented.
Virtue actives have been changed to have a more physical effect rather than be a buff but still serve their respective purposes (damage, healing or defence).
Gains access to Trap skills, damaging AoEs that can be used to zone.
Gains access to the Dragonhunter traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specialisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Dragonhunter Abilities
Virtues

Spear of Justice -> Hunter’s Verdict
Passive: the same as Virtue of Justice.
Active: Throw a piercing, unblockable spear to tether to enemies. Tethered enemies are Revealed (can’t stealth), Burned & Crippled. While tethered, can activate Hunter’s Verdict to pull enemies in & break the tether (separate CD). Does less damage than Virtue of Justice if all buffed attacks land on the same target.

Does less damage than the base version if everyone w/ the buff hits the same target, but it does much more AoE damage & also has utility with Crippled, Revealed & the pull. Also has a bunch of traits which interact w/ the tether, making it do more damage in the long run. It does have a cast time & is targeted so it can cause some issues if you’re trying to aim it at something behind you while moving. Piercing ranged attack makes it feel good to use though, which is something Guardian’s lack. Pull is helpful but it has a 40s CD which doesn’t show in the UI if you don’t have anyone tethered so it’s a little difficult to keep track of.

Wings of Resolve
Passive: the same as Virtue of Resolve.
Active: Combo Leap to an area, healing allies. Also removes Immobilize & cleanses 2 Conditions. Heal is much stronger than Virtue of Resolve but has a small cast time & heal radius is smaller.

Pretty much a straight up upgrade from the base version. There is a 1s cast time so you need to pre-emptively use it if it’s for the healing but it gives you an option to use it as a gap closer. Also gets rid of Immobilized making it a pseudo mobility skill too. The extra mobility goes a long way on the somewhat immobile class. Smaller radius generally doesn’t matter as everyone’s stacked anyway.

Shield of Courage
Passive: the same as Virtue of Courage.
Active: Grant Aegis in a cone in front of you & also Block attacks in that same cone. Vulnerable to attacks from the side & back. Aegis granting area is a lot smaller than Virtue of Courage.

Also an upgrade from the base version. Smaller radius doesn’t matter again because everyone’s usually stacked & the side / back not blocking doesn’t matter since the base version doesn’t have 3s of frontal block anyway. Feels great to use if timed correctly to completely mitigate mechanics.

Longbow
Long range AoE damage & CC. 2H.

Puncture Shot
Long range piercing (20%) combo Projectile. If it hits more than 1, Cripple all enemies hit.

Used to only bounce to 1 additional target behind the main target, making it awful in AoE situations. Piercing makes it a lot more forgiving in those cases. Otherwise it’s a decent filler attack w/ a little bit of soft CC in some cases. It does slow your movement either like other games so that feels good too.

True Shot
Long range piercing combo Projectile. Short cast time for big damage on a low CD.

Purely a damage skill. Has a little cast time which takes getting used to in an action combat game. Cooldown is pretty low at 4s so it’s like a pseudo filler damage skill. Same notes about piercing being good. Would be perfect if it had a cast time but you’re able to move slowly during it, would fit the action combat a lot more.

Deflecting Shot
Slow-ish moving piercing combo Projectile, damages, Blinds, Knockbacks & Blocks missiles.

Less damage than True Shot but more than Puncture Shot. Has a lot of additional effects making it versatile. Can use it for CC or defensive projectile blocking or just use it on cooldown for damage. Projectile blocking hitbox is a little small and it’s moving so it takes some getting used to compared to Shield of Courage or the ground targeted AoEs.

Symbol of Energy
Ground targeted Light Combo field that damages & Burns enemies while pulsing Vigor for allies.

Longbow’s Symbol. Same notes for Symbols apply here. The Boons that aren’t granted by the other weapons are: Aegis, Alacrity, Quickness, Resistance, Stability & Vigor. Aegis, Resistance & Stability are powerful Boons but are more of an on-demand type of buff, which all the other Symbol Boons aren’t. Alacrity & Quickness are somewhat problematic so they got to be pretty hesitant in adding those Boons in. Firebrand has Quickness covered & Willbender technically has Alacrity covered, which pretty much just leaves Vigor as the default Boon. Vigor is utility leaning on defensive as more dodges = more active mitigation for the long range Longbow.

Hunter’s Ward
Ground targeted AoE after a channel. Pulse damage & Cripple before a final burst of damage & placing a Ward ring around enemies, preventing escape.

What was once relegated to be a CC skill because of PvP w/ a whopping 40s CD and pitiful damage has now been changed to be a good damaging skill on a 20s CD in PvE. The Ward rings are technically CC but require the enemy to try and move out of them, which isn’t always the case especially against bosses. In general it’s a decent damaging AoE arrow rain skill.

Traps

Purification - Healing
Weak self heal & place a trap. If triggered, burst heal & Regen while slightly damaging & Blinding enemies.

Basically a delay heal since if you’re in melee range (which is most of the time), the trap will trigger which makes it effectively a PBAoE skill, at least in PvE (applies to all other Trap skills too). Definitely more of a PvP skill where the Blind is more useful. Still loses out in healing to Litany of Wrath like every other heal skill.

Fragments of Faith - Utility
Break stuns & place a trap. If triggered, damage & Cripple enemies while granting self Stability. Leaves behind fragments which grant Aegis if you don’t already have it.

Defensive option. Decent stun break since it grants Stability & Aegis but it’s on a pretty big 45s CD. Only benefit over something like “Stand Your Ground!” is that it does damage and can, in theory, grant Aegis multiple times to yourself.

Light’s Judgement - Utility
Place a trap. If triggered, Daze enemies & grant self Swiftness. Pulse slight damage, Revealing & Vulnerability.

CC / PvP option. Reveal isn’t useful in PvE & Vulnerability should already be covered by other players or even just by the Guardian with Symbolic Exposure trait. Daze & Swiftness helps catch out enemies or peel for yourself, making it versatile.



Test of Faith - Utility
Place a trap. If triggered, damage & Cripple enemies while granting self Protection. Further damage & Cripple to enemies trying to cross the area.

Defensive option. Helps peel by both Crippling on activation and on crossing, doubling as a zoning tool. Less useful in PvE as the best defence is to kill everything.

Procession of Blades - Utility
Place a trap. If triggered, damage enemies & grant self Fury.

Offensive option. Not much to say as it just damages & grants Fury. Does have a Whirling animation, could add a combo Whirl component for a bit more flavour.

Dragon’s Maw - Elite
Place a trap. If triggered, Pull enemies in, Slow (actions are slower) them & hold them in a Ward. Grant self Might.

An actual offensive Elite for Guardian. Does good burst damage and keeps enemies held down so you can use a blender on them (Procession of Blades + Greatsword’s Whirling Wrath + a Symbol). Since Boons should be covered by others if you’re going DPS, this is pretty much the only option.

Traits

Virtuous Action
Changes Virtues to the ones listed above. Gain access to Traps.

Like the other initial Elite specialisation traits, adding it because it’s the 1st in the tree.

Piercing Light
Traps Slow enemies & -20% CD.

Slightly improves traps. Only take if you’re using Traps, obviously. It’s actually the offensive option of the 3 since more damaging Traps = more damage. Slow is inconsequential in PvE, more of a PvP thing.

Dulled Senses
Cripple enemies you Disable.

PvP option as most enemies either die before Cripple gets any effect (once the Disable runs out) or are immune to Cripple / CC.

Soaring Devastation
Wings of Resolve deals some damage upon landing. Movespeed increased while it’s not on cooldown.

Damage isn’t worth taking, especially since it requires you to both use the healing Virtue & go through the jumping animation. If the damage was higher or gave you a damage boost after using it, it could be more of a choice to either use for damage or save for healing / mobility. Movespeed increase is okay, but Swiftness is pretty much permanent these days.

Defender’s Dogma
Blocking causes Justice passive to reach max charge & reduces active cooldown of Spear of Justice by 3s. 1s ICD.

Nothing to really play around as Blocks & Aegis are both pretty rare. It does technically increase damage by maxing out the charges for the passive & lowering the cooldown of the active for Justice. Maxing out the charges can range from 5 to 1 though, making it vary wildly in effectiveness depending on when you Block. Adding a separate proc so that it doesn’t overlap w/ the usual counter would normalise its effectiveness. Extra active Spears are always fun to have though.

Hunter’s Determination
Elite skills break stuns.

Defensive against CC option. Compared to the damage option though it’s a little lacklustre. Lowest CD Elite is 30s, but offers no protection afterwards. The ones that do offer protection are more relevant in PvP, as are most anti-CC traits.

Zealot’s Aggression
Deal +10% Strike Damage against Crippled enemies. Justice’s passive Cripples.

Offensive option. With all the Cripple from Justice’s active, Longbow & other players this is essentially just +10% damage. Less reliant on applying the debuff than compared to solo play, which makes it less interesting but hey, it’s more damage.

Bulwark
Shield of Courage gains increased radius & +2s duration.

Defensive option. Makes the cone wider & lasts a little longer, but compared to the damage increase option it’s nowhere near worth it. If there was a part that also allowed more uses like CDR or an extra charge or something that interacted with Aegis, it would be a lot better. Definitely more useful in PvP, especially WvW.

Pure of Sight
Deal bonus Strike Damage based on distance. Min +5% when closer, Max +15% when far away.

Another damage up trait. Max range isn’t all that useful in PvE due to how it’s usually best to group up in melee range for heals / Boons. It could use a better indicator as to when the max damage boost is achieved though; the tooltip is rather vague. Since there’s no playing around the range, it’s less interesting in PvE than in PvP.

Hunter’s Fortification
Remove Conditions when Blocking (1s ICD). Receive -10% Strike Damage when no Conditions are on you.

Blocking / Defensive option. Like the previous Blocking option, there aren’t that many Blocks to proc its effect. The damage reduction is nice and is more achievable since it doesn’t require a Block but overall it’s more of a PvP option.

Heavy Light
Gain Stability when Disabling an enemy (1s ICD). Deal +15% Strike Damage to Disabled enemies. Deal +10% Strike Damage against Defiant (CC immune) enemies.

CC / PvP option. Stability isn’t that needed in PvE, and when it is it’s usually needed on demand so CCing an immune enemy doesn’t work. The damage portions are pretty interesting though in that they encourage you to CC enemies before using your burst skills (which is already the normal but still). Damage doesn’t beat the next option though.

Big Game Hunter
Spear of Justice tether duration doubled. Hitting a tethered enemy inflicts Vulnerability and deals +20% Strike Damage.

DPS option. Makes the Spear a very powerful damage cooldown. Damage increase is a lot more than the other option and burst phases are more important than a general damage increase. Changing the importance of a single skill & turning it into something to play around is great design. Also adds a lot more risk into using the pull as that breaks the tether.

Firebrand Combat
Replaces Virtues with Tomes which have their own weapon skills. Each skill has a page / charge cost which regenerates over time, up to 5 by default. Pages are shared across all 3 tomes.
Passives are the same but are disabled for a period of time (~20s higher than base Guardian’s cooldown) when a Tome is equipped.
Gains access to Axe, melee damage & CC.
Gains access to Mantras which require preparing before being able to be used. Each charge is an AoE effect, either beneficial or detrimental. The final charge is more powerful but will put the skill on cooldown and require preparing again. For Firebrand’s, Mantras are automatically prepared while out of combat in PvE and not on cooldown due to having no special effect when their preparations are done like Mesmers.
Gains access to the Firebrand traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specialisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Firebrand Abilities
Tomes
Tome of Justice

Chapter 1: Searing Spell
Frontal cone for damage, Burning & Vulnerability. Costs 1 page, 0.5s CD.

Tomes were recently-ish changed to have a charged resource rather than having their own costs. This prevents DPS builds from accessing the utility of other skills like cleanses or reflects.

Due to the above change, it’s never worth it to use this skill since it has the same cost as the damaging skills below which do more damage. Unfortunately that’s the side effect of the change above. A change to make it used more is if it buffs 1 of the next skills used. Doesn’t necessarily have to be damage, could be longer duration non-damaging debuffs or wider AoE, something that makes it more usable in cases other than “all the damaging skills are on cooldown and I need something now”.

Chapter 2: Igniting Burst
PBAoE damage, Burning & Weakness. Costs 1 page, 8s CD.

PBAoE damage (and Weakness). Not much else to be said, it’s strictly better than the above skill since Vulnerability is not in short supply.

Chapter 3: Heated Rebuke
Ground targeted AoE, damages & pulls enemies. Costs 1 page, 10s CD.

CC skill. Useful if you need to gather enemies, otherwise not worth it since Firebrand is usually either Condition Damage or Healing, meaning the damage doesn’t scale that well.

Chapter 4: Scorched Aftermath
PBAoE Fire Combo field. Pulses damage, Burning & Bleeding. Costs 1 page, 15s CD.

Big damage via direct damage & DoTs as well as a Fire field. Like the 2nd skill, there’s not much else to say as it’s like other Fire field skills and it’s strictly better than the 1st skill.

Epilogue: Ashes of the Just
PBAoE buff. Next 2 attacks Burn. Costs 1 page, 20s CD.

Bunch of extra Burning. Doesn’t require enemies to be hit by an AoE so it’s slightly more versatile. Again, strictly better than the 1st skill.
Tome of Resolve

Chapter 1: Desert Bloom
Frontal cone for healing. Costs 1 page, 0.5s CD.

Unlike the 1st skill for Justice, this skill actually does something the other skills don’t: burst healing. This makes it actually usable for healers rather than having the other skills be strictly better versions of it.

Chapter 2: Radiant Recovery
PBAoE cleanse. Heal target per Condition cleansed. Costs 1 page, 4s CD.

Used if cleansing is needed. Extra healing is handy due to the damaging Conditions. Low-ish CD means it can be used again in the really bad Condition cases (skill 5 also cleanses, we’re talking 10+ Conditions).

Chapter 3: Azure Sun
Ground targeted AoE Vigor, Regen & Swiftness. Costs 1 page, 8s CD.

Since Swiftness is abundant and Regen is just another form of a HoT, this skill’s unique property is the Vigor. Whether or not that’s enough for this skill to be used depends on the situation, but more likely than not it’s a no.

Chapter 4: Shining River
PBAoE Water Combo field. Pulses healing & Swiftness. Costs 2 pages, 10s CD.

Each pulse is actually weaker than skill 1 and overall has a lower healing ratio than 2 x skill 1 (2 x due to costing 2 pages). Could be useful for the Combo field but otherwise needs something else to warrant costing 2 pages.

Epilogue: Eternal Oasis
PBAoE buff. +33% Healing Effectiveness on target. Convert 5 Conditions into Boons. Costs 2 pages, 20s CD.

Huge healing buff & Condition cleansing. Definitely warrants the CD & page cost. Obviously use it before other healing skills for max value, especially if it gets rid of the Poison healing debuff.
Tome of Courage

Chapter 1: Unflinching Charge
Frontal cone for Protection & Swiftness. Costs 1 page, 0.5s CD.

The base duration of the Protection is 2s, so if you really need it then it’s an option but compared to the other skills you’re better off healing the damage.

Chapter 2: Daring Challenge
PBAoE damage, Taunt (Condition that forces afflicted to attack applier) & Resolution. Costs 1 page, 4s CD.

Taunt is definitely more of a PvP Condition as it doesn’t work on CC immune enemies like bosses. Resolution isn’t that helpful either since the crit trait isn’t used by Condition builds generally.

Chapter 3: Valiant Bulwark
Ground targeted AoE that reflects missiles. Costs 2 pages, 15s CD.

Reflecting missiles could be handy but it does cost 2 pages which would eat up a lot of DPS or healing. Definitely a PvP skill.

Chapter 4: Stalwart Stand
Breaks stun. PBAoE Light combo field that pulses Resistance. Costs 2 pages, 20s CD.

Extra stun break which could be used in emergencies but that’s pretty much it (for PvE). Doesn’t protect you further from CC and you’re better off cleansing the Conditions rather than reducing its effectiveness. It’s also worth noting that it requires opening the Tome & then pressing this skill, which is an additional key needed to access an important skill such as a stun break.

Epilogue: Unbroken Lines
PBAoE buff. 300 Toughness, Protection, Stability & Aegis. Costs 2 pages, 25s CD.

Very powerful defensive buff but it does cost 2 pages which would eat up DPS or healing. Like the other defensive skills, it would get more use in PvP than in PvE.

Axe
Melee damage & control. Main hand only.


Core Cleave -> Bleeding Edge -> Searing Slash
Frontal cleave, damages & Bleeds.
Frontal cleave, same damage & Bleed.
Frontal cleave, most damage & Burns.

Feel like the 2nd attack could have a slightly different effect rather than being exactly the same as the 1st attack. Maybe sacrificing 1 of the Bleed stacks for a Burning stack which is strictly better for Guardian’s w/ the Burning traits. Otherwise it’s a typical auto chain for a Condition based weapon (Axe itself isn’t strictly Condition based, but Firebrand is).

Symbol of Vengeance
Frontal Light Combo field that pulses damage, Bleeding, Cripple & Fury for allies.

First of all, the Symbol looks badass. Other than that it’s the usual Symbol w/ pulsing beneficial effects for allies & detrimental effects for enemies. Fury being chosen is fine as there weren't any other offensive Boons you could add other than Quickness / Alacrity, which you don’t really want on a weapon since it will cause balance issues w/ a DPS being able to give such powerful Boons to a group without really a drawback. Bleeding could be better by being a Burn but other than that it’s fine.

Blazing Edge
Frontal cone Pull (Darius E) that damages & Burns.

Utility skill but the Burn is actually respectable. This means you either have to use it for the Burn or keep it for the Pull / CC. Fortunately for bosses you can use it on cooldown most of the time as the CC requirement is usually covered by others or the CC doesn’t matter since they’re immune.

Mantras
All of the “Mantra of X” skills are 2.25s channels which give access to other 2 skills. No other effects are there for Firebrands. 1 will refer to middle skill while 2 refers to the last skill. All of the following Mantras are PBAoE w/ a frontal cone.

Mantra of Solace -> Restoring Reprieve -> Rejuvenating Respite - Healing
Heals + grants Protection & Resolution.
Bigger heal, longer lasting Boons & also grants Aegis.

Sacrifices personal healing for group healing & defensive Boons. Group healing is stronger than the other party heal skill “Receive the Light!” if all charges are used but requires the channel time before it’s usable. Previously every charge gave Aegis which if timed correctly was incredibly powerful compared to damage reduction. Fits the philosophy of powerful effects at the cost of a long channel. Final charge can be used in an emergency but there’s a choice to be made as not only is there the channel you need to worry about but also the 25s CD, locking you out of all healing & Boons as opposed to keeping it charged w/ the weaker heals.

Mantra of Flame -> Flame Rush -> Flame Surge - Utility
Damages & Burns.
3 x the Burning stacks.

Same notes about being a Mantra apply. That said, the only effect this skill has is damage so there’s nothing stopping you from unloading all charges & then preparing the Mantra again (which is the optimal way for DPS), whereas the heal skill isn’t always needed but when it is, it‘s needed.

Mantra of Lore -> Opening Passage -> Clarified Conclusion - Utility
Grants Regen & Cleanses 2 Conditions.
Regen lasts longer & converts 5 Conditions into Boons instead of cleansing.

Same notes about being a Mantra apply. With max Boon Duration, this skill can almost have a 100% uptime for Regen (needed for some builds) without eating all charges. Otherwise it’s a little bit of extra healing & some cleansing. Very few cases will justify needing more than 4 Conditions to be cleansed outside of PvP so the last charge + preparing the Mantra is unlikely for this skill, but it is an option.

Mantra of Truth -> Echo of Truth -> Voice of Truth - Utility
Damages, Cripples, Blinds & applies Weakness.
No longer Cripples. Other 2 Conditions last longer. Also applies Vulnerability & Immobilize.

Same notes about being a Mantra apply. The Conditions applied are definitely more PvP oriented as they don’t break CC bars fast enough in PvE. In PvP there’s more downtime for preparing Mantras so there’s less downside to using the final charge.

Mantra of Potence -> Potent Haste -> Overwhelming Celerity - Utility
Grants Might & Quickness.
Grants more Might & both Boons last longer.

Same notes about being a Mantra apply. Like the DPS Mantra, there’s nothing stopping you from using all charges other than overcapping Quickness, which won’t happen if you’re the only 1 in your subgroup providing Quickness. So this ends up being a pump & dump skill which gets prepared again during filler downtime.

Mantra of Liberation -> Portent of Freedom -> Unhindered Delivery - Elite
Breaks stuns + grants Stability & Resolution.
Grants 5 x Stability stacks. Both Boons last longer & also grants Swiftness.

Very powerful party utility as it breaks stun for everyone in your subgroup + prevents further CC for a bit. Final charge is very rarely needed in PvE as you’re unlikely going to need to block more than 1 CC in a short time frame; most likely it’ll be because you haven’t gained another charge yet from the last use since it’s 25s per charge.

Traits

Purity of Word
Converts Virtues into Tomes. Gain access to Mantras.

Like always, it’s the 1st trait in the tree.

Unrelenting Criticism
Axe skills inflict additional Bleeding. Symbol of Vengeance Dazes on initial strike.

Selfish DPS option. Bleeding isn’t as great since most Guardian traits are Burning as mentioned before but still scales with Condition stats. Little bit of CC on a low-ish CD is also nice to have.

Liberator’s Vow
Grant Quickness when using your heal skill. 7s ICD.

Utility / Group DPS option. Works well with the healing Mantra as a charge counts as using your healing skill, otherwise the next lowest healing CD is 25s. Makes the final charge of the healing Mantra even worse to use due to the 25s CD.

Archivist of Whispers
Gain 3 additional max pages, up to 8.

Versatile option (DPS, Healing or Tankiness for the Tomes). This probably could use an additional effect of reducing Tome skill cooldowns since right now the extra pages don’t really do much other than allow you to dip into the Tomes you aren’t building towards for some utility (Pull, cleansing, tankiness respectively).

Swift Scholar
Equipping a Tome grants Quickness. 8s ICD + will not grant it if you have the Dormant debuff (passive disabled for recently equipping a Tome). Every 3 Tome skills grants 1 page, resetting counter when exiting a Tome.

Bit of extra Quickness for you to use the Tome skills quickly. ICD + Dormant clause make it a little restrictive but the small boost is nice for the bigger Tome CDs. Page refund encourages 3 skill bursts when going into Tome, allowing for more Tome skills to be used in the long run. Keeping track of how many skills were used adds an extra layer to the rotation and is the more involved & interesting part of this Trait.

Weighty Terms
Final Mantra charges Slow enemies. -20% Mantra charges recovery time.

More Mantra uses = more Boons / Conditions. With this Trait, you can maintain Quickness a lot easier which frees up more gear Stats for damage / healing and the Elite slot for something else like the party stun break. Final charge Slowing is more useful in PvP, not so much in PvE.

Stalwart Speed
Granting Aegis or Stability grants Quickness. 7s ICD.

Aegis & Stability are pretty rare and when they are applied they’re usually applied in bursts. The ICD prevents full value of this Trait, leaving it feeling lacklustre especially compared to Weight Terms in terms of Quickness uptime.

Legendary Lore
Tome skills grant self Boons upon casting.
Justice: 2 x Might.
Resolve: Regen.
Courage: Protection.

Selfish option as the Boons only apply to yourself. Helps top up the Boons for their respective uses. Not really needed if you have others covering the Boons for you. Previously Justice increased the Burning duration of the Justice passive, which was much more useful for Burning DPS BUT was completely different from the Resolve & Courage effects in that it was actually useful.

Imbued Haste
Gain Condition Damage, Healing Power & Vitality while under Quickness.

Bit of extra stats while under Quickness, the main support aspect of Firebrand. The lack of Power pretty much seals the deal that Power Firebrand was not meant to be.

Stoic Demeanor
Retain Courage passive while on cooldown. Grant Resistance & Might to allies when Disabling, Immobilizing or Slowing an enemy. 1s ICD.

Defensive option. Helps maintain Resistance & Might a little bit, especially if you take Weighty Terms for the Slow on the final charge. Since it doesn't grant Protection it feels like an incomplete Defensive option, but I suppose there’s a risk of overloading this skill. Replacing the Might w/ Protection would solidify the defensive identity.

Quickfire
Retain Justice passive while on cooldown. Granting Quickness to an ally also grants Ashes of the Just, making their next attack Burn. 7s ICD.

Offensive option. Basically just extra damage every 7s for doing something you’re probably already doing if you’re going the support Burning build. Pure Burning build doesn’t get much out of this other than retaining the Justice passive. If you want to include pure Burning builds as this is the only offensive option, you can change the Quickness conditional into any Boon so that it affects the healing Mantra too.

Loremaster
Retain Resolve passive while on cooldown. Tome pages recharge every 6s instead of 8s.

Healing / support option. Little bit of extra pages helps but it’s definitely the least interesting of the 3 options. Could be changed to also reduce the cost of the healing Tome skills to 1 to keep it as the healing option but also make it more interesting.

Willbender Combat
Much more mobile than base Guardian: Virtues become movement skills which lose their passives until activated. 
Passives all grant beneficial effects for consecutive attacks. 
Cooldowns are lower compared to their Base Guardian counterparts.
Virtue actives are all selfish base kit, no longer granting effects to allies.
Gains access to off-hand Sword, adding another offensive off-hand weapon w/ some extra mobility.
Gains access to Physical skills which specialise in mobility, CC & damage.
Gains access to the Willbender traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specialisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Willbender Abilities
Virtues

Willbender Flames
All Virtues manifest flames (not a Combo field) that damage enemies. The shape & number of targets vary w/ each Virtue.

It's a bit weird that fire doesn’t Burn enemies by default. Requires a Trait to be taken, which could’ve easily been “Burn from Willbender Flames burns for longer / more damage”. Other than that it’s just extra damage in the form of an AoE. It not being a Fire Combo field makes sense since there’d be a lot of Combo fields and the game already struggles with visual overload + the size of the AoEs themselves are small. Note that using another Virtue removes the previous one’s Flames, so space them out.

Rushing Justice
Dash to target or forward to gain Justice passive (Burns enemies), damaging & Burning enemies + firing a fork of Willbender Flames in front.

Fits with the mobility philosophy of this spec. Otherwise it does exactly what you expect from the offensive Virtue: damage + Burning. Flames being spawned in front reiterates the offensive nature of it, though it can be used as mobility if you have no target selected at the obvious cost of damage.

Flowing Resolve
Cleanse mobility Conditions, heal self & gain Resolve passive which heals you. Dash in target direction, Evading attacks & leaving Willbender Flames behind. 2 charges.

More versatile than the Justice variant since you can choose the direction. Freeing self from mobility Conditions (Chill, Cripple & Immobilize) helps a ton. Does sacrifice on demand healing in exchange for the mobility in the form of an Evade & sustained healing, so there’s some risk from burst damage there. Evade adds a layer of skill in the form of active mitigation & having 2 charges makes it even more versatile as mobility (+ cleansing) or healing.

Crashing Courage
Ground-targeted blink w/ AoE damage & spawning Willbender Flames as the ring of that AoE + grant self Aegis & Stability. Gain Courage passive which grants the same Boons. Has a bit of a cast time.

It does have a little cast time so that needs to be something you’re aware of compared to the other non-Firebrand Courage skills. This means you need to use it earlier if you want to Block something on demand. That said it sacrifices some defensiveness for mobility in the form of a blink, damage & sustained tankiness via Aegis & Stability. This is similar to the Dragonhunter Courage skill in that it’s a longer lasting tankiness skill but it does require constant attacking as it takes 5 attacks to trigger the passives.

Off-Hand Sword
Short ranged & versatile (offensive & mobility). Off-hand only, obviously.

Executioner’s Calling
Frontal cleave for damage & Vulnerability. 2nd frontal cleave for more damage, increased if hit by 1st hit.

The damaging skill; does melee damage. The 2nd strike is pretty much immediately after the 1st, so the damage conditional only misses if you somehow manage to aim the 1st strike incorrectly or use it while another player is dodging in PvP. Otherwise it’s a pretty standard damaging melee skill.

Advancing Strike
Dash forward then blink & combo Whirl to enemy for cleave damage, Slow & Immobilize.

The mobility skill, but it’s janky since the blink only happens if you’re within 100 range, which is practically melee. That means the Whirl, damage, Slow & Immobilize won’t happen. They should happen anyway even if you don’t reach a target for consistency’s sake.

Physical

Reversal of Fortune
Negate (not Block) the next attack within 1.5s, healing instead. If nothing is negated, heal for a lesser amount. 2 charges.

Similar to Shelter but with some key differences. This skill doesn’t actually Block, so it doesn’t interact with Block traits. This skill has 2 charges, making it more versatile. Finally it only affects the next attack, meaning if you’re being bombarded it won’t help much. It trades the safety of a channelled Block for versatility, which is much more useful in PvP and certain scenarios in PvE.

Flash Combo -> Repose
Blink to target & damage multiple times. Gain access to Repose, allowing you to blink back to your starting position for minor PBAoE damage & combo Blast.

The damage itself is okay, a bit lower than other damaging skills due to the power budget going into both a blink & a return action. While it could be handy in niche cases in PvE, it’s again a much better skill in PvP. Blast is a bit janky if you use it at range though as there wouldn’t be any Combo fields behind you but should be fine if you’re on top of the enemy but that raises the question as to why you’re not using a better damaging Utility if you’re just going to use this for the damage.

Whirling Light
Combo Whirl multiple times for damage, Weakness & Burning. Has an animation but can move freely during it.

The actual damaging utility. Has 4 Whirls in it so it can do even more damage if used within a damaging field like Fire. Weakness is again more of a PvP Condition but the damage & Burning has uses in PvE. Channelling for 1.25s means you’re locked out of other skills but you can move freely making it feel less restrictive than other attacks.

Heel Crack
Damage & Stun target.

It’s just CC w/ some damage; it doesn’t even have charges. Only good thing is that it’s a relatively low CD, which makes it more of a PvP skill again since CC windows in PvE don’t come up that often where you’d be better off w/ the higher CD Sanctuary or even Rolling Light since it breaks more CC in PvE for some reason.

Rolling Light -> Quick Retribution
Break stun & Evade backwards, slightly damaging + Blinding enemies & gaining Swiftness. Allows use of Quick Retribution: short Combo Leap damage & Daze target.

Decent stun break as it comes with an Evade & Blind to avoid being attacked / CC’d again. The short Leap w/ the Daze actually CCs for more than Heel Crack in PvE which is funny considering it has another ability attached to it. The most offensive & the most mobile of the stun breaks, giving it a lot more value in PvP.

Heaven’s Palm
Blink to target for PBAoE damage. Knocks down the target & knocks back other enemies.

Very low cooldown for an Elite at 20s. Has a decent range too so it can even double up as a gap closer. Damage isn’t that bad either. Damage, mobility + CC fit the theme of Willbender well. Being able to save it for CC or mobility (less likely w/ the Virtues) or use it for damage makes it very versatile.

Traits

Willbender Training
Changes Virtues into movement skills. Gain access to Physical skills.

As always, it’s the 1st trait.

Searing Pact
Gain Condition Damage. Willbender Flames now inflict Burning on enemies struck.

Condition Damage choice. As mentioned before, the flames should have Burning basekit as it’s weird for fire not to Burn & this Trait could’ve made the Burning last longer or add more stacks. Other than that, choose if building for DoTs. All 3 choices affect the same thing but for different builds so the choice is pretty cut and dry.

Power for Power
Gain Power. Willbender Flames deal double damage.

Power Damage choice. Same notes above about this group of Traits affecting the same thing. Only affects the damage of the flames meaning it’s less reliable than the Condition option in PvP (since players are more likely to walk out of it than mobs).

Conceited Curate
Gain Healing Power. Willbender Flames heal you when they strike an enemy.

Sustain choice. Same notes above about this group of Traits affecting the same thing. Also the same notes about players being able to move out of it, negating its effect.

Righteous Sprint
+25% Movespeed. Gain Swiftness when using a Virtue.

More mobility for Willbender, both passive & active. Note that movespeed boosts don’t stack and only take the highest value, in this case being the 33% from Swiftness.

Restorative Virtues
Triggering Virtue passives reduce active weapon CDs by 0.25s. Gain Alacrity when using Flowing Resolve.

Cooldown option. All choices affect Virtue passives (3rd one only Courage) + an active, so again they all affect similar things but w/ their own direction. The choice this time is less cut & dry as this option actually beats out the below in damage since in group content you already have Might & Fury covered but the general idea stays the same. Active portion is less useful since you probably want to save it for the healing / mobility.

Holy Reckoning
Triggered Virtue passives additionally grants Might. Gain Fury when using Rushing Justice.

Offensive option, except in group content where it becomes redundant. This makes it more useful in PvP where you’re not going to have a dedicated Boon support to handle Boons. If needed, this could easily be changed to be the offensive option by changing one of the Boons into a unique self damage buff.

Vanguard Tactics
Triggered Courage passive additionally grants Resistance. Gain Resolution & Protection when shadow-stepping (blinking).

Defensive option. Only affects the Courage passive as being immune to soft CC is pretty powerful. The trade off is that the active Boon effect is granted by any blinks, not just from Crashing Courage which makes it more readily available through weapon skills & other utility skills and hence versatile.

Lethal Tempo
Activating a Virtue or triggering its passive gives a +2% All Damage stack, up to +10%. Gaining stacks refreshes the duration of all stacks. Duration: 6s.

Extra damage for cycling through your Virtues + spacing them out. This lines up with the Willbender Flames part where the previous flames disappear if you use another Virtue. With all 4 Virtues (2 x Resolve charges) + Alacrity, you should be able to constantly keep this up if you’re always attacking. This does cause issues w/ downtime though which makes practical effectiveness vary depending on the fight. This can be resolved by increasing the duration or gaining stacks on mobility skills.

Phoenix Protocol
Gain Alacrity & Regen when Resolve’s passive triggers, but no longer heal.

The utility option. Passive triggers can be spread to allies via the Battle Presence trait. Formerly also increased Resolve’s passive duration by 2s but was removed in PvE only. Due to the fact that it requires the passive to proc which is based on number of attacks (no matter how strong or weak), its effectiveness differs with weapons & how often their damage procs. If it’s a single big hit, you’ll get less effect out of it than a bunch of weaker hits, despite being in combat for the same amount of time. One way to normalise this is to make it so it pulses on Flowing Resolve’s activation rather than require passive procs. If they want to keep Willbender as another selfish spec, the above suggestion can be changed to pulse to self only instead of group, removing the interaction with Battle Presence.

Tyrant’s Momentum
Lethal Tempo grants +3% All Damage per stack (max 15%), but only lasts for 4s. Justice passive lasts 2s longer.

The damage option. Overall a damage increase as damage is mostly through burst via cooldowns rather than a constant DPS in PvE. Duration reduction is slightly offset by Justice lasting longer, allowing for more Lethal Tempo procs to be stacked.

Deathless Courage
Killing an enemy w/ Courage’s passive increases its duration by 2s, up to a max of 4s extra (2 procs). You cannot be downed w/ Courage’s passive. Courage no longer grants Aegis & initial duration is now 4s instead of 6s.

The defensive option. Turns Crashing Courage into a much more powerful defensive skill if you can get the procs. Pretty bad in PvE unless there are adds running around, but it can still be used as a pseudo immunity at the cost of damage. It requires killing & not downing which also makes its effectiveness in PvP questionable, as players are downed first before being killed. But like in PvE, it can be used as a pseudo immunity (still need to be healed up).

Necromancer
Necromancer Combat
Pretty cool archetype; I like all things magic and this is no exception.
Minions are ugly though, and them being dead is no excuse.
Standard 2 weapon skill bars, swapping in combat has a cooldown.
Profession mechanic is Death Shroud, allowing Necros to gain a 2nd HP bar (scales w/ max HP) which drains upon damage (reduced by 33% compared to regular HP) & naturally over time.
Gain Shroud through certain weapon skills & enemies dying, fitting the Necro theme.
During Death Shroud, all weapon skills are replaced w/ a set 5 & Utilities are inaccessible, excluding Minions which stay summoned but you can’t command them to use their skill where applicable.
Tied highest HP in the game but lowest armour due to being a caster. Combined w/ the 2nd HP bar + the damage reduction while in Shroud makes them incredibly tanky, even if it sacrifices their damage to tank w/ Shroud.
Has access to Poison & Dark Combo fields, fitting w/ the Necro theme as well.
Necros have the unique mechanic of Corruption, converting Boons into Conditions. This is mostly a PvP thing as most mobs don’t have Boons the majority of the time.
Necromancer Abilities
Death Shroud

Death Shroud -> End Death Shroud
Replace current weapon skills w/ the below. Also prevents Healing, Utility & Elite skills from being used (if Minions are summoned they stay summoned. Signet passives are gone unless otherwise stated). Turn Life Force into the current HP bar & take 33% reduced damage. Press again to exit, putting it on a 10s CD.

There’s also an aquatic version but like the other Professions, will be ignoring them.

Life Blast
Ranged piercing damage.

Simple filler. Piercing damage is always nice so it doesn’t get completely screwed over by targeting shenanigans in AoE situations.

Dark Path -> Dark Pursuit
Ranged targeted (non-Combo) projectile. AoE damage, Bleeding & Chilled that’s Unblockable. Allows use of Dark Pursuit on the main target, blinking to the target & resetting the CD of Dark Path.

Mobility skill as the damage & Bleeding isn’t that high. It being Unblockable helps guarantee it landing (can still be dodged) and hence consistent. Complete cooldown refund is nice and isn’t too powerful as it requires a target: great for chasing down but not as good for peeling.

Doom
Single target ranged Fear.

Single target CC, not much else to say.

Life Transfer
PBAoE channel to damage & drain Life Force.

Big damage & increases Life Force which increases how long you can stay in Shroud / gives you more “HP”. Trade off is that it’s short ranged & requires a channel, leaving you vulnerable. Can be layered w/ CC skills for a nice combo, especially since 3 of the other 4 skills in Shroud have some sort of CC on them.

Tainted Shackles
PBAoE damage, Torment & Reveal. Immobilize if enemies stay within range.

Morgana R basically, except there’s no damage on the chains ending so it’s just CC. Would be a lot more satisfying if it did some damage or applied damaging Conditions at the end. As mentioned before it combos well with Life Transfer so they’re Immobilized and unable to run away from the drain.

Staff
Long ranged AoEs in the form of Marks, which are basically ranged Traps. 2H.

Necrotic Grasp
Long ranged piercing (20%) Combo Projectile that damages & grants Life Force per target hit.

An okay filler since it pierces & can grant huge amounts of Life Force if it hits a bunch of enemies. Other than that there are better skills since it sacrifices damage for range. Staff in general has been buffed to pretty much be the highest damaging Power weapon for base Necro, meaning the weapons are pretty much locked for Reaper. This also means that Axe, Focus & Warhorn are less useful for Power Reapers.

Mark of Blood
Ground targeted Mark that damages & Bleeds enemies + grants Regen to allies.

All the Marks are functionally the same, just ground targeted AoEs if you place it under an enemy (otherwise they’re ranged Traps; more useful in PvP). They have unique effects which can be played around but at the end of the day it’s all about damage. The Regen isn’t that useful & Staff isn’t really a healing weapon if this is the only healing skill. This one does okay amounts of damage, so it’s in the middle of the priority list.

Chillblains
Ground targeted Mark that damages, Chills & Poisons enemies. Leaves a Poison Combo field.

Same as the other Marks functionally. This one does higher damage than most Marks so it’s higher in the priority list. Poison is just more damage so using it whenever possible is the best use. Chill is irrelevant in PvE unless you’re playing Reaper, in which case there are other ways to apply it.

Putrid Mark
Ground targeted Mark that damages & transfers Conditions per target hit. Also Blasts.

Same as the other Marks functionally. Does the least amount of damage since the utility of cleansing & applying Conditions is pretty strong, at least in PvP. Since it does the least, it’s last in the priority list.

Reaper’s Mark
Ground targeted Mark that damages & Fears enemies.

Same as the other Marks functionally. Does the most amount of damage so it’s highest in the priority list. Fear can be useful in PvE but since bosses are CC immune and Fear is a Condition (meaning it needs to tick to damage the CC bar), it’s best to just use it as damage & not save it unlike in PvP.

Axe
Mid-ranged Power weapon. Main hand only.

Rending Claws
Ranged Vulnerability & damage x 2. Vulnerability doubled if below target 50% HP.

It’s an okay filler attack that has synergy with the 2nd skill w/ the Vulnerability. However, there are better weapons & Shroud which sort of counts as a 3rd weapon, making filler skills less valuable. It’s even less valuable since it’s single target only.

Ghastly Claws
Ranged channel damage & Life Force. Bonus 1% damage per Vulnerability stack on target.

Does really good damage especially if the target has max Vulnerability stacks, which is often the case when there are multiple players. Also recovers a good chunk of Life Force. Its only issue is the other 2 skills aren’t that great, making this choice a little bit worse off. It’s also single target but it’s not as bad since it’s a channelled high damage skill, which makes more sense since you want to be sure you got a target before starting it.

Unholy Feast & Unholy Burst
PBAoE damage, Cripple & Boon Corruption. If the enemy is below 50% HP, deal additional AoE damage around the enemy.

A lot of the power budget is in the AoE & the Boon Corruption, which makes it less useful in group content as there’s usually just 1 target & no Boons to corrupt. It’s a much better skill in PvP and occasionally in PvE open world stuff but since the other 2 skills are single target, there are better AoE options. The additional damage is okay 

Scepter
Mid-ranged Condition weapon. Main hand only.

Blood Curse -> Rending Curse -> Putrid Curse
Single target damage & Bleeding.
Same as the 1st.
Most single target damage, same Bleeding & Poison.

Like other attack combos, I think there should be something that differentiates each attack. Since the Bleeding is the same for all parts of the combo, the only thing that would make sense is if the 2nd attack had the 2nd most damage. Other than that it’s a combo that makes sense for a Condition build. Still annoying with the single target.

Grasping Dead
Ground targeted AoE damage, Bleeding & Cripple.

An AoE damaging skill w/ Bleeding. There’s also a Cripple but like other soft CC Conditions it’s not as useful in PvE. That just leaves damage, which means use it on cooldown; not that interesting in terms of rotation. It’s AoE though!

Feast of Corruption
Single target damage & Life Force gain + Corrupt Boons. For each Condition up on the target up to a cap, gain additional Life Force & inflict Torment (DoT that’s stronger if the enemy is not moving).

Decent damage & Life Force gain w/ the PvP utility of Corruption. The main draw is the extra Torment per Condition the target already has since this is a Condition weapon. The cap is 5 and there are a total of 14, so the cap is very easily reached regardless of party composition. The skill is upgraded even further with a trait, making it stronger & AoE which resolves the only weakness this skill has.

Dagger
Bit of a weird weapon w/o its own niche. Main & off hand.

Necrotic Slash -> Necrotic Stab -> Necrotic Bite
Frontal damage x 2, 2 targets.
Frontal damage + Life Force, 2 targets. Same overall damage.
Frontal damage + Life Force, 2 targets. Most damage & Life Force

Dagger doesn’t really seem to have a niche on its own, other than the Life Force generation. It barely cleaves & does less damage compared to other weapons. It does have the most “transfer Conditions to target” out of the weapons but overall it’s just outclassed by all the other weapons. Leaning into Life Force & transferring Conditions could make it more usable while keeping its uniqueness.

Life Siphon
Drain HP from target. Healing is increased if you’re Bleeding. Damage is increased if the enemy is Bleeding.

Okay amount of damage & an okay amount of healing. Would be better if this skill (and hence all main-hand Dagger skills) gained Life Force as well. It does have a synergy with self Bleeding & enemy Bleeding but the benefit isn’t that much. It’s also a single target ranged attack which is still annoying.

Dark Pact
Bleed self. Bleed & Immobilize target + Corrupt their Boons. Gain Life Force per Corruption.

The Bleeding doesn’t match what the autos are doing but does have synergy w/ skill 2. Doesn’t have much use in PvE though as mobs don’t have Boons usually. This means the Life Force clause isn’t relevant either. Possibly change it to have a base value that increases w/ number of Boons corrupted like the other corrupting weapon. Also single target.

Deathly Swarm
Bouncing projectile that damages, transfers Conditions & Blinds.

Condition transferring skill. Damage isn’t that much so it’s purely for the Condition transfer. There are Corruption Utility skills which also apply Conditions to self to synergise w/ this but it’s mostly a PvP skill where Conditions are more abundant.

Enfeebling Blood
Ground targeted AoE that damages, Bleeds, Weakens & Corrupts a Boon.

Off-hand Condition skill. It’s the only off-hand Condition weapon other than Torch for Scourge so it’s used by default. It’s an AoE that damages & debuffs, not much else to say. Again, Boon Corruption is not useful in PvE.

Focus
Off-hand Power weapon focusing on PvP related effects.

Soul Grasp
Ranged single target lifesteal (damage & healing) + Vulnerability + Life Force. 3 charges.

The lifesteal makes this skill more of a PvP skill as the healing isn’t as useful in PvE most of the time. It does have decent Life Force generation though, but building around that isn’t really needed as the skills in Shroud have cooldowns too and there’s more than enough Life Force on regular weapons.

Spinal Shivers
Ranged single target Chill & Boon strip (removal only). Deals damage based on how many Boons stripped including 0.

Does huge damage if all 3 Boons are removed (which seems to be where all the power budget went to), making it a PvP skill rather than a PvE one. Doesn’t do as much in PvE, especially being single target. There are better options.

Warhorn
Utility based off-hand weapon.

Wail of Doom
Frontal cone Fear. Bonus Defiance damage against CC bars. Unblockable.

CC skill. Used to be 2s of Daze (same total damage against CC bars) but was changed to Fear. Necro does have several traits that interact w/ Fear so that change makes it more specialised for Necros if traited rather than being a generalist CC skill.

Locust Swarm
Self buff for Swiftness, PBAoE lifesteal damage & Life Force.

Utility skill. Constantly pulses for 5s meaning it lasts going into Shroud. Makes rotations faster if using a non 2H weapon. Otherwise it provides more mobility & rewards for sticking on top of enemies, synergising w/ itself.

Healing
Choose 1.

Consume Conditions - Corruption
Consume all Conditions on self, healing + additional healing per Condition. Apply Vulnerability to self.

The Condition cleanse option. Hypothetically the highest healing skill too but the odds of you being afflicted by all 14 Conditions is pretty low. Still, if Conditions are an issue then this is the best option, even if it applies Vulnerability to yourself. There are a couple of weapon skills that can cleanse / transfer that off too.

Summon Blood Fiend -> Taste of Death - Minion
Summon a ranged minion that damages & heals you on attack. Activate again to sacrifice the minion for healing (+ Life Force since it dies).

The highest DPS option as it’s the only 1 that does consistent damage & stays active while in Shroud. It does mean you’re using an ugly ass pet though. Can also sacrifice it for more healing but note that it does have its own HP bar, meaning it can die from raid wide damage or other mechanics. This adds another layer of annoyance to it since you don’t really control where it goes. If it was invulnerable in PvE (keep it as is for PvP for counterplay) then it would be better.

Signet of Vampirism - Signet
Passive: passively lifesteal from the closest enemy while in combat.
Active: Heal self & mark an enemy. Next 25 attacks on it will lifesteal, 1s ICD / attacker.

The offensive party healing option as it’s lifesteal (damage + healing). The only issue is that since it’s lifesteal, the heal can be wasted if someone full health eats up a charge. It also obviously requires a target whereas the Well doesn’t. Trait allows you to keep the passive while in Shroud and for it to also rapidly recharge per second while in Shroud.

Well of Blood - Well
Heal self & place a Light Combo field beneath self that pulses healing.

The utility party healing option. Does no damage compared to the Signet and heals the group for less overall but there’s no chance for the heal to be wasted as it’s done via healing, not life steal. There’s also a Light Combo field which may or not be useful. Trait makes it so this also revives players which could be useful in those scenarios.

Utility
Choose 3.

Blood Is Power - Corruption
Bleed self & target + PBAoE Might. 2 charges.

All Corruption skills debuff yourself in exchange for an effect that’s Condition related. Stuck between support (Might) & Condition DPS (Bleeding). Necro doesn’t have enough Might generation to keep up 25 stacks for everyone so at best this skill is supplementary. Does pretty good damage though, which means its best use is using it on cooldown.

Corrosive Poison Cloud - Corruption
Weaken self. Ground targeted Poison Combo field that Poisons & Weakens + Blocks Missiles. Unblockable.

The other Condition applying choice. The Weakness isn’t that much of an issue for Condition builds as it only affects direct damage, not DoTs. Plus there’s a Combo field for more Poison. There’s also a missile block component, giving you a choice to use it on cooldown for damage or saving it to mitigate a mechanic. Unblockable doesn’t mean as much for PvE. 

Corrupt Boon - Corruption
Poison self. Corrupt 3 Boons on target. Unblockable. 2 charges.

PvP option as there aren’t any Boons to corrupt in PvE. Being Unblockable means you just have to wait for invulns & dodges, but it’s more consistent than without it. 2 charges gives extra versatility; you can use it on multiple targets or just wreck the single target.

Epidemic - Corruption
Apply Vulnerability to self. Spread Conditions on target to nearby enemies at 50% duration. Max stack for each Condition is 5. 

The AoE option. Take it if you need to spread DoTs. It has been nerfed to only have half the duration and then again to cap at 5 stacks, but it’s still pretty powerful.

Summon Bone Fiend -> Rigor Mortis - Minion
Summon a ranged minion that damages a target. Also Cripples every 10s. Activate again to temporarily Immobilize the minion but cause its next attacks to do more damage & Immobilize.

One of the ranged options. This one is more versatile as it can actually move by default. It does less damage and is shorter range but has the Cripple utility + being able to move. Active adds more CC. Its attacks also count as % chance Combo Projectiles so that’s something to account for in terms of damage (or utility depending on the field). Self Immobilize on the minion seems a bit weird, it only really matters in edge cases like using it at long range (it has mid-high range), which is more a PvP thing.

Summon Bone Minions -> Putrid Explosion - Minion
Summon 2 melee minions that damage. Activate again to sacrifice 1 for damage & a Blast around the dead minion.

It’s a pretty good designed ability in that you have a choice for constant DPS or burst damage w/ some utility. The cooldown doesn’t start until both minions are dead though, which makes it an all or nothing kind of ability. Due to burst phases in boss encounters, you’re more likely than not just going to dump both minions, respawn them once available and keep them there until the next burst phase. Blast is nice but doesn’t warrant any playing around. Also since it’s a sacrifice, it grants some Life Force.

Summon Flesh Wurm -> Necrotic Traversal - Minion
Summon a long range, immobile minion that damages. Activate again to break stun, sacrifice the minion, blink to it, PBAoE Poison, Blast & bonus Life Force.

The other ranged option. It’s longer ranged, does more damage and has a 100% chance of being a Combo Projectile but no form of CC and it’s always rooted. Its active is a lot more defensive compared to Bone Fiend w/ the stun break & blink. There’s a Blast and PBAoE Poison but that requires the minion to be in melee range of the enemy, which would obviously make it not a blink since you’re usually in melee range too. Since it’s a sacrifice, it grants a lot of Life Force too since it also has the bonus Life Force but that’s more of a bonus effect rather than wasting damage + a stun break for.

Summon Shadow Fiend -> Haunt - Minion
Summon a melee minion that damages. Activate again to make the minion blink to the enemy for PBAoE damage, Blindness, Chill & Weakness + Life Force.

The other melee minion that’s more standard. No sacrifice so while it’s more streamlined, it’s more boring since you’re just using its ability on cooldown, at least in PvE. Otherwise it’s a stock standard minion. Also less ugly than the others, barely.

Plague Signet - Signet
Passive: Transfer a condition from an ally to yourself. 3s ICD.
Active: Breaks stun. Transfer 5 Conditions to target.

Defensive option. The passive isn’t really much as it only transfers a single Condition regardless of how many allies you have near you and it’s on a 3s ICD. Active can be saved as a stun break / Condition cleanse or used to transfer Conditions you’ve granted yourself from Corruption Utilities or some weapon skills. However, there are better stun breaks that also protect you from further CC / have other utility and the Conditions you grant yourself aren’t really that detrimental. That leaves the cleanse which isn’t as useful in PvE.

Signet of Spite - Signet
Passive: Gain Power.
Active: Damage, Bleed, Blind, Cripple, Poison, Torment, Weaken & apply Vulnerability to the target.

Offensive option. Interesting in that it’s both a Power & Condition option, but via passive & active respectively. That said, it’s a little boring either way just like other Signets. Power you just keep it on cooldown permanently and Condition you use it on cooldown for a burst of Conditions. It does have a whopping 60s cooldown though in PvE (PvP has 40s) which makes it a lot less attractive unless there’s a lot of phase transitions.

Signet of the Locust
Passive: Gain movement speed.
Active: PBAoE damage & Boon removal. Heal per hit & Boon removed.

Utility option. Movespeed isn’t that useful since, like other Signets, only gives 25% while Swiftness gives 33% and isn’t that rare. The active could be useful in AoE situations for both damage and sustain but more often than not there are better skills. There’s some Boon removal but again, that’s a PvP thing.

Signet of Undeath:
Passive: Generate Life Force. 3s ICD.
Active: Sacrifice half base HP to res an ally in a ground targeted AoE.

Utility / support option. The Life Force gain is small but constant and that can be translated into damage or utility depending on the spec. However due to Signets not retaining their passive baseline while in Shroud, it’s only really used w/ support Scourge since their Shroud doesn’t remove the active weapon / utility skills. Active is handy for a ranged res w/ its own Necro flavour but its effectiveness is the same as the other ranged res abilities. It also has a pretty large 75s CD.

Spectral Armor - Spectral
Breaks stun & gain Protection. Gain Life Force every time you take damage, 1s ICD.

Spectral skills gimmick is granting Life Force. This is the defensive option which allows you to be tankier. Its Life Force generation is from taking damage, playing into the defensive nature of the skill. Pretty much the same as the other defensive skills.

Spectral Grasp - Spectral
PBAoE Pull for Chill & Life Force per hit.

CC utility option. It’s a long range and grants huge amounts of Life Force if it hits multiple times, but it trades off all damage for this utility. If you need a Pull, this is an option.

Spectral Walk -> Spectral Recall - Spectral
Breaks stun & places down a mark. Gain Swiftness & a buff which consumes Conditions every 2s in exchange for Life Force. Can re-activate to recall to the mark.

Utility option that has a lot of effects on it. Can be used as a stun break, but it’s not as defensive as others. Can be used to cleanse Conditions but that has a 2s ICD so it’s not as useful. Its most powerful effect is the return which can be useful for some mechanics depending on the fight, or more effective in general in PvP.

Spectral Ring - Spectral
Ground targeted Ethereal Combo field that applies (not pulse) Protection & Fear. Gain Life Force each time someone is Feared (1.5s ICD). Unblockable.

Since it doesn’t pulse, it only applies the effects once its previous application wears off and they pass through the ring again (if ICD for Fear is done) which makes it a lot more janky compared to just pulsing. Can reduce the duration of the effects to make it pulsing. Otherwise it’s an okay ranged AoE fear. Ethereal is an odd choice though as that’s usually a Mesmer field, whereas Necro usually has Poison (doesn’t fit) or Dark (fits better than Ethereal in my opinion).

Well of Corruption - Well
Ground targeted Dark Combo field that pulses damage, Boon Corruption + Life Force per target per pulse. Unblockable.

Does the least amount of damage out of all the damaging Wells. Most of the power budget goes into the Boon Corruption & Life Force. To get max value though there needs to be multiple enemies w/ Boons which just isn’t a thing in PvE. Even if max enemies were being hit by all pulses, it would only give 30% Life Force which you can get from Spectral Grasp hitting only 2 enemies. Since Boon Corruption isn’t useful in PvE and the Life Force gain is minimal, this isn’t really an option.

Well of Darkness - Well
Ground targeted Dark Combo field that pulses damage, Blindness & Chill.

Does the 2nd most damage out of all the Wells. Sacrifices some damage compared to Suffering for Blindness & Chilled, which are more useful in Solo PvE or PvP for survivability. Take it if you need Power damage as it’s mathematically the 2nd best choice. Can also be used for surviving but you generally use that at the beginning of fights too, so it doesn’t change when or how to use it compared to just for damage.

Well of Power - Well
Breaks stun & grant self Stability + ground targeted Dark Combo field that pulses Might & converts Conditions into Boons for allies.

The most defensive out of all the Wells. Doesn’t do damage but still hits enemies for the purpose of some Traits. Provides the most support for allies too w/ the Might & reverse corruption. It’s a good stun break too w/ the Stability & constant cleansing, sacrificing further defensiveness for the party utility.

Well of Suffering - Well
Ground targeted Dark Combo field that pulses damage & Vulnerability. Unblockable.

Does the most damage out of all the Wells, which is why the only other effect is Vulnerability (which is more damage). Take it if you need Power damage as it’s mathematically the best choice. Otherwise it’s just a ground AoE Dark field.

Elite
Choose 1.

Plaguelands - Corruption
Bleed self. Inflict Place down an AoE (not field) that pulses damage & Conditions, each pulse applying the previous pulses’ Conditions too (Bleed, Poison, Torment, Vulnerability, Cripple, Weakness, Blindness, Chill & Burning).

The Condition Damage option. Places a metric crap ton of Conditions onto enemies in an AoE. Visually looks like a Dark field but doesn’t act like one, possibly due to balance issues. Darkness doesn’t have any Condition Damage capabilities though, only Blindness & Life Steal so there’s no reason for it not to be a thing in PvE. Most of the damaging Conditions are frontloaded, meaning they get applied over and over again due to how the skill works. Oddly Burning is at the end, possibly due to balance reasons rather than getting multiple stacks of it. It’s a strong Condition Elite overall.

Summon Flesh Golem -> Charge - Minion
Summon a melee minion that damages & Cripples. Activate again to grant the minion Stability & cleanse movement Conditions. It then charges forward, damaging enemies. The charge also Launches enemies at the edge of its hitbox & Knockdown enemies closer to its hitbox. Enemies w/ big hitboxes and CC bars can be “launched” multiple times.

The constant DPS & CC option. Like every other minion, it comes with the drawbacks of having to use a pet. It does do a lot of CC damage to a CC bar though, the main reason to take this skill.

Lich Form - Spectral
Transform into a Lich, gaining Precision & Vitality + new weapon skills but losing Healing & Utility skills. Gain Stability every 3s. Gain Life Force upon end. Removes all other Spectral effects.
Deathly Claws: Ranged piercing damage.
Lich’s Gaze: Random projectile at nearby enemy that damages, Cripples & applies Vulnerability. 5 charges, low recharge.
a) Ripple of Horror: Targeted wave that damages & Fears. Unblockable. Reactivate for:
b) March of Undeath: Blink to Ripple of Horror wave, destroying it.
Summon Madness: Summon 8 minions that attack & explode for more damage after 6s.
Grim Specter: PBAoE pulsing lifesteal that also drains Vitality. Unblockable.

It has a huge CD of 150s like Ele’s Tornado, which makes it a lot less usable in PvE especially since it removes your Healing & Utility skills. The only reason this is taken in PvE is due to Summon Madness doing a lot of burst damage for burst phases. All the other skills are either too weak (Lich’s Gaze), provide mediocre CC (Ripple of Horror) or provide effects not that useful in PvE (Ripple of Horror & Grim Specter). The blink isn’t worth a 150s CD and extra temporary Vitality isn’t that useful.

Traits
Non-coloured Traits are auto picked if the tree is chosen. Coloured Traits are a choice of 1. Can only pick 3 trees.
Spite - Strike Damage

Reaper’s Might
Shroud skill 1 (auto) grants 1 x Might.

More offensive buffs while in Shroud. While Boons are usually granted by a specific support / healer, the Might granted here lasts 15s which is pretty decent sometimes. More often than not it’s wasted due to having a support though.

Spiteful Talisman
+10% Strike Damage against Boon-less enemies. -20% Focus & Axe skills CD.

Since 99% of mobs in PvE don’t have Boons, it’s a +10% damage buff for Power builds. Also makes Axe & Focus a little bit more attractive to use. Both of these weapons have skills which get rid of Boons, synergising. This effect is more prevalent in PvP though.

Spiteful Renewal
Consume a Condition & heal if consuming one when using a Healing skill. 5s ICD.

A little bit of extra cleansing & healing. The 5s CD seems to only be there because of Summon Blood Fiend + Taste of Death, though the heal & cleansing aren’t strong enough to even warrant taking this trait, let alone “comboing” it w/ that healing skill.

Bitter Chill
Chilling an enemy inflicts 3 x Vulnerability.

Seems more useful in PvP since enemies actually have Boons, making Spiteful Talisman a little less attractive. Still there aren’t too many Necro skills that Chill & when they do it’s only a couple seconds of Vulnerability anyway. An option if not using Focus / Axe or any Boon removing skills and you don’t want the healing / cleansing option.

Death’s Embrace
Deal +25% Strike Damage while downed. Inflict 5 x Vulnerability when hitting an enemy <= 50% HP. 10s ICD.

The Strike Damage while downed only affects 2 skills, a channelled lifesteal and a PBAoE damaging Dark field. The damage doesn’t affect the lifesteal healing, so it only really helps you in getting a Rally (killing or assisting in killing an enemy while downed picks you up, up to 3 times in a short period). Since you’re not meant to be downed often, this trait only really provides Vulnerability on low HP enemies. It does have 80% uptime which is nice. The 50% HP threshold fits with the overall theme.

Chill of Death
Cast Lesser Spinal Shivers on an enemy when hitting an enemy <= 50%.
Lesser Spinal Shivers: Chill & remove up to 3 Boons. Damage depends on how many Boons are removed. 20s CD.

PvP option as Boons aren’t on PvE enemies. Power budget is in the Boon removal as the damage is lower and it has a higher CD compared to the Focus version.

Awaken the Pain
Might grants more Power but less Condition Damage (2:1 split instead of 1:1). Gain 5 x Might when entering Shroud.

Take this if you’re going a Power build, which you probably are if you’re going down this tree. DoTs do less damage w/o this Trait but it’s far outweighed by the damage gain on Strike Damage. Little bit of extra Might when entering Shroud helps too.

Signets of Suffering
Gain a better version of equipped Signet passives while in Shroud. Signets recharge 4% every second in Shroud.

This Trait requires both you taking Signets and being in Shroud for it to have any effect. It’s a lot more active compared to other Signet traits though, as they passively recharge quicker while this requires you to actively go into Shroud for the recharge. However since this traitline is about Strike Damage and this doesn’t really help with that other than making the Power Signet stronger in Shroud, it’s not a very good choice overall. Possibly better in a different traitline.

Siphoned Power
Gain 3 x Might when hitting an enemy <= 50% HP. 1s ICD.

Even more Might for the player. While it requires the enemy to be low (fits the theme), it only has a 1s ICD which means you’ll reach the 25 cap in no time, even without a support. ICD prevents a huge discrepancy between single target and AoE, but that doesn’t really matter since you reach max pretty quickly.

Dread
Inflicting Fear grants Quickness & Fury (3s ICD). Shroud skill 3 recharges 50% when killing an enemy.

None of the other traits are Fear or Condition-applying themed so it seems sort of random (excluding Bitter Chill). Base Necro & Reaper Shroud Skill 3 are both Fear related, so it fits the overall theme. Scourge’s Shroud Skill 3 is a Barrier and Harbinger’s Shroud Skill 3 is a gapcloser w/ DoTs, so neither fit the Fear theme. It does provide a unique combo w/ a bunch of Barrier / gapclosers if a bunch of adds die. A PvP option since you want to Fear more often and Boons are harder to come by.

Close to Death
+20% Strike Damage against enemies <= 50% HP.

Even more execute damage. A little boring but fits the theme of Strike Damage & execute thresholds.

Spiteful Spirit
Cast Spiteful Spirit when entering Shroud. Spiteful Spirit: PBAoE damage, Cripple & Boon Corruption. Gain Resolution per enemy hit. Further Corruption for enemies <= 50%.

Has at least a 10s CD built in from exiting Shroud, but you’ll need to rebuild Life Force and you don’t want to be entering Shroud just for this Trait (use weapon / Utility cooldowns, wait for Shroud cooldowns to finish). A lot of the power budget is in the Boon Corruption as it doesn’t do much damage and can’t crit. Might be useful in PvP if there are Boon heavy builds.
Curses - Conditions

Barbed Precision
Crits have a 33% chance of Bleeding. +20% Bleeding duration.

Still not a huge fan of RNG on top of RNG. Make it guaranteed on crit but have an ICD or weaken the effect, no need for it to be that random. Especially for DoT builds which don’t build around 100% crit. Extra Bleeding duration is nice.

Insidious Disruption
Disabling enemies inflicts Torment.

Doesn’t have an ICD, so it basically adds a Torment to any ability with a Disable on it. It’s the most offensive Condition Trait of the 3, so it’s often the default choice since the only reason you go down this traitline is for the Condition damage.

Plague Sending
First attack in Shroud transfers 2 x Conditions.

Has at least a 10s CD due to Shroud cooldowns (20 for Scourge). That severely limits the amount of Conditions you remove / transfer in bursts, which is what you want otherwise the Conditions on you will just time off or be cleansed by someone else. It needs something else, possibly pulsing transfers while in Shroud, encouraging you to stay in Shroud for as long as possible.

Chilling Darkness
Blinding enemies Chills them. 3s ICD.

Little bit of extra soft CC. Not that useful in PvE but incredibly annoying in PvP. There aren’t that many Necro skills that Blind though, further limiting how useful this is especially w/ the ICD.

Furious Demise
Gain Fury when entering Shroud. Gain Precision.

Bit of extra Fury padding for more crits, which is nice but won’t do much for DoT builds other than Barbed Precision. Same goes for the extra Precision, though that at least benefits Target the Weak (below).

Master of Corruption
-33% Corruption skills CD & inflict another Condition on you.

If using Corruptions (which you should be for Condition builds), take this trait. More Conditions = more damage. It uniquely comes with a “downside” of another Condition being inflicted on you when using Corruptions, but what it really does is make transferring Conditions stronger, especially the damaging ones. 

Path of Corruption
Shroud skill 2 also Corrupts 2 Boons (1 for Scourge).

Not sure why Scourge is nerfed, they’re all AoE skills w/ similar CDs. The only reason why I can see it’s nerfed is because Scourge Shroud skill 2 also Corrupts Boons and they don’t want it to Corrupt too many Boons at once. Other than that they’re all pretty different skills, w/ Necro & Reaper only sharing mobility aspects. Take if you need to Corrupt Boons.

Terror
Fear you inflict damages per second.

The other Condition option if you’re not taking Corruption skills for some reason. There aren’t that many Fearing skills though so effectiveness is limited; you won’t really be able to count this as another DoT to upkeep.

Target the Weak
+2% Crit Chance against an enemy per Condition they have. Gain Condition Damage based on 13% Precision.

Extra crit chance not that useful for DoT builds as previously mentioned. Probably a remnant of a bygone era where builds were a lot more wacky. Extra Condition Damage based on Precision on the other hand is very useful.

Weakening Shroud
Cast Lesser Enfeeble when entering Shroud (10s ICD). Crits inflict Weakness. Lesser Enfeeble: PBAoE damage, Bleeding, Weakness & Boon Corruption. Can’t crit.

More of a PvP option compared to Lingering Curse since the damage isn’t that great but it does have debuffs (Weakness) and Corruption, both of which are better in PvP.

Parasitic Contagion
Heal for 5% of your Condition damage. Does not heal while in Shroud.

Sustain option, which means it’s more of a Solo PvE or PvP option. Not affecting Shroud HP makes sense, but it also straight up doesn’t heal you while you’re in Shroud (your actual HP bar). This seems counterintuitive. It should heal your HP bar but not affect the Life Force bar (which acts as your HP in Shroud).

Lingering curse
Gain Condition Damage. Conditions inflicted by Scepter last 50% longer. Feast of Corruption becomes Devouring Darkness, increasing damage, Torment duration & gains Life Force per enemy hit.

Extra Condition Damage for the Condition Damage builds, always nice to have. Huge Condition duration increase for Scepter and upgrades one of its skills to be even stronger. Only reason not to take this is if you’re not using Scepter for some reason, and even then the Condition Damage might be enough as a Trait. The Condition Duration + upgrading a skill are a lot more interesting than the usual recharge 20% faster variants as you can feel its effects a lot more.
Death Magic - Tankiness & Minions

Armored Shroud
Gain 5 x Death’s Carapace in Shroud (max 30). Death’s Carapace: 20 Toughness.

Extra tankiness while in Shroud. Introduces the traitlines main mechanic of a Toughness stack. As always, the UI isn't that great to keep track of the little icon.

Flesh of the Master
Minions have +50% HP. Gain 2 x Death’s Carapace per minion you have out.

Tankiness option. Makes your minions a lot tankier so they do more damage since they live longer. Since they live longer, there’s less pressure on you so you do more damage too. Adds even more tankiness through the Carapace stacks. Much more interactive skill type trait compared to “X skills recharge faster”, though all it requires is for you to have minions out. All 3 choices are related via gaining stacks, making them comparable to one another.

Putrid Defense
+15% Poison Damage. Applying Poison grants Death’s Carapace.

Offensive option. Poison isn’t as prominent in Necro builds though (the order is Torment > Bleeding > Poison > Burning) so it’s not as effective as it seems. Offers another way of gaining Carapace stacks for more tankiness.

Shrouded Removal
Lose a Condition when entering Shroud + every 3s in Shroud. Gain 3 x Death’s Carapace when removing Conditions from yourself in any way.

Utility option that helps with Condition cleansing. More prominent in PvP as that’s where the majority of Conditions come from, especially persistent Conditions since it only cleanses every 3s. Gaining stacks from any removal of Conditions rather than just from the Shroud cleanse makes it synergise w/ other Necro cleanses, giving it more versatility.

Soul Comprehension
+20% passive Life Force from deaths (10% -> 12%). Kills (and assists) grant Death’s Carapace.

A bit of extra Life Force from deaths is nice, but only applicable for open world or fights with adds. Same goes for the stacks as it requires things dying which isn’t always the case. Still it does its job when it procs and it fits the theme of death magic.

Necromantic Corruption
+25% Minion Damage. Each Minion takes a Condition from you every 10s (small delay between each transfer). Minion attacks transfer Conditions to the target.

Offensive option if taking minions. Makes combat loop a lot simpler & easier, just need to keep your Minions alive / summoned. There is a bit of a delay before a Condition is taken off of you, most likely to prevent full Minion builds making you immune to Conditions. Transferring Conditions to enemies fits the Necro theme of plague spreading.

Dark Defiance
When Disabled, gain Protection (20s ICD). Protection on self also grants -20% Condition Damage taken.

Defensive option. Both effects are passive so it’s not the most interactive. Become tankier when in a tough spot (CC’d) and increase that tankiness to also include Condition Damage, which wasn’t a thing before Resolution was added.

Deadly Strength
Death’s Carapace also grants 10 Power per stack.

Offensive option if not taking minions. 10 Power (max 300) isn’t that much though, so it’s not a very strong or exciting trait. It used to give Power based on 7% of Toughness, doubled while in Shroud. The 1st part is a lot less interesting than the current iteration as it requires you keeping up stacks. The 2nd part w/ doubling effectiveness while in Shroud could’ve been kept in the new version, putting more emphasis on Shroud which is the strong form of Necro / the highlight.

Beyond the Veil
Take -10% Condition Damage while at or above 10 x Death’s Carapace stacks.

More tankiness w/ stacks, this time Condition Damage as opposed to Strike Damage (which is what Toughness counteracts). Stack threshold encourages a bunch of minions to consistently maintain the stacks vs. a linear scaling of DR vs. stacks.

Death Nova
When you or a Minion is downed (or dead), create a Poison Nova. Summon a Jagged Horror Minion when you kill a foe (cap of 5, 3s ICD, 30s duration). Poison Nova: PBAoE Poison combo field for pulsing some damage & Poison.

Offensive (Condition) option. A couple of the Minion skills have in-built sacrifices which interact with this, otherwise the only time this procs is when the summoned minions expire so it’s not very effective. It’s even less effective in single target fights where the summoning doesn’t even happen. There’s no real way to add more to this skill since it’s called Death Nova, it needs something to die. Possibly make it start pulsing a weak Poison field when low HP and then explode when downed / die?

Corrupter’s Fervor
Inflicting a Condition on an enemy grants Death’s Carapace. Gain pulsing Protection while at or above 25 x Death’s Carapace stacks.

Defensive option. A lot of Necro skills apply a Condition so it’s very easy to reach the threshold since there’s no ICD. Applying Protection gives it counterplay in PvP, otherwise in PvE it’s just additional DR which is weaker in group play since others will be providing Protection too.

Unholy Sanctuary
Heal 2% HP/s while in Shroud. While Life Force is >= 10% (25% for Scourge), Shroud will activate if you would take a lethal blow. 30s ICD.

Defensive / sustain option. Offers a little bit of healing while you’re in Shroud to help top you off. Not as needed in group play but could be useful solo; definitely more effective in PvP. Automatically makes Shroud a 2nd chance HP bar which could be useful but considering Shroud can be entered while CC’d, it’s not that helpful if you’re paying attention. Could possibly also give a protective / healing field (fitting w/ “Sanctuary”) when proccing to differentiate it from someone who’s paying attention and activates Shroud when they’re about to die. Only edge case is if Shroud is on cooldown, in which case this is better.
Blood Magic - Life Steal & Healing

Mark of Evasion
Leave a Lesser Mark of Blood when dodging. Lesser Mark of Blood: same as Mark of Blood but weaker, Regens for less and doesn’t Blast.

Adds a little bit of extra damage & healing when you dodge, a little bit of risk. In PvE you just use it while in the hitbox to proc it for damage, doesn’t really do anything else.

Ritual of Life
Cast Lesser Well of Blood when starting a revive. All of your Wells of Blood partially revive allies per pulse. Lesser Well of Blood: same as Well of Blood but less initial self healing & healing pulse. 30s ICD.

Support / revive option. Like the other revive augmenting Traits, taking Well of Blood is encouraged for max value. Pretty much exactly the same as Ele’s Geyser, except it’s a Healing skill rather than a Staff skill (both pulse healing).

Quickening Thirst
+25% movement speed while >= 75% HP. -33% Dagger skills CD if used above the same threshold.

Dagger option. Way more interactive than the flat 20% reduction of other similar Traits. HP threshold synergies w/ both the traitline and Dagger’s Life Siphon. That said, Dagger is still a very weird item with no outstanding feature in PvE, so no real point in using it or this trait. Movement speed is sometimes handy but Swiftness is common enough.

Blood Bond
Cast Lesser Signet of Vampirism on target if you inflict Bleeding on them so they’re at 4 or more stacks. Lesser Signet of Vampirism: same as Signet of Vampirism but only has 5 stacks. 16s ICD.

5 stacks every 16s seems very weak. The damage is pretty weak and can’t even crit but the healing is okay. It has the same issue as the regular version in that the Lifesteal can and will be wasted on full HP allies, meaning more often than not it’s just a bit of extra damage and not even good damage. A way to make this better is to possibly change the effect to “own Lifesteal also heals allies” or something like that, since it’s called “Blood Bond”. Might overlap Vampiric Presence a little bit though.

Vampiric
Each attack’s hit Lifesteals. Minions also Lifesteal and heal you for that amount too.

Has no ICD, so skills with a lot of attacks get the most benefit. Also makes having a lot of Minions worthwhile too since more Minions = more attacks. Basically just more Lifesteal, fitting the theme.

Life from Death
PBAoE heal & partially revive allies when exiting Shroud.

Healing / Support option. The only real Support spec for Necro is Scourge though since it has Barrier in its kit which obviously encourages building Healing Power. Overall it’s just extra healing / reviving, not that useful for other specs since they want to stay in Shroud for as long as possible and Scourge has a set time for their Shroud.

Banshee’s Wail
+50% Duration for all Warhorn skill effects (beneficial & detrimental). +10% Healing to others.

Useful if using Warhorn, otherwise there are better Traits to use. Not sure why Warhorn and Healing to others are coupled together, considering Warhorn has 0 healing capability. In fact there really aren’t any party healing weapon skills for Necro other than the single AoE regen on staff. While the Trait should be healing related, it feels shoehorned together with the Warhorn part.

Vampiric Presence
Pulsing PBAoE aura that giants Lifesteal to allies (0.5s ICD for Lifesteal procs). Doubled Lifesteal damage & healing while in Shroud.

Offensive / sustained healing option. Basically gives everyone their own Lifesteal (doesn’t stack w/ other Necros w/ this trait). As mentioned in Blood Bond, the suggested change would overlap but would make that Trait an actual option, short of lowering the CD from 16s to like 5s.

Last Rites
While not Downed, nearby allies do not bleed out while Downed. Gain Healing Power based on current HP%, increasing the lower you are.

Downed related Traits are useful but not that often in PvE, since in the ideal scenario no one gets Downed. Extra Healing Power the lower you are makes it more dynamic and effective when you need it most, though it’s essentially just a stat increase.

Blood Bank
Gaining HP gives 10% of it as a Barrier. Becomes 100% while at max HP.

Survivability via overheal option. Pretty cool unique effect that doesn’t really see much use since it’s best for Solo to make use of the Barrier but as Solo you don’t get as much healing. Definitely a PvP option.

Unholy Martyr
Entering Shroud transfers Conditions from allies to you (5 max). Exiting Shroud consumes Conditions (3 max) for Life Force per consumed.

Utility option. The issue is that it requires exiting Shroud for max value, while the best use of Shroud is more often than not maximising its duration. Can “combo” with Shrouded Removal which pulses cleansing while in Shroud but requiring 2 Traits for some decent Condition cleansing isn’t that worth it, especially in PvE. Might be worth it for certain PvP matchups.

Transfusion
Shroud skill 4 pulses healing & partial revival. Up to 5 downed allies will be teleported to you upon using Shroud skill 4.

Healing / support option. This is especially useful on Scourge because its mechanic is placing down persistent AoEs which means you can pull allies towards you from pretty far away to heal and revive them. It always pulses 9 times over the duration of each skill, so it technically heals the fastest on Reaper since its skill only lasts 2.75s but takes 9s for Harbinger which is yikes. Lots of healing & reviving in this traitline and this is no different. Its pull is the most powerful and unique aspect to the revives.
Soul Reaping - Shroud & Life Force

Gluttony
+10% Life Force from all sources.

This includes from kills, skills & Traits. A bit boring but fits the theme. More Life Force does mean more Shroud which, again, is the highlight of Necro.

Unyielding Blast
Shroud skill 1 inflicts 2 x Vulnerability.

More Vulnerability = more damage. Affects the Shroud’s “auto” (Scourge it affects all skills since using a skill causes Shades to “attack”) which is the filler and least impactful of Shroud skills but Vulnerability is always welcomed. Less effective on Boss enemies since everyone will be applying the debuff on it already.

Soul Marks
Marks (Staff AoEs) become Unblockable and generate Life Force when triggered.

Life Force option if using Staff. Unblockable doesn’t mean much in PvE, so it’s more of a PvP thing. Extra Life Force is handy for the Life Force hungry builds like healing / support.

Speed of Shadows
Entering Shroud removes movement Conditions & grants Swiftness.

Mobility option, meaning it’s a PvP option. Makes Shroud more powerful which is a good thing since it’s meant to feel like a powerful form.

Sinister Shroud
-15% Shroud skills CD.

Makes Shroud even more powerful. More skills = more damage (usually) = more player agency = more dopamine hits. It’s a bit boring but it does affect all Necros and is baseline if taking this traitline so it makes sense.

Soul Barbs
Entering or exiting Shroud grants +10% All Damage for 15s.

Damaging / Shroud option. All Shrouds have a 10s CD, except for Scourge which has a 20s CD. This means that you’re able to go into Shroud, stay in it for ~15s DPSing and then exit, use your other cooldowns + Utility skills for another 15s then re-enter. It changes the combat loop slightly to centre around the damage boost (you want to be doing this anyway but this gives a 15s timer).

Vital Persistence
Gain Vitality. +20% Incoming Healing.

Survivability option. Doesn’t really fit with the other choices as it affects neither the Shroud nor Life Force other than increasing the cap w/ the Vitality. It’s pretty boring, just makes you have a higher max HP and heal for more.

Fear of Death
Your Fear effects last twice as long. Inflicting Fear generates Life Force.

CC / Life Force option. Much more useful in PvP as Fear requires ticking to be effective and boss CC phases are usually short. Generates Life Force so it fits in the traitline unlike some other Traits.

Soul Battery
+20% Max Life Force (base = 69% of Max HP).

More max Life Force just means more effective HP since Life Force drains at a fixed % of the Max Life Force, so it doesn’t actually increase the time in Shroud. It does technically increase Life Force gained since they’re based on a % of Max Life Force too. Nice to have but nothing to play around, which fits since it’s a minor Trait.

Eternal Life
Gain Life Force every second not in Shroud up to 66%. Gain Protection upon entering Shroud.

Life Force / tanky option. If you really need Life Force generation, say there’s not enough things dying or not enough things to hit with Life Force skills, then it might be an option. Also makes you tankier in Shroud via Protection, meaning it’s a PvP option since in PvE others will be providing Protection. Like before, stronger Shroud = good.

Death Perception
+15% Crit Chance. +15% Crit Damage in Shroud.

Shroud / Power DPS option. Used to only give 50% Crit Chance but only in Shroud. Changing it to always give the Crit Chance and having Crit Damage in Shroud makes sense as you always want to aim for 100% crit (having more doesn’t do anything) but Crit Damage you want as much as possible. Improves Shroud so it becomes even more powerful, heightening its power fantasy. Also cute pun name.

Dhuumfire
Shroud skill 1 inflicts Burning on target. Scourge: 1s ICD. Harbinger: ⅓ duration.

Shroud / Condition DPS option. Take this if you’re a Condition build. ICD specifically for the Condition specs is a bit weird though, but seemingly there for damage balance purposes as base classes aren’t really played and Reaper is mostly a Power spec. Other than that, it’s just extra DoT damage doing something you’re already doing.

Reaper Combat
Melee oriented and focuses on Power damage which is something base Necro lacked.
There’s some Condition damage capabilities w/ Chill but with how wacky Combo fields are in their prioritisation, more often than not you will ignore your own Ice fields which is where a lot of your Chill comes from, making it inconsistent at best. 
There’s just not enough Chill application to warrant ever building around it.
Otherwise it’s similar to base Necro w/ the Life Force & Shroud, but changes it from Death Shroud to Reaper’s Shroud which degenerates slightly quicker.
Gains access to Greatsword, allowing new skills which are melee cleaving.
Gains access to Shout skills, PBAoE effects for just enemies.
Gains access to the Reaper traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specialisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Reaper Abilities
Reaper’s Shroud

Reaper’s Shroud -> Exit Reaper’s Shroud
Replace current weapon skills w/ the below. Also prevents Healing, Utility & Elite skills from being used (if Minions are summoned they stay summoned. Signet passives are gone unless otherwise stated). Turn Life Force into the current HP bar & take 33% reduced damage. Press again to exit, putting it on a 10s CD. Drains Life Force slightly faster than Death Shroud.

Aquatic version is pretty much the same but like always, will be ignored.

Life Rend -> Life Slash -> Life Reap
Frontal cleave.
Frontal cleave, more damage.
Frontal cleave, most damage. Life Force per target hit.

Your basic melee cleave combo. Makes sense for it to cleave as you’re using a big ass scythe. Damage ramps up as well. Life Force at the end pretty much extends the time you’re in Shroud, which also works along with a Trait which reduces all other Shroud CDs = more abilities = more damage = more player agency = more fun.

Death’s Charge
Combo Leap forward, destroying Projectiles and dealing PBAoE pulsing damage. PBAoE damage + Blind at the end.

Does decent damage, can be used as a gap closer and also has defensive utility w/ the projectile destruction + Blind. It does a whole bunch at once and since it’s only a 6s CD, you’re not really punished for just spamming it for damage. That does make it a little less interesting in the decision making department but again, 6s CD.

Infusing Terror -> Terrify
Give self 66% all damage reduction & 3 x Stability. Activate within 6s for:
PBAoE Fear. Removes the above DR.

Has an interesting decision to be made: DR or CC. The DR has been super increased in PvE since I last played a lot of Reaper (20% -> 66%) so now it’s probably just better for 6s of 66% damage reduction (+ Protection, Shroud DR, etc). There’s sometimes still a use for a PBAoE fear though and you can get both full effects if you time it correctly. Stability also helps since you’re melee. The DR has no cast time meaning it can be used even CC’d, making it great in emergencies.

Soul Spiral
4 x Combo Whirl for PBAoE damage & Poison.

The big damaging skill, for both Power & Condition (not keen on it). It does have a lengthy animation channel so you can be interrupted / accidentally cancel it. Other than that, there’s a Whirl that could be handy (more likely not though).

Executioner’s Scythe
Single target damage, increasing the lower they are. Stuns target. Creates an Ice Combo field that pulses Chill.

Has a decent animation time, so it’s actually a DPS loss if you use it while they’re >= 50% HP. So it starts out as just a CC skill and eventually becomes a fully fledged damaging skill once below 25% HP. Ice Combo field is also there for the Condition build (Chill = Bleed) but it’s also the only Ice Combo field Reaper / Necro has.

Greatsword
High damage & slow attacks w/ cleave. 2H.

Dusk Strike -> Fading Twilight -> Chilling Scythe
Frontal cleave & Life Force.
Frontal cleave, more damage & same Life Force.
Frontal cleave, most damage & most Life Force. Chills & resets Gravedigger CD.

Another basic melee combo. Attacks are pretty slow even compared to other Greatsword autos from other classes so it takes some getting used to. Resets the CD of Gravedigger, effectively making it a 4th part of the combo but much more flexible as you can’t break the combo. Chill is also there for certain Traits.

Gravedigger
3 x Combo Whirl for heavy PBAoE damage. Resets CD if hitting a Downed or <= 50% HP enemy.

Does heavy damage but has a decently long cast time so it’s easy to cancel. Pretty much replaces your auto once the enemy is under 50% HP outside of Life Force generation, which removes the combo counting in exchange for resource management. Skills that change the combat loop are more interesting.

Death Spiral
Combo Whirl for frontal cleave 6 x damage & 12 x Vulnerability. Gain Life Force per enemy hit per hit.

Does good damage & debuffing while recovering a decent chunk of Life Force, especially in AoE situations since it’s per hit (6x) per enemy. Other than that it’s more melee damage. Less than Gravedigger spam though, so again you need to manage Life Force in the execution phase.

Nightfall
Place a Dark Combo field beneath that pulses 4 x damage, Blindness, Cripple & Boon Corruption.

Does good damage and has a ton of utility. It’s unique from the other skills in that it persists after being casted, meaning you can enter Shroud and gain Shroud related buffs on it. This makes it overall stronger than the other skills. Utility effects aren’t worth holding the skill for in PvE, they’re more like a happy bonus.

Grasping Darkness
Frontal claws that damage, Chill & Pull enemies towards you. Life Force per enemy hit.

Has an annoying animation that can be cancelled with Nightfall or any weapon swapping (including Shroud). While there’s some skill expression in this, it’s ultimately arbitrary as to which skills have an animation cancel, meaning it’s inconsistent = unintentional. Mostly used for either the Pull utility or Life Force + Chill (for Traits). In group content, Pull is rarely useful for boss fights so that just leaves you using it on cooldown for the Life Force & Chill. If you really need a Pull, Spectral Grasp is a lot better since it doesn’t require aiming.

Shouts

“Your Soul Is Mine!” - Healing
Self heal + Life Force. PBAoE damage + Life Force per hit. Increased damage & Life Force per enemy hit in melee range.

Heals an okay amount compared to other heals. The main defining feature is the damage & Life Force generation. Even if there’s only 1 enemy, it restores 18% every 16s which is on par w/ weapon skills. This presents you with a choice between keeping it as a heal or using it for Life Force (which sometimes translates to HP in Shroud anyway). Unique melee bonuses fit the Reaper theme (melee Necro). Definitely the offensive option if you don’t want to use a pet.

“Nothing Can Save You!” - Utility
PBAoE damage. Converts 2 Boons into 6 x Vulnerability. Next 10 attacks are Unblockable. Increased damage & Unblockable hits per enemy hit in melee range.

The PvP option as Boon removal / “Corruption” + Unblockable are a lot more useful in PvP than it is in PvE. Same notes about melee bonuses apply. The “Corruption” not being a true Corruption makes sense since most Conditions aren’t that useful for Power builds other than the CC ones. Since it’s consistently the damage taken debuff, you can plan around it and get CC from other skills.

“Rise!” - Utility
PBAoE damage. Summon a Minion + additional Minion per enemy hit (max 5). Increased damage + additional Minion per enemy hit in melee range. Minions take 33% of damage you would’ve taken. Unblockable.

The Minion / tanky option. Summons a crap ton of Minions which all interact w/ Minion traits. Take it if you’re going for that build. They also tank damage for you which makes it the tanky option. Less damage taken during Shroud means more time in it for more damage. Less useful for the defensive side in group content. Same notes about melee range bonuses apply.

“Suffer!” - Utility
PBAoE damage & Chill. Transfer a Condition to each enemy hit. Increased damage & additional Condition transferred per enemy hit in melee range.

Condition cleansing option. Unique in that it’s a relatively low CD and also provides Chill for Reaper traits. Can also be kind of seen as the Condition option since Reaper Condition uses Chill & you can transfer self inflicted Conditions. Same notes about melee range bonuses apply.

“You Are All Weaklings!” - Utility
Breaks stun & gain 5 x Might + PBAoE damage & Weakness. Bonus Might per enemy hit. Increased damage & additional Might per enemy hit in melee range.

Offensive option. Does the most damage out of all the Shouts and gives an offensive Boon to boot. There’s also a stun break but it’s not that strong since nothing stops you from being CC’d again. Still it’s a nice burst of damage which can be pseudo used defensively too, giving you options. Same notes about melee range bonuses apply.

“Chilled to the Bone!” - Elite
PBAoE damage, Stun & Chilled. Gain 2 x Stability, 2 x Might & Fury per enemy hit. Increased damage, Stun & Quickness per enemy hit in melee range.

Compared to the other Elites, it’s the lowest CD so you get to use it more often. Does the most amount of CC damage if you’re melee range on normal sized hitbox enemies (the Minion does more if the hitbox is large which isn’t good design, should be consistent). Damage burst is decent while being on a reasonable CD, unlike Lich Form with its 2.5 minute CD. It’s a solid option for Reaper since it also provides Boons and Conditions that help Reaper keep on top of enemies as a melee (Chilled, Stability & Quickness). The only downside is its lengthy cast time compared to other non-Channelled shouts (which are almost all instant). Having a long cast time in PvP makes sense for counterplay, less so in PvE.

Traits

Shroud Knight
Death Shroud turns into Reaper’s Shroud. Life Force drain in Shroud 3% -> 4%. Gain access to Shouts.

Like always, added here since it’s the 1st trait.

Augury of Death
Shouts Lifesteal, doubled against melee targets.

Could be useful if you’re using a lot of Shouts (5 slots). Previously reduced the CD of Shouts instead of the melee bonus. While the melee range bonus fits the theme of the Reaper Shouts, trading more uses of Shout & their utility effects for more damage or healing (at most an extra 500 damage / HP) doesn’t seem worth it, especially compared to Chilling Nova.

Chilling Nova
Crits against Chilled enemies cause a Chilling Nova explosion. 3s ICD.
Chilling Nova: AoE damage & Chill. Can’t crit.

Glad to see it being a guaranteed proc on Crit unlike other Traits. While its effects aren’t too crazy, it’s the Chill that’s most important as Chill isn’t that readily available compared to other Conditions and Reaper relies on Chill for certain Traits (see below). Plus adding an extra explosion to Crits makes them feel better, even if you’re at 100% Crit Chance like most Power builds. Not Critting is a PvP thing where Crit isn’t guaranteed and you can’t convince me otherwise, just split the damn balance already.

Relentless Pursuit
-33% Duration of Movement Conditions. -66% while in Shroud (not retroactive).

PvP option as movement Conditions aren’t an issue in PvE. It’s not retroactive either meaning it will have to be applied on you while you’re in Shroud for it to get the higher reduction. It’s useful for a melee based class but not worth a Trait slot in PvE.

Shivers of Dread
Inflicting Fear inflicts Chill.

This only affects a handful of skills so its effectiveness is very limited. Still it does help with Chill uptime a little bit (only 2s per application) but that’s fine for a Minor Trait.

Soul Eater
Attacks in melee range deal +10% Strike Damage & heal 4%. Healing not applicable while in Shroud.

Used to recharge Greatsword skills 20% faster + heal & grant Life Force while wielding a Greatsword. The change from weapon specific to just being in melee range makes it a lot more versatile. Making the healing active rather than passive makes it feel more impactful too. Original version made Greatsword Lifesteal & Gravedigger recharge other skills slightly on hit. The damage bonus achieves the same goal as both CDR iterations, so it’s effectively the same goal that’s being achieved but via a more universal way.

Chilling Victory
Attacking a Chilled enemy grants 1 x Might & 1% Life Force. 1s ICD.

This might be useful in PvP? The Might doesn’t last that long and it’s only 1 stack + it’s very little Life Force w/ an ICD too so it doesn’t seem to be very useful in PvE. ICD is fine to normalise its effectiveness in single target vs AoE but does limit how strong this Trait is.

Decimate Defenses
+2% Crit Chance per Vulnerability stack on an enemy (max 50% w/ 25 stacks).

Formerly the premier DPS option as it was universal while the other one wasn’t. But w/ the changes to Soul Eater, this leaves this Trait as objectively inferior. 100% Crit Chance could be achieved without it without too much damage loss. While the Vulnerability requirement isn’t too hard to fulfil, it still is a constraint while being melee isn’t since Reaper is a melee spec anyway, you won’t be dealing any damage at ranged most of the time so there’s no loss in always being melee.

Cold Shoulder
+20% Chill duration. +15% Strike Damage against Chilled enemies.

Extra duration is nice for Chill uptime. The main feature is the huge damage bonus against Chilled enemies, putting a lot of importance in maintaining Chill uptime.

Blighter’s Boon
+1% Life Force when granting self a Boon or removing a Boon from an enemy. If in Shroud, heal instead of the Life Force.

Life Force option. Could be useful if you’re really starved for Life Force but w/ Greatsword skills and maybe 1 or 2 Utilities, you should be fine. Healing component is more useful in PvP w/ the lack of a dedicated healer.

Deathly Chill
Applying Chill applies 4 x Bleeding.

What gives Reaper a Condition damage option. It’s not that great though as Chill is pretty limited compared to other Conditions. Proccing Chilling Nova requires a crit which is normally not part of a Condition build’s stats. There’s some Crit from Decimate Defenses but requiring 3 total Traits to make a build function makes it feel like it’s not really intended to be the main source of damage.

Reaper’s Onslaught
Gain Ferocity & Quickness in Shroud. Quickness lasts 3s and is reapplied every 3s. Hitting Life Reap (end of Shroud auto chain) reduces the CD of other Shroud skills by 1s.

Power damage option. Makes Shroud even more powerful (same notes about it being the strong form). Quickness makes it feel better to use the skills, especially the longer animation ones. Active CDR via completing the melee combo feels a lot better than a generic 20% recharge boost.

Scourge Combat
Loses Shroud form but gains access to summoning Shades & their abilities always (pending Life Force). Shade skills activate at each Shade + around the Scourge. Traits relating to Shroud activate w/ Desert Shroud (5th Shade ability).
Overall it’s a hybrid Condition & Support spec.
Gains access to Torch for an off-hand Condition weapon.
Gains access to Punishment skills which involve Corrupting Boons into Torment + ally support.
Gains access to the Scourge traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specialisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Scourge Abilities
Shade

Manifest Sand Shade
Create a Sand Shade at the target location. Using other Shade abilities causes PBAoE damage & Torment around you and each Shade. 3 charges. Targets can only be affected by 1 instance (can’t bomb a target by placing 3 by you).

Being able to place multiple ranged AoEs that deal the same effects as the ones around you gives you a lot of zone control. Less useful in PvE but still handy. Damage does activate when using any Shade skill, including this one so for DPS it sort of just boils down to pressing down every button at once which isn’t that interesting. It does have opportunity cost since using those skills will obviously not be useful if you don’t need the cleanse, Barrier or CC so there’s some decision making involved.

Nefarious Favor
PBAoE Condition conversion to Boon.

Relatively low CD of 5s, so there’s less risk in using it to proc the damage. The cleanse doesn’t affect many allies, only 3 total and it only cleanses 1 Condition per ally so it’s more of a consistent cleanse; less useful in PvE compared to PvP.

Sand Cascade
PBAoE Barrier.

Decently sized Barrier. This has a longer CD of 10s so there’s more risk in using it for damage. Barrier only lasts for a couple of seconds so you run the risk of wasting the effective HP if you use it incorrectly / for damage.

Garish Pillar
PBAoE Fear.

Even longer CD of 15s. Fear doesn’t last that long but considering it could affect 12 enemies at 4 different locations, it makes sense.

Desert Shroud
Grant self Barrier. PBAoE pulsing damage & Torment.

Longest CD of 20s, twice the usual Shroud CD. Fits the usual “powerful form” that other Shrouds have w/ the Barrier & Pulsing damage. Much of the Shade skill power is in its interaction w/ the Traits, including the base Necro ones (ranged revive + pull, Burning on every “attack”, etc).

Torch
Off-hand Condition weapon w/ some support.

Harrowing Wave
Frontal damage, Burning & Torment. Gain 3% Life Force per enemy hit (max 15%).

Frontal damage, not much else to say. Necro doesn’t have a good off-hand Condition weapon other than off-hand Dagger so this is trying to fix that. Extra bit of Life Force is also nice and is the only useful thing for healer builds.

Oppressive Collapse
Single target ranged damage & Torment. Knockdown after a delay. Grant 2 x Might to nearby allies per Condition enemy has (max 24).

Can be used for some damage + Might or saved for CC. Provides more utility than the other skill so there’s some more decision making involved. Might + CC are also useful for support builds. Realistically enemies will have around 9 or 10 Conditions on them on a consistent basis so that’s still a decent amount of Might in group content.

Punishment

Sand Flare - Healing
Heal self & grant self Barrier. Convert a Boon to 3 x Torment for nearby enemies.

Sacrifices healing in exchange for Barrier & the Boon Corruption. Total healing if Barrier fully blocks is roughly the same as the other heals. All Punishment skills have their power budget in the Boon -> Torment conversion, which leaves a lot to be desired in PvE since most mobs don’t have Boons. Condition & Support hybrid w/ emphasis on Boon removal is pretty niche. For it to be better in PvE, it needs either a baseline Torment application or something like “if already affected by Torment”.

Trail of Anguish - Utility
Breaks stun. Leave a trail behind you as you move that grants Swiftness & Stability for allies + damages, Burns & converts a Boon into 3 x Torment for enemies.

An okay stun break as it gives you the means to ignore CC once and run faster while discouraging enemies from chasing you (at least in PvP). Same notes about Punishment apply.

Desiccate - Utility
PBAoE damage, Boon Corruption to 3 x Torment & 5 x Might. Grants Life Force + bonus per hit.

Offensive support option w/ the damage & Might. Life Force is pretty handy as always. Same notes about Punishment apply.

Sand Swell - Utility
Delayed blink that creates a portal from start to finish. Grants allies who use it Barrier. PBAoE damage & Boon Corruption for 3 x Torment.

Pretty handy utility / support skill w/ the portal. It’s more restrictive than other portals since it requires a valid path behind beginning & end (can’t be used to go up a ledge) and is shorter but does provide Barrier & the usual Boon Corruption. Same notes about Punishment apply.

Serpent Siphon - Utility
Ground targeted AoE for damage, Poison & Boon Corruption to 3 x Torment. Hitting an enemy drops orbs that grant allies Barrier.

Offensive healing option w/ the damage & Barrier. The orbs are a pretty annoying implementation as a single ally can walk over them and consume them all for themselves unintentionally, especially w/ the visual noise in the game. Better application would just be an AoE of Barrier upon hitting the skill. Same notes about Punishment apply.

Ghastly Breach - Elite
Dark Combo field that pulses Damage, 3 x Might, Slow, Burning & Boon Corruption to 3 x Torment.

Compared to Plaguelands, it does less overall damage & applies less Conditions in exchange for some Might, a Slow (better in PvP), Boon Corruption & a Dark field. Half of these effects are strictly better for PvP, the other half are more support oriented which is welcome but they’re not that strong (Might lasts 6s, Combo fields have janky prioritisation). Overall this seals the deal for Scourge to be a PvP spec w/ its hybridisation and Boon Corruption effects.

Traits

Mantle of Sand
Gain access to Shade skills in exchange for the usual Shroud. Gain access to Punishment skills.

As usual, including it because it’s the 1st trait.

Abrasive Grit
Sand Flare now also grants the Barrier to allies. Granting Barrier via Scourge skills or Traits removes a Condition from them.

Support option. Sand Flare used to be PBAoE Barrier by default. Extra cleansing via Barrier is helpful sometimes, moreso in PvP. Line about Scourge skills / Trait is meant to cover edge cases of weapons you can pick up, though I don’t think any do. More like future proofing from wacky interactions. Take it if supporting.

Fell Beacon
-20% Torch skills CD. Gain Expertise (bonus Condition Duration stat) based on 7% of Condition Damage.

DPS option. More Torch skills = more Torment = more damage. More Expertise means you can spend less of your gear stat budget on Condition Duration and more on Condition Damage = more DPS overall. Overall a simple trait, nothing crazy.

Nourishing Ashes
Gain 5% Life Force when inflicting Burning, removing or Corrupting a Boon. 3s ICD.

Life Force option. Life Force isn’t really that much of an issue to warrant spending this Trait on. Mostly a PvP issue where you use Shroud Life Force HP / Shade skills (Barriers) a lot more to survive. Burning + Boon makes sense, not sure why Torment isn’t included since it’s part of the Scourge theme too, more than Burning.

Sand Sage
Gain Concentration & Expertise for each active Sand Shade.

More Boon & Condition duration for using Shades. Funny thing is that Scourge & Necro in general don’t really grant that many Boons, so Concentration goes mostly wasted. With the introduction of Harbinger, it makes Scourge’s Condition aspect feel really redundant. Should push this more into the meta support builds where it’s a healer + Boons (Might, Fury + Quickness or Alacrity) or support DPS + Boons. Currently it’s purely healing or subpar DPS w/ very little Boon support, reiterating its PvP-ness.

Desert Empowerment
Manifest Sand Shade “attack” grants a Barrier to nearby allies.

Support option. Grants persistent Barriers which can help if there’s constant damage, otherwise the Barrier will go to waste since it degenerates after ~5s. One way it could play into the Barrier identity is that each “attack” grants a stack that makes the next Sand Cascade + Desert Shroud grant more Barrier, since Barriers strength is in preventing damage which is most effective against big bursts in most fight designs.

Sadistic Searing
-20% Punishment skill CD & causes the next Manifest Sand Shade “attack” to inflict Burning in addition to its other effects.

Offensive option if using Punishments. Unfortunately Punishment skills have some of their power budget in the Boon Corruption which isn’t useful in PvE at all, meaning it loses out to the base Necro utility skills in terms of Condition damage. PvP option.

Herald of Sorrow
Desert Shroud upgrades to Sandstorm Shroud. It’s cheaper, backloads its effect in a detonation rather than pulsing + detonation grants allies Barrier, damages, 6 x Torments & Corrupts Boons.

Completely changes how the skill works which is pretty cool, opting for burst rather than pulsing effects. However, it does less damage and applies less Torment compared to being hit by all the pulses which is the case in PvE. The detonation delay is very telegraphed so it’s pretty easy to dodge in PvP. The only benefit is that it grants Barrier to allies + Corrupts Boons, but it loses out to the other options. Not really sure why its effects are so weak relative to not taking the Trait.

Blood as Sand
-5% All Incoming Damage per active Sand Shade.

Extra tankiness, which helps since the Barrier gained in exchange for losing the ability to use Life Force as HP isn’t always there to block damage. Also the other Shrouds inherently take reduced damage anyway (33%), this is just giving an effect back. Yes Shroud is less common than having a Sand Shade out but it feels like this should be baseline.

Sand Savant
Limited to 1 Sand Shade. Charge CD 8s -> 10s. Max total targets 12 -> 10 (5 each, you and the Shade). Radius of all Shade abilities increased. Counts as 3 Shades for related Traits.

Utility option. In PvE, it’s the support option since in group content there’s usually only 1 enemy, meaning the target increase is for the ally components. More allies hit = more Barriers, cleanses, etc. Since you require less charge uses to hit slightly fewer allies, it’s actually more flexible in where you place the Shade despite the slight CD increase. This section could use a better support option though, and this could be the healing / Barrier option w/ your Barriers last longer or % convert to healing if expiring. Other options currently don’t present a way to include an offensive / Boon support option though, as 1 is DPS and the other is solely on Corruption which is irrelevant in PvE. Possibly requires a theme shift for Feed from Corruption, but keeping the Boon aspect.

Demonic Lore
+25% Torment damage you inflict. If an enemy is inflicted w/ your Torment, it will Burn for 3s, reapplying every 3s.

DPS option. Extra damage is nice but a little boring. Burning is essentially just more damage but implemented in a more unique way. 

Feed from Corruption
Whenever you remove or Corrupt a Boon, gain it (has its own base duration & stacks).

PvP option. Not only does it require Boon Corruption, its benefit is that it grants Boons which is much more valuable in PvP where you're without dedicated supports. Fits the theme for Scourge + Punishment skills though, while also affecting some base skills.

Harbinger Combat
Gains access to Harbinger Shroud at the cost of Death Shroud. Has its unique skills.
Still drains Life Force but no longer uses it as a secondary HP bar. Additionally gains Blight while in Shroud (or hitting self with Elixirs) which decreases your max HP by 1.5%, up to 37.5%. Consume Blight stacks via Devouring Cut, Voracious Arc or Elixirs to increase their damage + Condition Duration. Each stack has its own duration.
High risk high reward gameplay as you’re now a squishy caster. Still have the most HP out of the casters but armour is lowest.
Condition damage based, overlapping w/ Scourge a lot.
Gains access to Pistol for another main hand Condition weapon.
Gains access to Elixirs, providing support via Boons & Conditions.
Gains access to the Harbinger traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specialisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Harbinger Abilities
Harbinger Shroud

Harbinger Shroud -> Exit Harbinger Shroud
Replace current weapon skills w/ the below. Also prevents Healing, Utility & Elite skills from being used (if Minions are summoned they stay summoned. Signet passives are gone unless otherwise stated). Does NOT turn Life Force into the current HP bar nor do you get any extra DR while in Shroud. Gain Blight stacks while in Shroud or hitting self w/ Elixirs which reduce your max HP by 1.5% (max 37.5%). Blight stacks are used to empower certain Shroud skills + Elixirs. Press again to exit, putting it on a 10s CD. Drains Life Force faster than Death Shroud (3% -> 5%).

Aquatic version is pretty much the same but like always, will be ignored.

Tainted Bolts
Ranged targeted AoE that damages & Torments.

Pretty normal ranged attack for a Condition based spec. Mid-long range and it has an AoE so there’s no complaints about its usability.

Dark Barrage
Ranged piercing 6 x damage & Torment.

Relatively low CD of ranged Condition attacks. Piercing makes it better when enemies are lined up for you vs. a clump but that doesn’t really matter in PvE. There’s no other effect like CC or Combos so it’s a use on cooldown type of skill.

Devouring Cut
Mid ranged gap closer for PBAoE damage. If >=5 Blight stacks, consume it (5) for double damage + 5 x Torment.

Bit of an animation lock so there’s risk in using it. Can either save it as a gap closer or use it on CD for damage, giving you a decision to make (but gap closers aren’t really that needed in PvE most of the time). CD is only 8s so you’re not vulnerable without it for too long. It stops at the target so you won’t get any weird interactions. Damage seems to go out after a certain distance through the dash no matter how long the dash is, but since the AoE size is pretty big it shouldn’t matter. Has the Blight interaction, encouraging you to only use it while you have stacks: risk reward.

Voracious Arc
Mid ranged gap closer w/ Evade for PBAoE damage & Daze. If >=5 Blight stacks, consume it (5) for double damage + 5 x Torment.

Same as the above except the gap closer is less risky due to being quicker and having an Evade component, which could be used to dodge some mechanics. It also comes with a short Daze so there’s an option to save it for CC but it’s not that strong so there’s no harm in using it as DPS. 10s CD which isn’t too bad either, can use it for any of the above reasons without too much risk. Same notes about Blight risk reward.

Vital Draw
Place a pulsing AoE field (not Combo) for damage, Float & Life Force per enemy hit.

Doesn’t have any Torment on it so it’s purely for the Float (CC) or Life Force. Use it for either of those reasons when you need them, not much else to say. Very handy for solo play since it’s 3s of AoE CC, albeit on a 20s CD.

Pistol
Main-hand ranged Condition damage.

Vicious Shot
Single target mid-high range damage & Torment. Bounces twice, 20% Combo projectile.

Another attack you’d expect from a ranged Condition skill. Bounces make it more unique than an AoE on the 1st target but other than that it’s the usual.

Weeping Shots
Mid-high ranged piercing barrage of 6 x damage, Torment & Vulnerability. Gain Life Force per bullet. Each shot is a 20% Combo projectile.

Another standard skill. Torment & Vulnerability both needed for DPS. Piercing makes it usable in AoE situations. Gives Life Force which you’ll need more of since it drains quicker than normal. Use it on cooldown since there’s no reason not to.

Vile Blast
Mid-high ranged targeted AoE damage, Poison, Weakness & Stun. Gain Life Force per target hit.

Pretty much the same as the above, again, but AoE at target rather than piercing. As long as it’s not just single target it's fine. Does have a small Stun attached to it so you can hold it for that but it does do a lot of Condition damage so a choice needs to be made. Otherwise, same notes as the above.

Elixirs

Elixir of Promise - Healing
Heal self & Regen on cast. Ground targeted AoE damage & Poison. If you’re in the AoE, gain 10 Blight. If >=5 Blight stacks on cast, consume that for double the damage & Poison duration.

Offensive Condition DPS heal since it Poisons enemies. It heals for a decent amount and has an okay Regen on it too which works w/ the loss of Blight stacks since it only gives you back your Max HP, it doesn’t also heal you by that value. 10 Blight is a lot to get in a short amount of time (each second in Shroud gives 2) which is both good for the extra effect thresholds and bad due to the lower HP risk. Has the threshold mechanic like all other Elixirs. The Poison is the only offensive Condition out of all the Elixirs so this is actually part of the DPS rotation. Obviously that comes w/ the additional risk of not having a heal but that’s what healers are for.

Elixir of Risk - Utility
Grant self 10 x Might & Fury on cast. Ground targeted AoE damage & Weakness. If you’re in the AoE, gain 10 Blight. If >=5 Blight stacks on cast, consume that for double damage & Weakness duration.

Offensive Elixir as it grants Might & Fury. Has decent uptime if you have max Boon duration (20s w/ 25s CD) but obviously that comes at a damage cost. There is a Trait that grants the Boons to allies in the explosion radius too, allowing a support build. Condition is Weakness so it’s not that useful in PvE. Same notes about Elixirs apply.

Elixir of Anguish - Utility
Grant self Swiftness & Quickness on cast. Ground targeted AoE damage & Cripple. If you’re in the AoE, gain 10 Blight. If >=5 Blight stacks on cast, consume that for double damage & Cripple duration.

The other offensive / utility Elixir, granting Quickness & Swiftness which both can be used offensively and defensively. Quickness only lasts 5s so it alone won’t be able to permanently maintain the Boon. Same notes about Elixirs apply.

Elixir of Bliss - Utility
Grant self Resolution & cleanse 5 x Conditions for 3% Life Force each. Ground targeted AoE damage & 1 x Boon Corruption per target. If you’re in the AoE, gain 10 Blight. If >=5 Blight stacks on cast, consume that for double damage & 2 extra Boon Corruptions per target.

Condition defensive option, granting Resolution & cleansing Conditions. Resolution doesn’t last that long so you’ll have to time it properly rather than throwing it out on CD. Trait that grants Boons doesn’t include the cleansing capability, so it will only be the 5s of Resolution which could be useful depending on what you need (many Power Guardians would like it). Same notes about Elixirs apply.

Elixir of Ignorance - Utility
Breaks stun & grants self Resistance. Ground targeted AoE damage & Blindness. If you’re in the AoE, gain 10 Blight. If >=5 Blight stacks on cast, consume that for double damage & Blindness duration.

CC defensive option, granting Resistance & breaking stun. Again it only lasts 5s so use when you need, not 100% of the time. Okay as a stun break since it also blinds but that requires you hitting the threats w/ it, if they’re spread / immune then it’s a weak stun break. Same notes as the above, except instead of Conditions it’s CC.

Elixir of Ambition - Elite
Grant self every Boon w/ 5s duration (25 stacks for Might). Ground targeted AoE for damage & all damaging Conditions. If you’re in the AoE, gain 15 Blight. If >=5 Blight stacks on cast, consume that for double damage & Condition duration.

Being able to grant your subgroup 5s of every Boon when specced (more if building it) while also inflicting enemies w/ all damaging Conditions is insane. Compared to Plaguelands it’s definitely more party utility focused which is the tradeoff. Being able to use it at the beginning of fights / during burst means it guarantees there’s no ramp up for players in your group = max damage from the get go. If that’s what you need, then you should pick it. Otherwise Plaguelands will do more in a selfish way. Same notes about Elixirs apply.

Traits

Dark Disciple
Replaces Death Shroud with Harbinger Shroud & explains its Blight mechanics. Grants access to Elixirs.

As always, included because it’s the 1st trait.

Wicked Corruption
+0.5% Strike Damage per Blight stack (max 12.5%). +10% Crit Damage against Tormented enemies.

Power DPS option. Take it if you’re building for Power damage. Extra Crit damage against Tormented enemies fits since the majority of the Shroud abilities apply Torment. It’s basically just a damage boost w/ a thematic restriction which isn’t really a restriction given how much Torment there is in Shroud + Pistol.

Vile Vials
-20% Elixir skill CDs & they additionally inflict 5 x Vulnerability.

Utility / support option, especially paired w/ the other Elixir trait that spreads Boons. A bit boring though + the Vulnerability isn’t that useful since there’s a bunch from other Necro traitlines + other players to reach 25.

Septic Corruption
+0.5% Condition Damage (damage, not stat) per Blight stack (max 12.5%). Dark Barrage (Shroud 2) also inflicts Poison.

Condition DPS option. Like the Power option, take it if building for Condition damage. Adds an extra DoT to one of the skills you’re using on CD (since it only does damage). It’s another way of saying “deal more damage” like the Crit damage one, just slightly more interesting & can interact w/ other Traits / effects vs. +X% Condition Duration or whatever.

Alchemic Vigor
Gain Vitality. Heal every second per stack of Blight.

Reduces the risk from Blight since you have more HP + slowly heal it back up when you consume / lose Blight stacks. Also interacts w/ the following Traits that all have a Vitality conversion rate.

Implacable Foe
Gain 3 x Stability when entering Shroud. Gain Ferocity based on 13% of Vitality.

Power DPS + defensive option. Doesn’t give an effect that helps w/ Power damage though as Stability’s usefulness isn’t only helpful for Power nor does it have any interaction like “deal more damage w/ Stability” which wouldn’t fit thematically anyway. Makes it fall behind the Condition counterpart which is probably why you don’t see much of it. Could possibly have something w/ more Strike damage per Blight stack, increased at melee or something to emphasise the risk reward thing (may overlap w/ Reaper).

Twisted Medicine
Elixirs also grant their Boons to allies within the impact zone. Gain Concentration based on 13% of Vitality.

Support option. Makes the Elixirs 5x as effective + gives you some Concentration so you need to spend less to get max uptime on Boons. Choice being placed w/ DPS traits pretty much forces down the damage support DPS builds can do, which makes sense as you don’t want something topping the charts while also being the main provider of support.

Dark Gunslinger
-20% Pistol skills CD. Gain Expertise based on 13% of Vitality.

Condition option. More Pistol skills = more DoTs. More Expertise = more of the gear power budget spent on Condition Damage instead. Most boring of the 3 since the 2 Pistol skills w/ CDs are used on CD, MAYBE holding the Stun one.

Corrupted Talent
Gain 15% Life Force when entering Shroud.

Helps w/ Life Force resource management. Optimal use is to enter Shroud while at 85% to make sure nothing is wasted (bonus Life Force or time not in Shroud) so while it’s a very simple Trait, it does add an extra layer to the resource management game.

Cascading Corruption
Gain Power. While in Shroud, pulse PBAoE damage & Cripple.

Power DPS option. Range is pretty short so it’s practically melee, reinforcing the high risk vs. reward design philosophy. Other than that it’s just damage & some Cripple utility, although that’s never the deciding factor. Cripple doesn’t interact w/ Power builds either, making it overall weaker when compared 1 to 1 w/ the Condition variant.

Deathly Haste
While in Shroud, pulse PBAoE Quickness & Fury.

Support option. Take it if you’re supporting. Like the other support option, it’s placed against 2 other DPS options, limiting its damage which is correct. Its radius is twice the size of the other 2 for obvious reasons as you’re aiming for allies not enemies.

Doom Approaches
Gain Condition Damage. While in Shroud, pulse 3 x Torment & Weakness.

Condition DPS option. Exact same notes as the Power version. Weakness is not a selling point but is nice to have, especially since other classes synergise w/ it (Weaver) and it has a decent uptime (66% without any Condition duration, which DoT builds usually go for 100% / double base duration).

Mesmer
Mesmer Combat
Pretty cool archetype; I like all things magic and this is no exception.
Clones (max 3) + Phantasms (no max but set duration) are like pets, but without any of the drawbacks: you can customise them since they look like you. They don’t require any management other than the initial target and they don’t last that long most of the time so there’s less time for any annoyances.
Phantasms are more powerful than Clones but only last long enough for an attack, after which they respawn as a Clone.
Clones are weak in both HP and damage.
Standard 2 weapon skill bars, swapping in combat has a cooldown.
Profession mechanic revolves around destroying Clones for PBAoE effects around them and yourself. Shattered clones all run towards your target and a target can be hit by multiple shatters. Effects range from Power damage, Condition damage, CC & Invulnerability called Distortion.
Clones are generated from weapon skills, Utility skills & Traits. Their weapon is determined by your main hand (or 2H) weapon.
Medium HP but lowest armour like other casters. This is offset by the in-built Invulnerability that’s always available to Mesmer.
Has access to Ethereal Combo fields, fitting w/ the Mesmer’s Illusion theme well.
Mesmer Abilities
Shatters

Mind Wrack
Destroy all Clones for PBAoE damage.

Power option. Damage per clone actually goes down the more Clones you have, but since there’s a 12s CD and w/ all the Clone generation, it’s still optimal to use at 3 Clones. Having the Clones run to the target makes the ranged ones actually usable for damage. 

Cry of Frustration
Destroy all Clones for PBAoE damage & Confusion.

Same as the above, but for Condition. Strike Damage is less than Mind Wrack but if you’re overflowing w/ Clones this is an option. Otherwise, the same notes apply.

Diversion
Destroy all Clones for PBAoE Daze (that only hits 1 enemy). Cannot be Dazed again by this skill until it wears off. Damage to CC bars can occur together.

Not being able to be Dazed again until the previous one runs out is a bit annoying but I suppose that beats 4s of not being able to do anything (in PvP anyway, who cares about the feelings of mobs). This can be bypassed by having a mix of melee and ranged clones but no one is going to build around that; it’s just a nuance to keep track of. Otherwise, use it if you need CC. The above doesn’t apply for CC bars which is the main bulk of CC importance anyway in PvE.

Distortion
Destroy call Clones for 1s of Distortion, making you immune to Damage, Conditions & CC. Gain 1s for every Clone destroyed.

True immunity on demand is pretty great, especially w/ how squishy casters are. Or are they squishy because of this. Either way it can be used very well or very poorly, giving a lot of room for skill expression especially w/ the 50s CD. Use it in emergencies or use it to cheese mechanics; immunity is very powerful & versatile.

Greatsword
2H ranged weapon w/ focus on AoE damage & CC.

Spatial Surge
Ranged beam that damages the target and 2 closest in the beam AoE, for more damage if they’re farther away from you.

Pretty standard ranged beam attack. Would’ve much preferred this or some sort of variation compared to Hammer for Catalyst but that’s just me (also not relevant to Mesmer whoops). Damage difference isn’t too much to worry about moving away and you can always prioritise using the other weapon’s filler attacks. Damaging falling off the farther away you are makes sense as a tradeoff for the range.

Mirror Blade
Ranged damaging attack that bounces between enemies & allies. Damage is reduced per bounce. Allies gain 3 x Might & enemies gain 3 x Vulnerability. Spawn a Clone at the 1st target (it doesn’t get hit by any of the bounces) that uses Spatial Surge.

Pseudo AoE since it bounces but also works in single target situations since it can bounce off of you too if you’re in range. Provides some support w/ Might & Vulnerability but they don’t last long enough and Greatsword overall doesn’t warrant building duration stats. The main use is for the damage & the Clone spawning, especially w/ the low CD of 5s. So it ends up w/ being used on CD.

Mind Stab
Ground targeted AoE that damages & Cripples.

Does decent damage and the Cripple isn’t that useful in PvE, so it’s another use on CD damaging skill. Also it has a satisfying stab in the ground and an illusion stabs the enemy, pretty cool.

Phantasmal Berserker
Ranged piercing damaging attack that strips 2 x Boons from enemies hit. Spawn a Phantasm by the 1st target hit. It will do a moving Combo Whirlwind attack that damages & Cripples. It will then spawn a Greatsword Clone.

As a Phantasm skill, it’s the highest priority due to the damage + the Clone generation afterwards. What’s not great about the Whirlwind attack is that it can hit up to 4 times; it’s hitbox dependent which is annoying. Other than that the Boon removal isn’t useful in PvE so that makes it even easier to use on CD. The Clone it spawns is the same as the one from Mirror Blade, using a Greatsword.

Illusionary Wave
Frontal cone damage & knockback.

Strictly for CC as the damage is really low which is fine since not every skill needs to be part of a DPS rotation. Also requires you to be in short-ish range so there’s some risk but the cone is pretty big so in the case you’re being swarmed it’s pretty handy. Overall, it’s to be used against melee that get near you to make some space as a ranged weapon.

Staff
2H ranged weapon w/ focus on support (Boons & Conditions).

Winds of Chaos
Ranged bouncing projectile that damages enemies. The 1st gets Torment and the subsequent enemies get Confusion. Allies get both Fury & 1 x Might. The Clone version has a shorter duration for the Conditions.

Ranged attack that applies both Boons & Conditions, fitting the support role. They don’t last very long but it can bounce a couple of times + the Clones do the same attack so they also apply them, albeit at a lower duration for the Conditions (since they’re meant to do less damage than you).

Phase Retreat
Blink away from the target, counting as a Combo Leap. Summon a Clone that casts Winds of Chaos. Clone only spawns if there’s a target, but it can be used without a target to blink backwards.

Choice between a blink and a Clone (i.e. damage most of the time). There’s also a Combo Leap but that only gives Auras which aren’t that useful, even on a class that specialises in them like Ele. Can also be used under some CC effects like knocked down; it will blink back but you’re still CC’d so it’s still a decent defensive skill on a lowish CD of 10s. A bit annoying as a Clone generator though since you’ll want to move back to where you were for heals, buffs, mechanics, etc.

Phantasmal Warlock
Summon 2 x Phantasms that deal damage & 2 x Vulnerability to target via a beam, similar to Spatial Surge. Transforms into the same Clone as the one in Phase Retreat.

Phantasm skill. Since it doesn’t do anything other than damage + summon Clones (which is also damage), you just use it on cooldown. They spawn near you and have a long range attack so you can sort of plan where the Clones will be for Shatters. Since there’s 2 there’s more Clones for more damage. Ranged clones on a ranged weapon.

Chaos Armor
Grant self Chaos Aura (Protection, Regen or Swiftness when hit. Enemies get Weakness, Confusion or Cripple) & PBAoE Blind & 3 x Confusion.

Applies an Aura and also has an effect on activation, whereas for the longest time Ele Aura skills only gave the aura w/o the transmutation. Since Auras aren’t that useful in PvE, the 1st half can be ignored. The only use it has in PvE is the Blind which is handy for solo play and the Confusion which is useful for Condition DPS. This leaves the skill to be used on CD in group content.

Chaos Storm
Ground targeted Ethereal Combo field that pulses damage, random Boons (Aegis, Resolution, Swiftness) and random Conditions (Chilled, Poison, Weakness). 1st hit also Dazes.

More utility based since the damage isn’t that strong and since the Conditions are random, it cycles between 2 non-damaging ones and Poison. Boons are defensive but their effectiveness ranges from not that useful (Swiftness) and very powerful (Aegis). Rather than random, it should pulse in a certain order. Possibly Aegis -> Resolution -> Swiftness so you can use it proactively before a mechanic. Also Dazes so it could be saved for a little bit of CC. Also has a Combo field that could be useful but not as a main reason to use the skill.

Scepter
Mid-ranged Condition damage & control. Main hand only.

Ether Bolt -> Ether Blast -> Ether Clone
Single target damage & Torment.
Single target, same damage & longer Torment.
Single target, most damage & summon a Clone that uses Ether Bolt. If at max Clones, apply the longest Torment.

Single target damage makes it awful in AoE situations + accidentally targeting the wrong enemy. Torment doesn’t really match the usual Confusion that Mesmers have, meaning if you have Confusion specific Runes / Sigils (in armour / weapon slots) it won’t affect the damage from this. Having a constant Clone generator is nice. That said, the combo is inconsistent in that by default it doesn’t continue the chain until the previous projectile hits. This isn’t the case if you have the Scepter specific Trait Malicious Sorcery or have Quickness on you, making it even more inconsistent. Clones spawn by you so you can control where they are to prepare for Shatters.

Illusionary Counter -> Counterspell
Block the next attack for damage, 5 x Torment and 2 x Clones that use Ether Bolt. Alternatively, reactive before block is consumed for:
Fire a bolt that damages & Blinds enemies in a line. Summon a Clone to use Ether Bolt on the 1st hit enemy.

Can be used defensively which rewards the most or offensively for far less damage and only 1 Clone. In PvE the more dangerous attacks are more predictable so you can more easily predict when to keep firing off for the clone or save it for the extra clone + damage, making it versatile. There aren’t any cases where you don’t want the 2nd part to go off though so it should just fire off automatically if it doesn’t block anything. Maybe it doesn't work well with Stealth but auto attacks stop when stealthed, could use the same logic w/ this. 

Confusing Images
Channelled beam that damages & Confuses enemies.

Channelled so you can use other instant cast abilities during it. Applying Confusion + being multi target makes it feel better than the other 2 skills, and who doesn’t like laser beams? Weapon overall would be better if it all applied Confusion & the autos had a little cleave + didn’t have that weird inconsistency.

Sword
Short ranged & versatile (offensive, defensive, mobility). Main hand & off-hand.

Mind Slash -> Mind Gash -> Mind Spike
Frontal cleave, damage & Vulnerability.
Frontal cleave, same damage & Vulnerability.
Frontal cleave, most damage. Remove a Boon from targets. Does bonus damage if they have no Boons to remove.

Basic auto chain that you'd expect from a power weapon; Vulnerability fits. The Boon removal also fits w/ Mesmer’s other Boon removal effects. Bonus damage is handy, especially in PvE where it will almost always proc the bonus damage. Only annoying thing is that short range and how it sometimes doesn’t work properly if the enemy is close to you and behind your camera while you’re trying to move.

Blurred Frenzy
Channelled frontal cleave for big damage. Evading during the channel time.

Does a lot of damage and also makes you Evade, so there’s a decision to be made on whether to use the skill as part of your rotation or hold it to mitigate damage. Doesn’t block DoT damage already on you though unlike Distortion so you need to watch out for that. The Evade is linked w/ the animation though, meaning if you cancel it (which is likely if you’re not used to it), it will be wasted and be put on full cooldown. Additionally if you have Quickness, the animation will finish earlier meaning you actually lose out on some Evasion for having a beneficial buff on you. The Evasion and the animation should be decoupled if Quickness is staying in the game.

Illusionary Leap -> Swap
Spawn a Clone by the target. All Clones created by this skill will then leap at the target, Crippling them. They will use the Sword auto attack chain. 
Activate again within 5s and within mid range to swap places with the newest clone, causing PBAoE Immobilize at the swapped location. Combat Leap at the starting location.

Sword’s Clone generator. Does very little damage so it will be exclusively used for Clones or utility from mobility, Mind Slash chain from the Clones or the CC. Cripple doesn’t really help in PvE most of the time. Vulnerability is handy but doesn’t last very long. Their autos do rip Boons though which can be handy in niche cases. The blink is the most useful as it is a gapcloser and has Immobilize on it which can be useful. Also a Leap but they don’t have any offensive effects. Basically use it on CD for a Clone, occasionally use the blink if needed.

Illusionary Riposte -> Counter Blade
Block the next attack, damaging the enemy & generating a Clone based on your main hand. Also grants Evasion for a bit after blocking the attack.
Activate before blocking an attack to fire a projectile that Dazes in an AoE around the target.

If you know damage is coming up, you can use it to mitigate it and get a Clone. Fortunately it also comes w/ an Evasion after the Block unlike other “block next attack” skills, making it less likely to be eaten up by a stray pebble of damage. The 2nd portion is purely CC. Still of the belief that it should auto fire if nothing is blocked.

Phantasmal Swordsman
Frontal hit that damages & grants 8 x Might if it hits. Also counts as a Combo Leap (for some reason). As long as the attack isn’t Blocked, missed via Blind or the target is out of the standard 1200 long range, a Phantasm will spawn. It will Combo Leap for damage before using Blurred Frenzy. It will then spawn a Clone based on your main hand weapon.

The initial hit doesn’t do much damage but every bit counts, especially w/ the extra Might you get. Phantasms always do a lot of damage so you want to make sure it goes off properly. There’s no other nuance to the skill though so use it on CD, preferably in melee range. The fact that it leaps to the target as a melee and also uses the multi hitting skill that also makes it Evade makes the Phantasm very powerful, especially w/ a Trait that builds damage stacks per hit.

Focus
Off-hand only that focuses on defensive skills & utility.

Temporal Curtain -> Into the Void
Ground targeted line Light Combo field. Grants Swiftness to allies & Cripple to enemies. Allies can gain Swiftness multiple times but beyond the 1st time it’s only 1s.
Activate again to Pull nearby (mid range) enemies into the centre, destroying it.

Great utility skill because of the Pull. Light Combo fields can be handy but most of the time they’re not even activated by others since it prioritises their own field (which will be a lot in group content / open world events). Swiftness & Cripple are also handy but the Pull is the main attraction so you can cleave everything down. In theory there’s a choice between the field and the Pull but there really isn’t a choice.

Phantasmal Warden
Spawn a Phantasm near you that moves into range (mid) of your target before creating a PBAoE bubble that blocks projectiles while also throwing out projectiles at an enemy that damages & applies 12 x total Vulnerability. Respawns as a Clone based on your main hand weapon.

Damage is sort of random though as the projectiles can target an enemy other than your selected target. That is mitigated by being in the hitbox though. Projectile blocking is nice but it’s a little janky at range since the Phantasm moves into range of the enemy so its projectiles hit something. That said once it starts it’s a guaranteed bubble for a couple of seconds. Choice between damage & projectile defence but since the movement is a little janky it can be unreliable. Would be better if it was ground targeted; reduce projectile range if it’s too strong.

Pistol
Off-hand only weapon w/ mid-ranged projectiles.

Phantasmal Duelist
Single target ranged damage & Cripple. Summon a Phantasm nearby that damages. All shots are a 20% Combo Projectile. Respawns as a Clone based on your main hand weapon.

Spawns a Phantasm (and hence Clone) as well for those related traits. Cripple isn’t that helpful but the multitude of 20% Projectiles could be useful. Doesn’t inherently do Condition damage, unlike the next skill. That sort of makes the Pistol a jack of all trades weapon though, doing a bit of everything.

Magic Bullet
Fire a single bullet that bounces to hit up to 4 enemies. Each enemy is damaged & inflicted w/ 3 x Confusion. Additionally, the 1st is stunned, 2nd is Dazed and 3rd is Blinded. Counts as a Combo Projectile.

For Power builds this is purely CC as the damage & scaling is very low. For Condition builds, it does decent Confusion damage and since Scepter is the only possible option for Condition Damage, that means an off-hand needs to be used and it’s between this and Torch (or both for max skills to use). For Power, only use it if you need CC. For Condition it’s more interesting as you either use it for DPS or keep it for CC. It has a lengthy CD of 25s so there is an actual risk involved in this choice. It being a bouncing attack also makes it feel less awful in multi target situations, even if the secondary targets take less CC.

Torch
Off-hand only weapon focusing on Conditions, particularly Burning.

The Prestige
PBAoE damage & Blind. Also Stealth yourself + cleansing a Condition. Reappear when Stealth ends (3s or attacking) for PBAoE Burning & Blast.

Stealth & Blind not that useful in group content combat since they’ll just attack someone else. Might be useful in skipping mobs in dungeons (outdated & abandoned) or Fractals but for boss fights not that useful. The Burning & the Blasting are the most useful parts of this skill, so it’s used on CD for damage & Blast (which should always happen w/ how many Fields there are in groups). Also cleanses a single Condition but a single cleanse is rarely ever the reason to use a skill. Stealthing in combat can be annoying though as it cancels your auto chain, something that could be annoying if you forget / aren’t used to it since Stealth is pretty rare.

Phantasmal Mage
PBAoE damage & Burning. Spawn a Phantasm that has a frontal cleave of Burning, 3 x Confusion & Daze. Respawns as a Clone based on your main hand weapon.

While there is a 0.5s Daze attached, the huge amount of Conditions + a Phantasm relegates this skill to being used on CD, which makes it less interesting in terms of decision making but pretty cool in terms of seeing a bunch of DoTs appearing on your enemies. As always, skills being AoE makes it feel good vs. single target misery.

Healing
Choose 1.

Ether Feast - No Tag
Heal self, healing for more per active Clone.

Most basic of the heals, so it will be the baseline for comparisons. Has an interaction w/ Clones but the difference is minor (+11% per Clone). Could have an effect that’s more involved w/ Clones like spawning a Clone or 2 if you don’t have one. This will make it more versatile and interesting while also interacting w/ Clone Traits.

Mirror - Manipulation
Reflect projectiles & heal self.

Weaker heal but has the added benefit of reflecting projectiles. It’s only 2s though so timing is key. It’s infinitely better than an Aegis though since it’s 2s rather than the next attack. Also has a pretty low CD of 12s. That said, since it only reflects for you, it’s best for PvP.

Mantra of Recovery -> Power Return - Mantra
Preparation: Heal self & channel to prepare the Mantra. Completing preparation heals Charges: Heal self, increased if <= 50%. 2 charges.

Not really a support option as the PBAoE heal only happens on preparation completion (2.25s) and that can only happen once every 10s and requires you to potentially waste 2 healing charges. If both charges are used while below the threshold, it heals for just slightly less than Ether Feast which has no drawback (preparation). While it can potentially heal for a lot w/ the preparation + charges, it requires a lot of time that could be spent doing anything else. High risk heal for big heals, potentially useful in PvP if you’re able to get it off.

Signet of the Ether - Signet
Passive: Heal self when summoning an Illusion (Clone or Phantasm).
Active: Heal self & fully recharge all Phantasm skills.

DPS option. The active heals for roughly the same as Ether Feast and is a big DPS increase if you use it after you summon all your Phantasms, giving you a choice between a heal or damage. Passive heal is pretty small but does help since it affects all Illusions, not just Phantasms. Not worth keeping it for the passive though since the damage is way more important than passive incremental healing, something a healer can take care of.

Utility
Choose 3.

Decoy - Clone
Breaks stun. Gain Stealth & summon a Clone.

Both Clone utilities are defensive. This one is more defensive as it grants 3s of Stealth but at the cost of 1 Clone, meaning less damage, CC or invulnerability.

Mirror Images - Clone
Breaks stun. Break enemy targeting & Summon 2 Clones.

The other Clone utility. Not sure if the “break enemy targeting” really helps in PvE (doesn’t feel like it) but it’s pretty annoying in PvP, which could be useful against ranged enemies. Has 2 Clones so it’s more versatile than its counterpart.

Feedback - Glamour
Ground targeted Ethereal Combo field that reflects projectiles.

Glamours are ground fields that are beneficial to allies or harmful to enemies. Very powerful projectile reflection skill as it covers an AoE and lasts for 6s. Obviously it’s not that useful when there’s no projectiles that need to be reflected.

Null Field - Glamour
Ground targeted Ethereal Combo field that pulses Boon removal for enemies & Condition cleansing for allies.

Far more useful in PvP where Condition cleansing + Boon removal are needed a lot more than in PvE. Radius is pretty small though so the likelihood of getting max value of both effects is pretty low though, maybe in WvW where it’s zerg vs zerg.

Portal Entre -> Portal Exeunt - Glamour
Create a portal entrance beneath you.
Create a portal exit beneath you, allowing 20 uses for anyone to go back and forth.

Very useful skill out of combat that lets you skip jumping puzzles. Can also be used to cheese some fight mechanics / act as pseudo mobility but does require you to preposition both portals, requiring fight knowledge. The only issue w/ the skill is that to use it, you need to use the all purpose interaction button (F) which is used for pretty much everything. Meaning you can accidentally use it again if you’re trying to open a chest or an NPC, etc.

Veil - Glamour
Ground targeted line Light Combo field that grants Stealth.

It can be useful for skipping mob packs or surprises in PvP but since it only lasts 2s its effectiveness is limited. Unlike other skills it doesn’t have a target limit, meaning any amount of allies can be stealthed. The Elite version provides longer duration Stealth at the limit of 10 allies, meaning this one is probably going to stay as is just so it’s different from the Elite version. Adding Boons or speed won’t be an option either as those are currently Traits. Possibly some form of healing?

Arcane Thievery - Manipulation
Send 3 Conditions on you to the target. Steal 3 Boons from the target to yourself. Hitting the target will Slow them and grant self Quickness. Unblockable.

Manipulation skills are thematically about control, but are practically a bit of everything. This option is definitely a PvP option as again, having both Condition cleansing and Boon removal / stealing is only really effective in PvP. Otherwise half the power budget is wasted on something that’s needed / used (Boon stealing + Condition sending as Mesmers don’t have a way to apply Conditions to themselves like Necros). As a PvP skill it’s pretty powerful in 1v1 though, so less useful in WvW.

Blink - Manipulation
Breaks stun. Long range blink.

Compared to Ele’s Lightning Flash, it’s longer range and breaks stun at the cost of the little damage Ele’s does. While it does make them unique from each other, I still prefer this to Ele’s version since the damage is inconsequential. If I’m trying to escape, I’m not going to aim it at an enemy for a bit of damage.

Illusion of Life - Manipulation
Ground targeted AoE that temporarily revives allies from Downed. If they kill an enemy in the next 15s, fully revive them.

Powerful pseudo res skill, but only in PvP. If there was something to kill to get a Rally in PvE, then this skill wouldn’t be needed. In PvP other players may run away so this skill will help you / allies tag or even kill enemies for the Rally. For this to be useful in PvE, there’ll have to be another part of the skill that allows reviving without killing something. Possibly being healed to full HP or healed an amount equal to max HP.

Mimic - Manipulation
Next Utility used w/ have a 1s CD. Mimic’s CD is increased by the Mimicked skill’s CD.

Very versatile skill as it’s effectively (almost) doubling the uses of another Utility. Double Blinks, double reflect barrier, double Phantasm skills, etc. It’s almost doubling because the skill itself has a 20s CD, on top of the CD of the Mimicked skill.

Mantra of Concentration -> Power Break - Mantra
Preparation: Completion for PBAoE 3 x Stability. Additional Stability & Aegis for self.
Charges: Breaks stun on self & grants PBAoE 3 x Stability. 2 charges.

Prefer Firebrand’s version where the powerful effect is on the final charge rather than the initial preparation channel. In their case, it (usually) provides a choice between keeping the charges recharging or having an immediate burst w/ the offset of a CD + channel. In Mesmer’s case, you generally don’t want to use both charges unless there’s downtime to prepare the Mantra again.

CC defensive option. Charges are very powerful as it grants you a stun break as well as a decent amount of CC immunity for you and your allies. The preparation isn’t strong enough to warrant keeping this unprepared for but can be useful if there’s some downtime in PvP to recharge. There’s a 15s CD though so it’s not possible to have the preparation available on demand.

Mantra of Distraction -> Power Lock - Mantra
Preparation: Reduced Diversion’s CD by 15s.
Charges: Daze target & nearby enemies. 2 charges.

CC option. Diversion has a 38s CD so the preparation is a ~40% CD reduction. But like the above, it has a lengthy CD so using it fully and preparing it on CD isn’t really a viable option. 

Mantra of Pain -> Power Spike - Mantra
Preparation: PBAoE 8 x Might.
Charges: Damage target & nearby enemies. 5 x Vulnerability for enemies who aren’t attacking. 2 charges.

DPS option. The Might is effectively useless as there are many ways to gain might, even just through your own skills let alone support roles. It also doesn’t last very long. Basically you just want to use it when all your other damage multipliers are up without eating both charges. Vulnerability isn’t really an issue either so no real need to watch if the enemy is attacking or not, unfortunately limiting the skill expression. Probably for the best as it’s not clear sometimes when something is attacking or just part of the combat stance animation.

Mantra of Resolve -> Power Cleanse - Mantra
Preparation: 13 x Condition Cleanse for self. PBAoE 3 x Condition Cleanse.
Charges: PBAoE 3 x Condition Cleanse. 2 charges.

Condition cleanse option. Even though the 13 cleanses sound amazing, it’s very unlikely you’ll be affected by that many Conditions. At most you can clear the majority if not all Conditions on yourself by using both charges.

Phantasmal Defender - Phantasm
Summon a Phantasm that PBAoE Taunts. When the blocking is done, explode for damage that increases per attack blocked (up to 500% bonus from 10 hits).

Defensive Phantasm. Not that useful in group content since bosses are immune to Taunts since it’s a Condition and there’s no threat table in GW2 like other MMOs. Useful in open world / PvP as the Taunt actually affects them (sans Stability). Also compared to the below, it has double the CD making it less attractive as a pure Phantasm skill.

Phantasmal Disenchanter - Phantasm
Summon a Phantasm that shoots ranged bouncing (can’t hit same target more than once) attacks that remove Boons from enemies. Deals 2.5x damage to enemies without Boons. Unblockable.

Since enemy mobs generally don’t have Boons, it practically always deals the bonus damage. It has a much lower CD than the other Phantasm utility skill too so it’s good for both damage + Clone spawning. Not being able to hit the same target more than once makes it very consistent, so it feels less awful in single target situations vs 2 targets.

Signet of Domination - Signet
Passive: Gain Condition Damage.
Active: Ranged stun on target.

Condition DPS + CC option. Since stuns aren’t always needed, it’s not really an option for Power DPS to take as you’ll be stuck w/ a useless passive for the majority of the time. For Condition DPS, grants you a choice between keeping damage up or contributing to the CC. Same notes as every other Signet.

Signet of Illusions - Signet
Passive: Create a clone every 10s in combat.
Active: Recharge all Shatter skill CDs.

The passive isn’t all that useful since Clones are generated out of the wazoo through weapon skills and Phantasm skills. Active could be useful in PvP which requires damage, CC and invulnerability. Less useful in PvE compared to other skills where you can get full value of the whole skills power budget.

Signet of Inspiration - Signet
Passive: Grant Swiftness & a random Boon every 10s.
Active: Extend the duration of all Boons on self by 3s.

The passive is incredibly inconsistent as it chooses from every other Boon excluding Swiftness which is always granted. 3s of Aegis has a different value compared to 3s of Regen or 20s of a singular Might, for example. The active itself is pretty bad but can be improved by a Trait to include allies in the Boon duration extension. Still it requires a Trait that’s in the healing tree and there aren’t any real healing builds for Mesmer or its specs.

Signet of Midnight - Signet
Passive: Gain Expertise.
Active: Breaks stun. PBAoE Blind & Stealth self.

Condition DPS + defensive option. Like the other Condition option, it’s best to be used by Condition DPS only as half of the effect is worthless for Power DPS who can use another stun break skill to full effect. Active presents a choice between damage and defensive effects too. The stun break is sort of unsafe as you’re not immune to CC especially against CC Condition immune enemies like bosses or AoEs (Blind & Stealth respectively).

Elite
Choose 1.

Time Warp - Glamour
Ground targeted Ethereal Combo field that pulses Quickness & Superspeed for allies + Slow & Chilled for enemies. Unblockable.

Utility option. In PvE it will be purely for the Quickness and less so for the Superspeed. The Slow & Chilled can count for Traits and some CC damage but they won’t last long enough to count as a consistent source. It does have a lengthy CD of 120s though, making the other smaller options of Quickness more attractive while leaving this slot for something more useful.

Mass Invisibility - Manipulation
PBAoE Stealth.

Stealth is definitely more powerful in PvP. As mentioned in the other party stealth skill, this lasts 6s vs 2s but only affects 10 players. This makes it more useful in PvE to skip mob packs but other than that it doesn’t have any combat interactions. Unsure if Thief Stealth attacks work as I don’t play Thief that often, but if it does it could be a cute interaction? Albeit a little niche and not all that effective since this has a 48s CD.

Signet of Humility - Signet
Passive: -20% Stun Duration on self.
Active: Polymorph the target. CC immune targets take huge Defiance Bar Damage.

CC option. The passive isn’t that useful since a stun is still a stun, no matter how reduced it is. The active lasts for 6s so it will do a 6s stuns worth of Defiance damage to bosses during CC phases. Otherwise the polymorph is incredibly annoying in PvP since it replaces your weapon skills w/ bird (or fish for underwater) skills and disables your utility skills. As you can see there’s no DPS option for base Mesmer, leaving the Elite specs to cover that hole.

Traits
Non-coloured Traits are auto picked if the tree is chosen. Coloured Traits are a choice of 1. Can only pick 3 trees.
Domination - Interruption & Vulnerability

Illusion of Vulnerability
Inflict 3 x Vulnerability when interrupting an enemy. 3s ICD when using CC skills against Defiance Bars.

Little bit of extra Vulnerability. Not that useful in PvE since it doesn’t work until CC phases where it will have that 3s ICD. Definitely sees more use in PvP.

Bountiful Blades
Greatsword’s Mirror Blades bounces an additional 2 times. Greatsword’s Phantasmal Berserker summons an additional berserker but does -33% damage (total 133% damage, double the Illusions).

Good example of a weapon specific trait since it does more than a CDR. More bounces means more damage, Might & Vulnerability depending on who gets hit. Additional Phantasms do overall more damage even with the damage reduction; there’s no case where it’s a DPS loss. An additional Phantasm means an additional Clone means more for Shatters.

Empower Illusions
Illusions deal +15% Strike Damage.

The other DPS option. Only applies to damage from your Illusions and since Clones barely do any damage, it only applies to Phantasms which are pretty limited. It’s the option you take if you’re not using Greatsword for whatever reason.

Rending Shatter
Shatter skills inflict 1 x Vulnerability on hit.

Can apply a lot of Vulnerability in quick succession as it applies per Shatter explosion (4 if you have 3 Clones out since it also explodes around you). Not that useful in PvE though as Vulnerability is covered pretty easily from having multiple players do the bare minimum.

Dazzling
Dazing or Stunning an enemy applies 5 x Vulnerability.

Pretty useless in PvE as the only chance of Stunning is when the Defiance Bar is broken. Unsure if you need to land the final CC or not to get its effects. Otherwise it’s a lot more useful in PvP.

Shattered Concentration
Shatter skills remove 1 x Boon on hit.

Removing Boons is strictly a PvP option. Like the other Shatter trait, it applies on hit so you can quickly remove Boons if you have a bunch of Clones up.

Egotism
+10% Strike Damage against enemies w/ lower HP % than you.

Very useful in PvE since you’re almost always topped up from healers vs. PvP where you’re fighting for your life most of the time. Because of that, there’s no real nuance involved and is just a high uptime damage up Trait. Doesn’t include Illusion damage though.

Furious Interruption
Gain Quickness when interrupting a foe. 3s ICD.

Like the other Interrupt Traits, it’s not very useful in PvE. Same notes apply. 3s of Quickness w/ a 3s ICD, potential uptime if you space out your CC but not worth it since CC locking someone is more important in PvP. Quickness is nice but better to get it through a support and not eat up a Trait for it.

Fragility
+0.5% Strike Damage per Vulnerability stack on the target (max 12.5%).

An easy 12.5% Strike Damage boost without doing anything on your part since again, Vulnerability stacks up pretty quickly naturally w/ more players. It does synergise w/ all the Vulnerability Traits in this traitline though, fitting.

Vicious Expression
+15% Strike Damage for you & your Illusions against enemies w/o Boons. Disabling an enemy removes 2 Boons from them.

DPS option. More Strike Damage against all enemies in PvE since enemies don’t have Boons. Otherwise in PvP you get to remove Boons while CCing.

Mental Anguish
+25% Shatter Damage. Doubled against enemies not attacking.

Another DPS option. Puts a lot of power into Shatters which aren’t always available, and only 2 of them damage anyway. Could be good for burst reasons in PvP but not as powerful in PvE compared to the above.

Power Block
Interrupting deals damage & Weakness. Enemy skills that you interrupt have a +15s CD. 3s ICD when using CC skills against Defiance Bars. Cannot crit.

Strictly a PvP option as part of the power budget is in the CD increase which doesn’t apply in PvE. Can completely screw over a person if you manage to interrupt multiple skills in a row, Weakening them a bunch and locking them out of a lot of skills. 
Dueling - Crits & Dodging

Critical Infusion
Critting grants Vigor. 10s ICD.

Lets you dodge a little bit more for simply attacking (since you should be capped out w/ 100% crit). Has some synergy w/ some of the other Traits but mostly extra active mitigation.

Phantasmal Fury
Phantasms have 10s Fury. 10s ICD.

Offensive power option. Basically just means Phantasms always have Fury on them. Very unlikely that Phantasms will last for longer than 10s, but the 10s duration + re-application is just so that other players in PvP can’t still a 30s Fury buff off of your clones for free. Phantasms inherit your stats, so w/o this Trait they’d be at 75% crit w/o the Fury assuming maxing crit.

Desperate Decoy
Cast Decoy when hit below 50% HP.

Defensive option. Not all that useful in PvE since Stealth & a singular Clone aren’t going to help you avoid raid wide damage. Much more useful in PvP since it breaks targeting and you’re Stealthed.

Duelist’s Discipline
Pistol attacks from you & Illusions Bleed. Interrupting recharges 25% of Pistol skill CDs, 3s ICD against Defiance Bars.

Condition damage option if you’re using a Pistol. Getting active mitigation is much more involved than the flat 20% some other Traits have; a lot more interesting. That said there’s only 2 Pistol skills so its value is pretty limited. Could include additional Bleeding on next attack(s) after interrupting to further enhance its identity as a duelist.

Sharper Images
Illusions inflict Bleeding on crit.

Extra DoTs for extra damage. Not that useful for Power builds as you have nothing scaling the Bleeding damage or duration. Condition builds don’t mind it as the best Condition gear have crit on them (just no crit damage). It also doesn’t have an ICD so multi-hit Clone attacks are very powerful at applying Bleeding.

Blinding Dissipation
Shatter skill 2 inflicts PBAoE Blindness.

PvP / Condition option. Blindness isn’t that useful in PvE so that’s what makes it a PvP option. It’s a pseudo Condition DPS option because of a Trait further down the traitline that applies Confusion whenever you Blind an enemy. Blind you want to get rid of by attacking but attacking while Confused does more damage to you, giving the enemy a choice on what to do.

Evasive Mirror
Gain 2s of projectile reflection after successfully dodging an attack. 1.5s ICD.

Defensive option. Requires a successful dodge so you can’t preemptively dodge for the buff. Basically just extends your dodge against ranged attacks.

Fencer’s Finesse
Gain a stacking Ferocity buff (max 10) whenever you or an Illusion strikes w/ a Sword or Spear (underwater). -20% Sword & Spear skill CDs.

Power DPS option. Main reason why you want multihit attacks; to stack up quickly for the burst attacks. Only gain stacks from certain weapons and the stacks don’t refresh the duration so there’s only a couple of seconds to get the heavy hitters out. Obviously this requires taking a Sword though, which may be annoying if you want to deal Power damage without using a Sword. Could be changed so that the stack cap is doubled and the stack Ferocity be halved. Then, have it apply stacks on any bladed weapon (Sword, Greatsword, Axe or Dagger) but have it apply double stacks for Sword only. Maybe even triple and adjust stack value accordingly, just as long as there’s use of this Trait without using a Sword explicitly, though that doesn’t fit the usual “Fencer” image.

Master Fencer
Grant PBAoE Fury when critting. 8s ICD.

Extra Fury for your subgroup. Has a 50% uptime, possibly 100% if you have 100% Boon Duration, allowing for some support capability. Most of the Mesmer support builds don’t build full Boon Duration though, meaning another source will have to be added. Still it’s pretty decent for a minor Trait.

Superiority Complex
+15% Crit Damage. Another +10% Crit Damage against Disabled or <=50% HP enemies. Only affects your damage (not Illusions).

Power damage option. Free Crit Damage which is increased against Disabled (not helpful in PvE) enemies or those below 50% HP. It’s also multiplicative rather than increasing the “crit damage” stat which is increased by Ferocity. It’s overall pretty boring but more damage is more damage. Extra damage conditionals are at least somewhat interesting, requiring coordination or just progressing the fight.

Ineptitude
Interrupting an enemy inflicts Blind & Blinding an enemy inflicts 2 x Confusion. 3s ICD when using a CC skill against Defiance Bars.

Condition DPS option. Affects all Blinds, not just the ones from this Trait, making it more versatile. The extra Blindness can help but not so much in group content. Same notes about Defiance Bar ICD; previously didn’t work at all so it’s better than nothing.

Deceptive Evasion
Create a Clone at your position when dodging in combat.

Clone option? It’s not particularly defensive as you don’t Stealth or break their targeting, all it does is leave a Clone behind. Clones aren’t particularly high in demand due to all the weapon skill and Phantasms generating Clones, so not really sure what the point of this trait is. Possibly in PvP.
Chaos - Conditions & Defense

Metaphysical Rejuvenation
Gain Regen when hit below 75% HP. 15s ICD.

Little bit of sustain, but the main reason for the Regen is the interaction w/ the other minor Traits in this traitline.

Method of Madness
Cast Lesser Chaos Storm when using a healing skill. Lesser Chaos Storm: same as Chaos Storm but less damage & the random Poison lasts half as long. 35s ICD.

The only “offensive” option. Most of the effects are utility based but there’s some pulsing damage & Poison. Since it’s the only option that does damage, you’ll have to take it as it is. Some healing skills are offensive anyway, this Trait makes them slightly better w/ the pulsing effects & Field.

Illusionary Defense
-5% Incoming Strike Damage stacks whenever you summon an Illusion, max -25%.

Selfish defensive option. Only affects Strike Damage and gaining a stack doesn’t refresh its duration but Illusions cover both Clones & Phantasms so gaining stacks shouldn’t be too hard. Definitely more of a PvP option, possible tanking option in PvE.

Master of Manipulation
Manipulation skills grant PBAoE Aegis.

Party defensive option. Requires Manipulation skills to be taken though and they’re generally not that great in terms of damage / use in PvE: only Blink and possibly Mimic are useful in PvE. Even in PvP they’re not that great and have niche uses.

Illusionary Membrane
While affected by Regen, +10% Condition Damage dealt and -10% Condition Damage received.

Main reason this traitline is the Condition DPS tree. Extra damage from having something that’s pretty easy to get, though Regen stacking is a bit weird. It stacks in duration, but only up to 5 times and no one knows which ones get overwritten, but that’s a whole ‘nother discussion. Also makes you slightly tankier against DoTs which is always nice, but not as useful in PvE since cleansing is more effective (rather, possible) here than in other MMOs.

Auspicious Anguish
Converts 2 damaging Conditions on self to Boons whenever you gain Distortion or become Disabled.

A very niche Trait as there’s only a few ways to gain Distortion: Distortion Shatter, a Virtuoso Utility Blade Renewal and an Inspiration Trait Blurred Inscriptions which require Signet usage. Otherwise it requires you to be CC’d which shouldn’t ever be the goal, especially not to just cleanse 2 Conditions. Doesn’t have an ICD though so it could be useful in PvP scenarios where you’re getting CC locked, but Conditions would be the least of your troubles in that case. The conversions also vary wildly in value: Vigor, Aegis, Resolution, Regen & 3 x Might but that’s more due to Condition -> Boon conversion than this trait specifically. Could possibly change it to be Protection & Resolution only to emphasise the defensiveness.

Chaotic Transference
Gain Protection when casting Chaos Armor. When gaining Protection, also gain Regen (15s ICD).

An incredibly niche Trait as it only affects the Chaos Armor skill from Staff. If it also affected Chaos Aura it would be infinitely more useful. Otherwise it’s another defensive option but a very niche one. Also slightly helps with Regen uptime.

Chaotic Potency
Gain Condition Damage, doubled when wielding a Staff. -20% Staff & Trident (underwater) skill CDs.

Condition DPS option, even if you’re not using Staff. Unlike the Sword trait above, it has uses even when not using a Sword. Not as exciting as the Greatsword one but extra Condition Damage is always nice to have. Since it’s the only offensive option of the 3, it’s an easy choice for PvE. Especially w/ the other 2 options being like… that.

Chaotic Persistence
Gain Concentration & Expertise while affected by Regen.

Further interaction w/ Regen. Boons & Conditions from you lasting longer makes it versatile in both offensive and utility based builds, preferably both to make the most out of this tree.

Chaotic Interruption
Interrupting an enemy recharges a random equipped weapon skills CD by 5s. 1s ICD.

Fortunately the “random” skill can’t affect skills that are fully recharged so nothing is wasted. It only affects skills that are visibly active on your bar though, so nothing on the other weapon and nothing that’s the 2nd part of another skill. It also doesn’t affect the CC skills themselves as they don’t go on CD until after the whole animation (some edge cases w/ delayed projectiles may affect itself, reducing its own CD). Overall it’s an okay skill but not all that useful in PvE like most interrupt Traits. It doesn’t have the line about having a 3s ICD against Defiance Bars though, but assuming it’s the cast then it’s still not that useful since they don’t happen that often. And if it’s not the case then it’s completely useless against bosses. 1s ICD to prevent AoE CC skills outperforming single target ones.

Prismatic Understanding
+50% Stealth Duration from Mesmer skills. Gain random Boons while Stealthed (Aegis, Protection, Regen, Might, Swiftness).

Extra Stealth makes this the PvP option. Boons are also only given to you so it’s not as strong as you think it is (since a couple of them are party based Stealth). The Boons being random don’t help either, especially since one is Aegis and the other is a singular Might.

Bountiful Disillusionment
Gain Stability when using a Shatter. Gain an additional Boon based on the Shatter.
Skill 1: 5 x Might | Skill 2: Vigor | Skill 3: Fury | Skill 4: Regen | Skill 5 (some specs): Resistance

Little bit of extra Boon coverage + Stability. Always nice to have Stability since being CC’d feels awful. Other than that, it’s just a little extra Boon coverage, nothing crazy or all that useful honestly. Might be okay for Chronomancer or Virtuoso to gain Resistance on their 5th Shatter but taking an entire Condition / Defensive tree for that is a bit much.
Inspiration - Healing & Support

Mender’s Purity
Cast Lesser Power Cleanse when using a healing skill. Lesser Power Cleanse: same as Power Cleanse but only cleanses 1 not 3 Conditions. 1s ICD.

Little extra bit of cleansing. Doesn’t have a huge CD like other on skill Traits, meaning it’s best used with the healing Mantra for max value. Otherwise, it’s just a little bit of extra cleansing utility which fits the minor Trait status.

Medic’s Feedback
Cast Feedback (exact same as the Utility skill) when reviving an ally. Feedback pulses 5% partial revive. 32s ICD.

The revive Trait. Exactly like the other revive Traits, except it reflects projectiles instead of blocking like Guardian or healing more like Ele or Necro. As such, the same notes apply.

Restorative Mantras
PBAoE heal when finishing a Mantra preparation only, it doesn’t affect the charges portion at all.

Pretty awful as it doesn’t affect the charges at all. It could’ve at least had half the effect or something. As it stands a 1.6k heal after a 2.25s channel is absolutely not worth it and part of the reason why heal Mesmers don’t work as they don’t have reliable ways of healing well.

Sympathetic Visage
Phantasms take a Condition from you when summoned.

Little bit of Condition cleansing. Does exactly what it says, nothing else. Phantasms are a bit rarer than Clones so the cleansing isn’t as powerful as you think, especially since it’s technically not cleansed but on the Phantasms themselves. Meaning it may impact their damage if they take Weakness off of you (other Conditions should be fine).

Inspiring Distortion
Grant allies Aegis in a PBAoE when giving self Distortion or using Shatter Skill 4.

Extra tankiness for allies. Doesn’t grant self Aegis which shouldn’t be needed anyway since you’re completely immune during Distortion. Formerly gave allies Distortion which is completely overpowered, having a party be immune to everything on demand is wild and doesn’t fit a minor Trait.

Warden’s Feedback
Focus skills reflect projectiles. -20% Focus skill CDs.

Adds a little bit of protection against projectiles, though not as much as you think since Phantasmal Warden already blocks projectiles, this just changes it to reflect. Lower CDs are always appreciated but an entire Trait for something that only affects 2 skills is a bit of a high cost.

Restorative Illusions
Heal self & cleanse a Condition when using a Shatter. Increased healing per Clone Shattered.

Extra sustain and cleansing for self when using a Shatter. Interaction w/ Clones is nice as it gives a small amount of skill expression. Should be changed to PBAoE heal though to help w/ Mesmer healing builds as it currently does not exist and the other 2 options aren’t really of the healing thematic.

Temporal Enchanter
Glamour skills last 1s longer. Casting Glamour skills grants PBAoE Superspeed & Resistance.

Only really affects 3 of the 5 Glamour skills since the portals lasting an extra second doesn’t really matter and Veil lasting another second doesn’t help since you can’t gain Mesmer Stealth when already affected by Mesmer Stealth. The other 3 lasting longer helps though, but generally only under PvP situations. Superspeed is handy but not needed in PvE generally and Resistance is nice to have but not that needed as Conditions aren’t that common in PvE. Purely useful in PvP.

Healing Prism
PBAoE heal whenever you heal yourself. 10s ICD. Gain Healing Power based on 13% of Power.

10s ICD for 500 healing is a bit much. It doesn’t even affect yourself. Lower the CD or increase the healing to help with Mesmer healer builds. Otherwise a bit of extra Healing Power is nice, especially since most pure healer builds have Power on them.

Mental Defense
Cast Lesser Phantasmal Defender when successfully Blocking or Evading an attack.
Lesser Phantasmal Defender: it’s exactly the same as Phantasmal Defender. 40s ICD.

Free use of Phantasmal Defender. Much more useful in PvP as Taunts don’t work on bosses, though the extra Illusions are always appreciated. Still, there are better options out of the 3.

Illusionary Inspiration
PBAoE heal when summoning an Illusion.

The heal is pretty small at 200 but at least this doesn’t have an ICD. Clones are generated pretty quickly so it’s not a bad source of healing. It’s just not enough to sustain a party by itself, especially since it happens naturally and not at burst. At least not at the cost of your damage rotation. It itself is fine, it’s the other healing Traits that need propping up.

Blurred Inscriptions
Signet actives are improved and grant 1s of Distortion to self.
Ether: increased healing
Domination: removes Boons.
Illusions: summons Illusions.
Inspiration: affects allies too.
Midnight: removes Conditions.
Humility: applies Vulnerability.

Improves all Signets, but the only reason to ever take this is for its effect on Inspiration. Extending the duration of your subgroups Boons by 3s every 20s is useful, freeing up some Boon Duration stats for damage, etc. However as it stands, Mesmers don’t have a strong healer build so there’s no reason to ever take this traitline. If healing were better, it might be a viable option since healers require both healing + Boons otherwise they’re left in the dust like healer Scourge. Mesmers can provide Boons and do support levels of DPS, but having suboptimal healing isn’t the best and until healing is increased, support Mesmers will stay as support DPS.
Illusions - Shatters & Illusions

Cry of Pain
Shatter skill 2 inflicts an additional stack of Confusion for a +33% duration.

More DoT damage. Not all that useful for Power builds though, could’ve at least increased the strike damage a little bit too or inflict Vulnerability so it’s not a completely dead trait for those builds. Otherwise it’s more damage for DoT builds.

Shatter Storm
Shatter skill 1 becomes an ammo skill w/ 2 charges.

Power DPS option. Being able to use Shatter skill 1 twice in a burst phase means overall more damage. Clone generation is really high in openers anyway so it would’ve been used on skill 2 anyway, even if it’s suboptimal for Power builds.

Persistence of Memory
When a Phantasm becomes a Clone, transfer all their current Boons onto you.

Pretty useful for solo since you want as many Boons as you can get while you’re by yourself. It also transfers any Boon on them, not just the ones you grant so there’s some party synergy but in that case you’re better off w/ Shatter Storm.

The Pledge
Additional Burning from Torch skills. -20% Torch skill CDs.

Condition damage option, but only if you’re using Torch AND going down this tree. There are better options though, which makes this tree the 3rd best option for Condition builds, leaving it to never be used outside of a weird base Mesmer only Condition build which is in of itself suboptimal. Trait itself is pretty boring, adding a Burn to skills that already Burn and reducing CDs passively.

Compounding Power
Creating an Illusion grants a +2% Damage & +30 Condition Damage stack, max +10% & +150.

Extra damage for doing something you’re already doing. Stacks don’t refresh in duration so there’s nothing to really keep a track of. Mostly means you’ll do a lot of damage during openers and less so during downtime where stacks are lower (Phantasm skills still recharging). Actually affects Power & Condi builds this time.

Escape Artist
Create a Clone when gaining Stealth in combat.

Strictly PvP for the misdirection. Taking an entire Trait for a single Clone that requires Stealth, a rare effect is not worth it. The plus side is that it applies to any form of Stealth, not just Mesmer’s / yours and it doesn’t have a CD. But you need to remember the 3 Clone cap.

Phantasmal Haste
Phantasms spawn w/ Quickness. Gain Quickness when creating a Phantasm.

Makes your Phantasms attacks quick. This only really helps in edge cases in burst phases as they only have 1 attack before devolving into a Clone. The Quickness you get for summoning a Phantasm is nice but it’s only 1.5s and it only affects yourself. Better off leaving it to the supports, especially since you would be choosing this Trait.

Maim the Disillusioned
Shatters inflict Torment on hit.

Extra DoT damage. Specifically worded as on hit, meaning each explosion from the Clones and yourself apply the Torment. That’s pretty much it.

Master of Misdirection
-15% Shatter skill CDs.

More Shatters, more damage / utility. Nothing else to say. Would be more interesting if the effect was weaker / stronger depending on how many Clones are used though.

Phantasmal Force
Phantasms deal +1% Strike Damage each stack of Might you have, max +25%. Gain 3 x Might when your Phantasms become Clones.

Power DPS option. Phantasms deal more damage at a consistent 25% while you have max stacks, which you will have in group content. Extra Might padding is nice but not needed, leaving this trait as a +25% Phantasm damage trait which is a little boring but everyone likes more damage so who cares. Due to how crappy the Condi option is, this is also taken by Condi builds that don’t use Scepter, which is the majority of them.

Master of Fragmentation
Shatters are improved.
Skill 1: +25% Crit Chance.
Skill 2: Cripples on hit.
Skill 3: Hits 5 targets instead of 1.
Skill 4: Reflects projectiles.
Skill 5 (some specs): +1s duration.

Utility option as it grants a bunch of effects. Since they’re both offensive and defensive, it’s best used in PvP where you can make the most of all the benefits. The other options are generally better for their respective dedicated roles.

Malicious Sorcery
+20% attack speed while wielding a Scepter. -20% Scepter skill CDs.

Condition option, if using a Scepter obviously. The attack speed does NOT stack w/ Quickness, which greatly diminishes the value since in group content you’ll have Quickness. That pretty much leaves you with just the CDR, reiterating the fact that this is the 3rd best option for Condi builds.

Chronomancer Combat
Gains a 5th Shatter, Continuum Split that reverts HP, endurance and skill cooldowns to what they were when you used it after X seconds, increasing per Clone Shattered.
Other Shatters are also empowered, but always require at least 1 Clone.
The source of all evil, party Quickness & Alacrity. But not at the same time anymore.
Gains access to Shields, a defensive off-hand weapon.
Gains access to Well skills, ground targeted pulsing AoEs.
Gains access to the Chronomancer traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specialisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Chronomancer Abilities
Shatters

Split Second
Shatter all Clones for PBAoE damage. Strikes again for the same damage a second later.

Compared to Mind Wrack, each individual hit does less than it but if you get hit by both it does more damage. This generally doesn’t matter but it’s something to keep in mind, particularly for PvP. Fits nicely w/ the time theme of the spec. Note that Shatter Traits only affect the 1st hit.

Rewinder
Shatter all Clones for PBAoE damage & Confusion. -3s CD per Clone Shattered.

Pretty much the same as Cry of Frustration w/ the additional effect of the CDR per Clone Shattered, so the same notes apply + the thematic note.

Time Sink
Shatter all Clones to Daze & Slow a target.

Compared to Diversion, it’s only 0.5s of Daze vs. 1s but also has the 2s Slow per explosion. In PvE the Daze duration doesn’t matter as it does the same amount of Defiance Bar damage as 1s. But it’s a nerf for PvP in exchange for Slow which is incredibly annoying (slows animation and cast times). Fits time theme again.

Distortion
Exactly the same as the base version.

The same notes apply. That said, when they decided to make specs separate from base classes so they weren’t just always better, this was removed and Continuum Split counted as the “Distortion” skill. This was later reverted, probably because people don’t use Continuum Split for the HP anchor but exclusively for the skill CDs, at least in PvE. Since they had different goals, it didn’t make sense to merge them together, despite presenting a gameplay choice.

Continuum Split
Shatter all Clones and place down a Continuum Rift. When it expires, revert back to the original position w/ the same HP, endurance and skill CDs as when you started. Duration of the Rift is increased per Clone, from 1.5s to 6s. If the Rift is destroyed, you will revert back prematurely.

The main schtick of Chronomancer. Place it down, use your big cooldowns, revert and then use them again. If you would die while it’s down, it reverts you back automatically which gives it a pseudo lifeline. Since it’s instant cast, you can use it at the end of a long animation. You’ll get the skills effects and it technically won’t be on cooldown when you revert since CDs don’t start until the entire animation is completed. This does work against you while in the Split though; you have to finish the animation otherwise it won’t be reset since you technically used it outside of the Split. It resets the CD of almost every skill + Trait, w/ the exception of Mimic for balance reasons I guess? Overall it’s a really cool skill that fits perfectly w/ the time theme. It creates a highlight moment of the 6s where you use as many big CDs as you can, then use them again once reset. There’s some counterplay in PvP by destroying the rift to force it to end early + you have to be careful in PvE to not accidentally leave it in fire or something where it would also end early.

Shield
Defensive off-hand weapon.

Echo of Memory -> Deja Vu
Block attacks for 1.5s. If fully channelled, summon a Phantasm that PBAoE damages & Slows enemies + Protection for allies. If an attack was blocked, Deja Vu is available to be used (by activating again) + the Phantasm is summoned immediately.
Exactly the same as Echo of Memory, but without the ability to cast again.

A defensive Phantasm skill. Does okay damage and the Phantasms + Protection are nice to have; Slow is less useful in PvE. Does make you want to get hit though for max value which is a bit annoying as some attacks can’t be Blocked (some ground AoEs can, some can’t, no discernible difference to tell). Skill design fits perfectly for a defensive time based skill. The only issue is that the defensive nature isn’t always needed in PvE since you’re not always taking damage, making it feel like a semi-wasted skill. Making Deja Vu always available at the end of the lengthy cast, at least in PvE, would make it a lot more consistent and less fight design dependent.

Tides of Time
PBAoE 8 x Might & Swiftness. Launch a moving Ethereal Combo field that damages & Stuns enemies + Blocks Missiles. Returns to you after a medium distance. Touching the wave reduces the CD by 10s.

Used to give both Quickness & Alacrity by default. Chronomancer used to be absolutely required in raids and it was due to its ability to give both Quickness & Alacrity, rendering all other support classes (minus Druid, and only because they had a unique damage buff + Chrono can’t really grant Might) useless. After splitting the 2 by adding them to Traits in the same group of 3 + adding those Boons to other support classes, it’s now become less required and outright replaced (but that’s more of a numbers tweak thing). This skill does have a lot going on even as the base kit version though. 8 x Might that lasts a decent amount of time, CC, projectile blocking, okay damage and a Combo field. The moving and returning wave sort of fits thematically too, and is definitely unique. Since it does a whole bunch at the same time, there’s a choice to be made to hold for the CC or keep it up for its Boons (usually the latter).

Wells

Well of Eternity - Healing
Heal self. Ground targeted Light Combo field that pulses Condition cleansing. At the end, explode for area healing.

Another party heal option w/o having to deal w/ the janky Mantra. It overall heals you for quite a bit too and comes w/ Condition cleansing. The only issue is that the CD is high and it’s delayed (all of these Wells take 3s), which may cause some issues if you need burst healing.

Well of Action - Utility
Ground targeted Ethereal Combo field that pulses damage & Slow. At the end, explode for area 8 x Might, Fury & Superspeed.

Support option. Does the least amount of damage out of the damaging ones, tied with Well of Senility. Previously gave Quickness but was reworked after the whole shifting of Quickness & Alacrity pass. The offensive Boons are nice and can be used to maintain some of the offensive Boons. Superspeed is also there.

Well of Calamity - Utility
Ground targeted Ethereal Combo field that pulses damage, Weakness & Cripple. At the end, explode for area damage.

Offensive option as it does the most damage. Weakness & Cripple are okay but are mostly for PvP. The same notes about Wells & backloaded Chronomancer Wells apply.

Well of Precognition - Utility
Breaks stun & grants self Stability. Ground targeted Ethereal Combo field that pulses Aegis. At the end, explode for area Endurance.

Defensive option. Most of the power is in the pulsing Aegis which can be used to mitigate 3 total attacks. The explosion is really lacklustre though, 30 Endurance. That’s not even enough for 1 dodge. Changing it to either be 50 Endurance or Protection would fit the defensive nature better, as the 30 Endurance is either wasted or not enough.

Well of Senility - Utility
Ground targeted Ethereal Combo field that pulses damage & Chill. At the end, explode for area Daze & 2 x Boon removal.

CC & PvP option. Does the least amount of damage out of the damaging ones, tied with Well of Action. Previously gave Alacrity but was reworked after the whole shifting of Quickness & Alacrity pass. This does give it a lot more use in the PvP sense but it’s pretty much exclusively just CC in PvE.

Gravity Well - Elite
Ground targeted Dark Combo field that pulses damage & CC (Knockdown, Float, Pull). At the end, explode for area damage.

Offensive & area CC Elite option. If you’re going DPS, it’s the only option of the 4 that’s offensive. If you’re going support, it’s an option for both CC & utility from the Well Traits. The CC is only slightly worse than the Signet and is a much lower CD too, making it almost strictly better than the Signet minus the delayed nature of it. For DPS, you have a choice between damage and CC. For support, there’s a choice between heals / Alacrity (via Traits) and CC.

Traits

Time Splitter
Gain access to Chronomancer Shatters & Wells.

As always, including it because it’s the 1st Trait.

Delayed Reactions
Disabling an enemy Slows them. 3s ICD when using CC skills against Defiance Bars.

Little bit of extra CC. Slow is the rarest of the Conditions so every bit counts for Slow related Traits. Still, it’s not enough to maintain a permanent Slow stack on any enemy; that’s just how rare it is. More useful in PvP.

Time Catches Up
Activating a Shatter grants Illusions Superspeed. +10% Shatter damage against movement-impaired enemies.

Minor burst damage boost + makes it easier for your Shatters to go off when they’re zooming at your target. Most of the time in PvE it’s just the +10% damage on Shatters though as mobs don’t run away often and they’re probably going to have some sort of movement impairment Condition or CC on them.

All’s Well That Ends Well
Wells heal when they end.

Healer option. Provides extra healing that may be missing from the other skills / Traits. This obviously requires you to take Wells so keep that in mind. Keep in mind that while Wells can be placed at range, they’re also pretty small in size and require the Wells ending so there may be issues where some heals may be missed.

Flow of Time
Gain Alacrity per Clone Shattered.

Bit of extra Alacrity for just using your skills as part of your rotation. Note that you technically count as a “Clone” so you can use it without any to get a single stack. Provides extra Alacrity padding which never hurts.

Danger Time
+15% Crit Chance against Slowed enemies for you and Illusions.

As mentioned before, Slow is incredibly rare so chances that you get any value out of this is low. Besides, Power builds should already have 100% crit so this is even more useless as you can’t build around it due to how rare Slow is. It used to give Crit Damage as well but that was removed, getting rid of the only useful thing.

Illusionary Reversion
Shatter skills generate a Clone if you have 3.

Extra Clone generation. Not particularly useful as Clones aren’t hard to come by and there usually aren’t enough things to spend them on. Still, it could be useful in PvP for the misdirection side of things + Clones die easier there.

Improved Alacrity
Alacrity applied to you increases recharge by 50% instead of 25% (-33% CD vs. -20%)but lasts -33% of the original duration. +10% Crit Damage w/ Alacrity.

Utility option. Chronomancers generally get more Alacrity than others due to Flow of Time, so the reduced duration is made up. More skills = more damage or more utility, more everything. Note that it only affects you (and other Chronos w/ this Trait).

Time Marches On
+25% Movement Speed. -25% movement-impairing Condition Duration.

Extra mobility, handy but not too impactful just as a minor Trait should be.

Stretched Time
1st pulse of Wells applies Alacrity. Tides of Time also applies PBAoE Alacrity.

Alacrity option. Obviously this requires the use of Wells and Shield. If used on cooldown, 2 basic Wells and Shield are needed to maintain full uptime. For support DPS, it would be Calamity & Action as they’re both offensive in nature. For healers it would be Eternity & Action as they’re both utility based in nature, though you may want to add another one if you don’t want to use your on demand burst heal on CD since it’s a little risky. Alacrity being provided on 1st pulse as opposed to the explosion makes it a lot more user friendly as you don’t need to time everything 3s ahead. It does however lock you into using Wells which aren’t always optimal.

Seize the Moment
PBAoE Quickness per Clone Shattered. Tides of Time also applies PBAoE Quickness.

Quickness option. Unlike the Alacrity option, Shatters are always readily available so you’re not locked into using any specific Utility skills. Shield is still recommended to make the most out of the Trait and to minimise the amount of different gear you need which is annoying with how gear sets are a paid feature :). Compared to the Alacrity version, it’s a lot easier to build around since it’s not locked into certain skills

Chronophantasma
The 1st time a Phantasm would become a Clone, resummon as itself & attack again after being briefly Dazed.

DPS option. Another Phantasm attack = more damage + utility, especially the more Phantasm skills you have. This coupled w/ resetting the CDs via both Continuum Shift + Signet of the Ether = huge amounts of Phantasm skills going off.

Mirage Combat
Gains Mirage Cloak instead of dodging. Has the same amount of iframes but you’re able to control where you’re going the entire duration and can be used without cancelling any attacks. Also grants access to an Ambush Attack for 1.5s afterwards, empowering their auto attack skill.
Mirage Cloak can also be gained via touching Mirage Mirrors and Utility skills.
Shatters are the same as base Mesmer.
Gains access to main hand Axe, focusing on melee Condition damage & mobility.
Gains access to Deception skills which focus on avoiding damage.
Gains access to the Mirage traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specialisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Mirage Abilities
Axe
Main hand only weapon that focuses on Condition damage & mobility.

Lacerating Chop -> Ethereal Chop -> Mirror Strikes
Frontal cleave, damage & Bleeding.
Frontal cleave, same damage & Torment.
PBAoE damage, Bleeding & Torment. Most damage & longest duration DoTs.

The usual melee cleave w/ DoTs for a DoT weapon. 3rd hit is unique in that it’s a PBAoE but other than that it’s the most damage & the DoT lasts the longest.

Lingering Thoughts
Short forward dash that 4 x Combo Whirls. Deals PBAoE damage, Torment & Cripple. Leaves behind a mirage that summons a Clone if it expires while an enemy is near it. 2 charges.

It’s basically PBAoE damage & DoTs that spawns a Clone if you’re melee and up in the bosses grill like everyone else in PvE. There’s a small dash that you can technically count as a gapcloser and the line about leaving a mirage behind for the Clone basically adds the case where if you do use it as a gapcloser, you won’t generate a Clone (so, in PvP). 2 charges means there’s a case to keeping 1 as a gap closer but since it’s short and you can potentially lose out on a Clone, just use it as damage. Only issue is that it always dashes, meaning you go through hitboxes. This is inconsistent w/ other dashes that always stop when hitting a target.

Axes of Symmetry
You & Axe Clones blink to a random location around the target to damage & Confuse. Breaks enemy targeting & Illusions focus the new target. Counts as a Combo Leap & has Evade iframes.

The range on this is medium so it’s more usable than the above. Applies a bunch of Confusion so you’ll want to use this when it’s up + you have 3 Clones. You can also save it as an escape / gapcloser since it blinks and has Evasion iframes at the cost of damage. Target breaking is mostly for PvP as per usual. The only issue is that the location is random for where you end up, making it a little inconsistent. This plays into the misdirection theme and it’s not too annoying as the blink locations are pretty close to each other.

Ambush

Imaginary Axes - Axe
Fires 2 projectiles that home into enemies at a short-mid range to damage & 3 x Torment. Clones apply 1 x Torment.

Objectively better than any part of the auto attack combo as it applies the most amount of Torment (6 total if both hit). Delayed homing means there’s some getting used to when dodging in PvP. Otherwise, it’s just more Torment damage which is what the Axe is already doing (Bleeding is an objectively worse Torment as it does the same damage but without the bonus damage on stationary targets).

Mirage Thrust - Sword
Mid ranged Combo Leap that damages & Dazes. Leave a Clone at the starting position. Clones do not leave a Clone behind.

Adds further mobility to Sword which is part of the Swords identity. Does less damage in exchange for a Leap gap closer & an interrupt. This is more important in PvP since in PvE taking a power weapon on a Condition spec is inefficient in terms of scaling and damage output + you never need that much mobility anyway. Strictly for PvP.

Ether Barrage - Scepter
Long range single target barrage of damage + Confusion OR Torment. Clones have halved Condition duration.

A bit difficult to compare the Scepter attack since it’s not that good in general, its effects are random and aren’t related to the strength of Clone generation that the base version has. It’s objectively better than the first 2 auto attacks in terms of raw damage & DoT damage. It beats the final auto attack in damage but loses out in Torment damage & doesn’t generate a Clone. Its benefit is that Clones also use this skill, adding more damage compared to the standard Scepter Clone attack which is just the 1st auto. Scepter just doesn’t really have any place in most builds, as Axe already covers the main hand by itself just fine.

Split Surge - Greatsword
Fire a damaging beam at the target and 2 other enemies. Every hit applies 2 x Vulnerability & grants 2 x Might.

It’s very good for tagging things as it auto aims the other 2 beams. It is also straight up better than the regular auto attack though, even just the damage is higher. That’s pretty much it though since the Might is only good for solo play (doesn’t grant to allies) and is effectively useless in single target situations. Additionally taking a power weapon on a Condition spec is inefficient, like in Swords case. 

Chaos Vortex - Staff
Fire a projectile that damages, Torments, Confuses & Bleeds enemies. Grants PBAoE 2 x Might & Alacrity. Clones grant their Boons around you instead of themselves and the Alacrity is 25% of the usual duration.

Strictly better than the normal version. It does more damage, applies longer Torment & Confusion, has an additional Bleed and grants the coveted Alacrity. The only downside is that it loses out on Fury, which can be covered elsewhere. It also only hits allies once but does so in an AoE fashion (no bounces). This is the main reason why Alacrity Mesmer leans towards Mirage rather than Chronomancer. Sure, you’re locked to Staff but you get to apply Alacrity in an AoE around yourself instantly without taking up Utility skill slots and do decent DoT damage at the same time. Additionally it’s a unique playstyle of using your dodge as a resource rather than pressing a button on CD.

Deception

Crystal Oasis - Healing
Create a mirage at the current location & heal over time + gain Vigor. When the mirage expires, spawn a Mirage Mirror. Touching a Mirage Mirror deals PBAoE damage & Weakness while granting you Mirage Cloak.

Offensive option for Condi builds (since the good Ambush attacks are mostly Condi). There is a risk involved since it’s a HoT as opposed to being front loaded but you gain Vigor which is a DPS increase (more Ambush attacks) and gives you a Mirage Mirror at the end. The only issue with Mirage Mirrors is that they’re kind of hard to see when there’s so much visual noise, but that doesn’t really matter as long as you remember roughly where you used the skill. Defensively it’s back loaded since you have the HoT and then the free Mirage Cloak after 3s + picking the Mirror.

Crystal Sands - Utility
Ground targeted skill that sends projectiles to converge at the target location. Each projectile damages & applies Confusion before forming a Mirage Mirror in the centre.

Offensive option. This one I probably lost track of the Mirror the most as it’s mid-long range. The projectiles come from a circle around the target and then slither in. Realistically though it’s just a multi hit damage & Confusion attack since they pass through enemies hit rather than being eaten up by random enemies. Mirror spawns fairly quickly as well.

Illusionary Ambush - Utility
Long range blink for you and your Illusions around the target and gain Mirage Cloak. Breaks enemy targeting and Illusions will change focus (except for Phantasms).

Gap closer option. It is targeted so you can’t really use it as an escape. Fits the Deception theme really well as enemies initially can’t tell which one is the real you since it breaks their target. This is obviously more of a PvP skill as Clones don’t need to be by your target for their effects or Shatters. Phantasms not being affected by the focus change is most likely due to technical reasons; their attacks fire off pretty quickly anyway so there’s no time for them to change focus.

Mirage Advance -> Mirage Retreat - Utility
Mid-long range blink that PBAoE damages & Blinds at destination.
Activate again to return to the starting location.

Another gap closer option. While this one also requires a target, it’s also a bit more versatile since you can go back to where you were before. The damage on it isn’t great and if you’re playing Mirage you’re playing for Condi anyway. It’s shorter range and doesn’t have the Clone deception thing going on but the Blind + return makes it more versatile. Or you could take both and be super mobile.

Sand through Glass - Utility
Breaks stun and Evade backwards, leaving behind a Mirage Mirror.

Defensive option. You have 0.5s of Evade so it’s a good stun break. It leaves the Mirror behind where you were though and you roll back a decent amount of distance so there’s a small gap between your Evade and picking up the Mirror. Otherwise it’s just what you expect from a Defensive Deception skill. Stun break + a Mirror / Mirage Cloak.

Jaunt - Elite
Low-mid range blink that acts as a Combo Leap. Removes 1 Condition & deals damage + applies Confusion in an AoE at the destination. 3 charges.

Offensive Condi option for the Elite slot. Ground targeted; doesn’t require a target. While the range isn’t the best, it still counts as mobility so you have a choice between damage & mobility (and some Utility with the Condi cleanse I guess), even w/ 3 charges making it less risky. There are Rune sets that interact w/ when an Elite skill is used, so you can also time the uses for max procs (they usually have a CD). It’s also just really fun blinking everywhere and doing decent damage at the same time.

Traits

Mirage Cloak
Gain Mirage Cloak instead of dodge rolling. Ambush skills are available after gaining Mirage Cloak for a limited time. Gain access to Deception skills.

As always, including it because it’s the 1st trait.

Self-Deception
Create a Clone when using a Deception skill if you have any other Clones active.

Clone generation option. Requires you taking Deception skills but you generally take Crystal Sands & Jaunt anyway due to their Condi damage. Take it if you need help w/ Clone generation. The conditional of having at least 1 but not 3 Clones to get value means you have an extra thing to keep an eye on before using the skills.

Renewing Oasis
Gain Regen when gaining Mirage Cloak. -20% Damaging Condition Duration on self while you have Regen (excluding Poison for some reason).

Defensive option. Synergises w/ the Chaos tree as that has several Traits that grant bonus effects under Regen too. Overall it’s defensive but if you need Regen uptime then this is an option, at the cost of extra Clones (more damage / utility) or damage.

Riddle of Sand
Entering combat, the 1st Ambush attack that hits applies 2 Confusion stacks. Refreshes when using a Shatter.

Offensive option. Makes Ambush attacks stronger for Condi builds, something that you’re constantly using. That’s pretty much it. It’s the default option if you don’t need the extra Clones or the Regen / defensive utility.

Nomad’s Endurance
Shatters give Vigor & Vigor grants Condition Damage.

More Vigor for more dodging = more Mirage Cloaks = more Ambush skills. Grants even more Condi damage, reiterating the spec as the DoT spec.

Desert Distortion
Illusions Shattered by Distortion become Mirage Mirrors. Ambush skills also become available for a short time after granting self Distortion.

Versatile option, offensive if you’re not using an Axe. If you use Distortion w/ 3 Clones up, you’ll get 3 Mirrors and a free Ambush attack too. That of course means you’re using Distortion which means 2 things: Clones being used on something other than damage and Distortion being on CD. With its large CD, there’s a huge risk in using this strictly for damage, meaning this is more of a “when you use Distortion, here’s some extra Mirrors” kind of situation. Still, if you’re not using an Axe and don’t need the Protection, it’s the only option.

Mirage Mantle
Gain Protection when Mirage Cloak ends.

Defensive option. This is for solo / PvP since Protection is covered by support roles. Adds extra tankiness for when your iframes finish. Doesn’t help against Conditions but that’s the case w/ Mirage Cloak anyway.

Mirrored Axes
-20% Axe skill CDs. Axe skills spawn an additional Phantom Axe which damages & inflicts Torment. Seeking axes for Axe 2, 3 and Ambush. Spinning axes for Axe 1.3.

Offensive option, if you’re using an Axe. CDR is nothing new but always appreciated. The extra axes are effectively just more damage & Torment, but done in a more tangible way w/ Axes spinning everywhere. Axes from skills 2, 3 & the Ambush skill have homing axes while the axe from the final auto attack chain is PBAoE, matching the melee nature of the chain.

Speed of Sand
+66% Movement Speed while in Mirage Cloak.

Super speed during Mirage Cloak makes it so you can reposition a lot easier. You can still enter Mirage Cloak while under the effects of Cripple & Chill, meaning you’re immune but hobbling away. This at least helps a little bit against that, otherwise who doesn’t like running really quickly, even for a short amount of time.

Infinite Horizon
When gaining Mirage Cloak, your Illusions also gain it.

Offensive + utility option, spreading the main mechanic of the spec onto your Illusions. Forces your Clones to use Ambush skills like you, though sometimes at a reduced effect. Also breaks stun on them which is a pretty niche case but helpful. Doesn’t affect Phantasms but they don’t last long enough anyway to matter and they only use their one skill. 

Elusive Mind
Dodging removes 3 x Conditions.

Defensive PvP option as Conditions aren’t that common in PvE. Also makes you lose out on Infinite Horizon, which increases the highlight of the spec to up to 4x the usual amount!

Dune Cloak
You use Sand Shards when Mirage Cloak ends. Sand Shards: PBAoE damage and Boon strip. Gain a copy of any removed Boon (w/ its own base duration).

Offensive PvP option as Boons aren’t that common on enemies in PvE. Doesn’t affect Clones in the case of Illusionary Ambush. It’s PBAoE so you’ll need to stick on top of enemies, but that’s pretty easy w/ all the gap closers available. Basically take it if you need the Boon strip, otherwise Infinite Horizon is where it’s at.

Virtuoso Combat
No longer summons Clones but creates a stocked Blade that stays above you to be consumed via Bladesongs which replace Shatters.
“Clone” cap is increased from 3 to 5.
Bladesongs generally do the same thing as their Shatter counterpart (damage, Confuse, CC & Distortion).
Gains an additional “Shatter” that deals some PBAoE damage & Blocks attacks, an extra defensive CD.
Gains access to main hand Dagger, focusing on fast ranged piercing attacks.
Gains access to Psionic skills which focus on either generating stocked Blades or using Blades to attack (doesn’t consume stocked ones, but are classified as Blades for Trait purposes).
Gains access to the Virtuoso traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specialisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Virtuoso Abilities
Bladesongs

Bladesong Harmony
Fire all stocked Blades at the target, each dealing piercing damage.

Unlike the Shatter counterpart, the damage scales linearly. Even though that generally didn’t matter since there’s nothing else to spend Clones on if you have a power build, it’s something to note. Basically it’s what you expect from the power damage Bladesong. Note that each Blade fires after another w/ a slight delay. Generally it doesn’t matter but it’s something to keep in mind, more for PvP.

Bladesong Sorrow
Fire all stocked Blades at the target, each dealing piercing damage & Confusion.

Condi version of the above. Fires all Blades at the same time so you can dodge them all at once in PvP. While it doesn’t scale as well as Harmony for power, it does still scale so you can still use this, as long as you have 5 Blades by the next time Harmony is up.

Bladesong Dissonance
Combine all stocked Blades into 1 to damage & Daze the target. Daze increases per blade.

CC option. Doesn’t require the previous Daze to fall off before applying the new ones since it’s just a singular application, making it a lot more streamlined and consistent. Other than that, it’s literally just a ranged version of the Shatter.

Bladesong Distortion
Consume all stocked Blades and gain Distortion for each one consumed.

Essentially the same as the Shatter version, but w/ the added benefit of having a higher cap since you can have 5 Blades but only 3 Clones.

Bladesong Requiem
Consume all stocked Blades for PBAoE damage & Block. Increased PBAoE damage duration per consumed Blade.

The damage on this is pretty bad and you don’t have enough Blade generation to even consider this being a 3rd offensive option, especially since Harmony only has a 12s CD so it’s purely a defensive skill. Originally replaced Distortion back when they tried making base specs viable w/ more advantages & disadvantages. Since the only thing that scales w/ the number of Blades is the very weak PBAoE damage, there’s no real reason to have many Blades be consumed (you need at least 1 to use it).

Dagger
Long ranged main hand only weapon that focuses on fast attacks.

Flying Cutter
Ranged piercing attack that damages. If you hit a target 3 times, deal an additional flurry of damaging attacks (3x). Acts as a 20% Combo Projectile & a Blade.

Usual ranged auto attack. It has a long range too which is pretty interesting considering it’s a Dagger; would’ve thought mid-high range would’ve been generous already. The Flurry attacks don’t pierce so they technically can be blocked (they fire from around the enemy inwards) but that’s generally not an issue in single target situations. 

Bladecall
Throw out 3 piercing projectiles that damage on the way out & in when they return. Stock a Blade if it hits at least 1 target. Acts as a 20% Combo Projectile & a Blade.

Despite being 3 separate projectiles, you can’t be hit by more than 1 which makes it more consistent and less reliant on shotgunning. The range is also long and it takes roughly 3 seconds from activation to finish returning so there’s plenty of time to dodge it (relevant for PvP). Otherwise it’s the “Clone” generator skill that’s AoE damaging.

Unstable Bladestorm
Launch a slow piercing damaging projectile that also fires piercing Blades at enemies every 1.5s for a total of 4 times.

On paper this sounds like it’s a very hitbox reliant skill as it’s both moving & fires out projectiles (plural). But the contact damage only happens once, so there’s no hitbox shenanigans. The range of the Blades that comes out is pretty high, so it consistently hits enemies + it pierces and you can only be hit by 1 Blade per pulse, so it’s actually really consistent. Overall it just needs you to fire it in the general direction of the enemy to get max value, which is a lot better than certain other hitbox reliant skills. It’s essentially just more damage that’s dealt in waves and can be easily dodged as the bulk of the burst damage (~3.5x a Blade’s damage) is from the contact.
Small Sword Change

Blade Leap -> Returning Edge
This replaces Illusionary Leap for Virtuoso as they don’t generate Clones. Instead of creating a Clone that leaps at the enemy to damage & Cripple, it Leaps you instead. 

The recast obviously sends you back to where you were rather than swapping places w/ your Clone which would’ve been melee range of the target.

Psionic

Twin Blade Restoration - Healing
Heal self then throw 2 Blades at the enemy. If the 1st hits, remove a Condition. If the 2nd hits, gain Aegis & a random Boon (Regen, Swiftness or Vigor).

It heals for an above average amount and does provide some utility via the Aegis & random Boon, unreliable as they are. The singular Condition cleanse is okay and the damage isn’t enough to write home about. The main advantage of this heal is that it counts as 2 Blades for Trait purposes, some of which Bleed or apply Vulnerability when critting. If you want more Blades and some utility, then this is an option. Otherwise if you want an offensive heal stick with Signet of the Ether.

Blade Renewal - Utility
Channel for 3s, gaining Distortion for the duration. Stock Blades progressively during the channel up to the max.

Defensive option. 3s of immunity & prepares Blades for you for more damage or even more immunity, making it pretty versatile. It’s got a very big CD as you’d expect and generally dedicated immunity skills are only useful in PvP as you can either mitigate or be healed back up in PvE pretty easily. Still, it’s an option to cheese some mechanics if you really need the immunity.

Rain of Swords - Utility
Ground targeted AoE field (not combo) that pulses damage & 3 x Vulnerability. Each pulse counts as a Blade.

None of the Blade traits have a CD, so fast multi hitting AoE attacks are very powerful for Virtuoso and this is no exception. It’s a basic AoE pulsing damage attack but its synergy w/ said Traits make it even stronger. And who doesn’t like shiny pinkish swords falling from the sky?

Psychic Force - Utility
Breaks stun. PBAoE damage & knockback + gain Fury & 8 x Might. Counts as a Blade.

The other defensive option, this time for CC. The knockback makes it generally a safe stun break, the only exception being if the enemies either outnumber 5 or are CC immune themselves but that’s pretty rare. The Boons Might & Fury fit the offensive nature of the spec, especially focusing on critting. It only counts as a single Blade though so it’s going to proc less often than the multi hit attacks.

Sword of Decimation - Utility
Ground targeted AoE Blade that damages & Immobilizes. Double damage against hard CC’d or Downed enemies.

Overall this does less damage than Rain of Swords, scales for less and only counts as a singular Blade. The upside is that it has some soft CC on it and is burst vs. periodic, making it better in PvP if the enemy is CC’d. Otherwise it’s worse off since they can just dodge all of the damage. The double damage portion is almost never procced in PvE except for the couple of seconds after a Defiance Bar is broken, so it’s outright worse than Rain of Swords in group content.

Thousand Cuts - Elite
Targeted line AoE of piercing, unblockable Blades that damage every 0.5s for 5s.

While it’s technically just AoE damage, it counts as 10 whole Blades for traits. It takes 5 seconds for the whole effect so some skill is needed to make sure you aim it properly but other than that it’s a regular AoE skill, except this time horizontal instead of falling from the sky. It feels a bit thin compared to Rain of Swords though, but that’s probably for the best w/ all the visual noise that’s currently in the game. Compared to the other 3 available Elites, it’s the most offensive one for both power (by default) and Condi (Blade Traits).

Traits

Psychic Blades
Stock a Blade instead of summoning Clones; they last indefinitely until consumed by Bladesongs which replace Shatters and inherit their Traits. Stock a Blade every 10s out of combat.

Not included in the description is access to Psionic skills. Additionally, Mirror Blade, Mind Stab and Phantasmal Berserker from Greatsword count as Blade skills. Feels like a major oversight to not include it honestly. It’s a cool and fitting synergy that sort of does lock you into using Greatsword (at least for power since it’s a power weapon), even if they’re pretty cool.

Bladeturn Refrain
Bladesongs grant Aegis.

Defensive option. It can potentially block a lot of attacks if you use all 5 (including the 2 inherently defensive ones) but each requires a Blade to be used so it’s a little janky in those cases. Still it’s a defensive boost that could be useful in PvP, even if it will only eat a single auto attack. 

Mental Focus
+10% Strike Damage against enemies within mid range.

Power DPS option. Only requires you to be within mid range which you should be anyway for Boons and healing. Technically it’s a risk reward thing but  most fights need to accommodate melee builds anyway so there’s no real risk. So in the end it’s just a flat 10% damage boost 90% of the time (some leeway for mechanic downtime).

Jagged Mind
Blade attacks inflict Bleeding on crit. Heal for 3% of your Condition damage (as in damage from Conditions, not the stat).

Condi DPS option. Blade skills synergise w/ Condi builds a lot more due to this Trait being optional and Condi focused. Encourages an almost hybrid build that focuses on crit chance more than usual. Provides sound pretty good sustain too.

Deadly Blades
Blades inflict Vulnerability on crit. After completing a Bladesong, +5% All Damage for 5s. Does not stack.

The only other Blade trait, and it’s taken by default. The Blade interaction is handy but not all that important since Vulnerability isn’t rare in group scenarios. The main effect is the active damage boost after using a Bladesong, turning them into pseudo damage CDs. This changes how you play your rotation which is neat, making both the damaging Bladesongs attractive to their non-main builds since the damage increase is all damage.

Duelist’s Reversal
Blocking or Dodging an attack grants Quickness, Fury & Regen.

Sort of defensive option, as it rewards doing something defensive rather than being defensive in nature. Note that it requires an attack to be Blocked / Dodged so you can’t just dodge randomly for the Boons. That itself makes it less valuable in PvE. Continues w/ the crit theme w/ the Fury and it seems like an okay PvP Trait as Boons aren’t dispensed through a support like it is in PvE. Accordingly, I don't see much use of this in PvE.

Phantasmal Blades
Phantasms that complete their attack launch a Phantasmal Blade at their target & grant you Fury. Phantasmal Blade: damage that counts as a Blade.

Power DPS option. Phantasms doing an extra power attack is nice, especially since you’re probably going to be resetting their CDs w/ Signet of the Ether for even more damage & Fury. More Fury is nice but that’s mostly for solo or PvP since they’re usually covered by a support. Small interaction w/ the Deadly Blades Vulnerability portion which is okay. You can sort of control when to get these effects but since there are so many Phantasm skills, it sort of just happens naturally in your rotation.

Sharpening Sorrow
Gain Fury when activating Bladesong Sorrow. Fury increases Expertise.

Condi DPS option. Mostly for the extra Expertise from Fury, lowering the amount you need from gear so you can put more into Condition Damage / Precision or whatever. Extra Fury is okay but again, covered by a support usually. It’s nice that it’s given via an active method rather than periodically in combat so you can sort of control when you get it, giving you a bit of agency.

Quiet Intensity
Fury grants an additional 15% Crit Chance (40% total). Gain Ferocity based on 10% Vitality.

Extra Crit Chance means less spent on Precision in gear. Also requires Fury instead of just being a passive +15% so there’s some management required (from other players since there’s no Virtuoso support build). Also grants more Crit Damage based on HP which you don’t really build outside of PvP. Both builds benefit from the Ferocity since the Condi build relies on crits anyway to apply the Bleeding, so despite looking like a power Trait it’s actually a general DPS Trait.

Psychic Riposte
Blocking or Dodging an attack stocks 3 Blades and causes the next Bladesong to be Unblockable.

Another sort of defensive option (rewards defensive actions). Also requires an attack to be Blocked / Dodged so value in PvE drops. Stocking 3 Blades is handy but Infinite Forge is a more consistent Blade generator. The Unblockable effect is also only useful in PvP which seals the deal of this being a PvP Trait.

Infinite Forge
Automatically stock a Blade every 3s in combat.

Passive Blade generation option. In a consistent rotation there’s no need for more Blades since you have enough to cover 2 Bladesongs being used on-almost-CD. That makes this feel like it’s more of a PvP Trait where you want / need to use more Bladesongs consistently to survive and deal damage. It’s also not very interesting since it’s passive generation, but not everything has to be super innovative.

Bloodsong
+25% Damage for the Bleeding you apply. Stock a Blade after every 5 stacks of Bleeding you have applied.

All 3 options are Blade generators and this one is no different; the DPS option. Despite barely doing anything for power builds it’s the only offensive option, so it’s taken by default. So where does the Bleeding come from if you’re not taking the Condi option earlier? Sharper Images under the Dueling traitline provides Bleeding on Illusion crit and is a minor Trait so it’s always taken. Since Blades inherit Clone Traits, this works. So long as you’re generating Phantasms and launching Blades both through Bladesongs and Blade skills, you’ll be generating Blades. Even more in AoE situations. The extra Bleeding damage is nice but since you’re not building for it in power builds it doesn’t really do much more.


In the interest of time, I will probably only go through the support builds of the following classes.
Ranger
Ranger Combat
Okay archetype, personally not a fan of pets but there’s some nature magic stuff going on. Honestly I only made one because of Druid back in the day, the other 2 specs don’t really interest me and are only used since you can’t really solo anything as a Druid.
As mentioned, their central theme is Pets. There’s a whole bunch with their own skills and you can swap between 2 during combat (only 1 is out at a time). Pets of the same animal family share 3 skills and the 4th is always unique to that sort of pet (Black Bear vs. Brown Bear).
Pets are the tankiest of the minions / pets in the game, but they still suffer from any issues that come with pet AI.
Standard 2 weapon skill bars, swapping in combat has a cooldown.
Profession mechanic revolves around the pet w/ keybinds dedicated to choosing the target, commanding the pet to use its unique skill (the other 3 are automatic, 1 is an auto and 2 are longer CDs), calling pet back to your side and swapping pets. There’s also an option to change pet behaviour (defend or wait for commands only) and stowing / unleashing the pet.
Pets are caught around the open world by interacting w/ the juvenile version of them which are passive.
Medium HP and medium armour. Technically the tankiest of the medium armour classes due to the pet acting as a pseudo HP bar sometimes.
Ranger Abilities
Pet Skills
There are too many Pet skills to include, so the title will have anything unique from their non-controlled skills (beyond damage) and then it will have the unique skills of each pet. There’s also underwater Pets but I’m not going to include them. 

Your Pets do not gain any of that stats you do from gear, so it’s more difficult (impossible) for them to reach Crit, Boon or Condition duration caps. Healers generally want CC as Pets, Power DPS wants Power Damage & CC focused Pets and Condi DPS wants Conditions & CC focused Pets.
Bear - Self healing and becoming immune to damage

Rending Maul - Arctodus
Single target damage & 2 x Bleeding.

Enfeebling Roar - Black Bear
PBAoE damage & Weakness.

Shake It Off - Brown Bear
PBAoE 2 x Condition Cleanse.

Poison Cloud - Murellow
PBAoE Poison Combo field that pulses damage & Poison.

Icy Roar - Polar Bear
PBAoE damage & Chill.
Bird - Vulnerability & PBAoE Swiftness

Lacerating Slash - Eagle & Hawk
Single target damage & 2 x Bleeding.



Chilling Slash - Owl
Single target damage & Chill.

Blinding Slash - Raven & White Raven
Single target damage & Blind.
Bristleback - Ranged Turtle that Damages & Bleeds

Spike Barrage
Barrage of 10 x Damage.
Canine - Crippling & Knockdown Gapclosers

Chilling Howl - Alpine Wolf
PBAoE damage & Chill.

Regenerate - Fern Hound
PBAoE healing & Regen.

Howl of the Pack - Hyena
Summon a Hyena to fight with you.

Intimidating Howl - Krytan Drakehound
PBAoE damage & Immobilize.

Terrifying Howl - Wolf
PBAoE damage & Fear.
Devourer - Ranged Scorpion that Poisons, Knocks Back & Evades

Poisonous Cloud - Carrion Devourer
Ranged targeted Poison Combo field that pulses damage & Poison.

Rending Barbs - Lashtail Devourer
Single target ranged barrage of 6 x damage + 6 x Bleeding.

Poison Barbs - Whiptail Devourer
5 x fan of single target ranged damage & Poison. Each is a 20% Combo Projectile.
Drake - Lizards that can heal self & deal PBAoE damage

Frost Breath - Ice Drake
Frontal cone of damage & Chill.

Insect Swarm - Marsh Drake
Frontal cone of damage & Poison.

Sonic Shriek - Reef Rake
Frontal cone of damage & Confusion.

Lightning Breath - River Drake
Fires bouncing projectiles that damage.

Fire Breath - Salamander Drake
Frontal cone of damage & Burning.
Fanged Iboga - Plant Demorgon thing that’s ranged & applies Confusion & Torment

Fang Grapple
Long ranged pull that damages & Immobilizes.
Feline - Damages & applies Vulnerability & Bleeding

Savannah Strike - Cheetah
Combo Leap Blink to target for PBAoE damage & Swiftness.

Stalk - Jaguar
Gain Stealth.

Mighty Roar - Jungle Stalker
PBAoE “extreme” (5) x Might.

Rending Pounce - Lynx
Combo Leap to target for single target damage & Bleeding.

Blinding Roar - Sand Lion
PBAoE damage & Blindness.

Icy Pounce - Snow Leopard
Combo Leap to target for single target damage & Chill.

Furious Pounce - Tiger
Short ranged pounce that damages & PBAoE Fury.

Guardian’s Roar & Phase Pounce - White Tiger
PBAoE Aegis.

Including Phase Pounce since it’s a unique non-controlled skill for White Tiger. It’s a blink that does PBAoE damage & Bleeding.
Jacaranda - Plant thing that applies Vulnerability & heals self

Jacaranda’s Embrace
Ranged projectile that pulses damage, 5 x Vulnerability & 5 x Immobilize on target.
Moa - PBAoE heal & damage + Vulnerability

Dazing Screech - Black Moa & Pink Moa
Frontal cone of damage & Daze. Black Moa does 3 pulses whereas Pink Moa does only 1 instance but it lasts twice as long + does more damage.

Protecting Screech - Blue Moa
PBAoE Protection.

Furious Screech - Red Moa
PBAoE Fury.

Icy Screech - White Moa
PBAoE damage & Chill.
Phoenix - Vulnerability & Knockback

Gale Breath
Frontal cone of pulsing damage.
Porcine - Bleeding & Knockdown. Forages for a *Random* Weapon Skill that you need to pick up

Bone Crack / Throw Rock / Skull Fear - Boar
Melee damage & Stun.
Ranged damage & Daze. 20% Combo Projectile.
PBAoE Fear, a longer duration the closer they are.



Healing Seed / Eat Egg / Drink - Pig
Water Combo field that pulses healing, Regen & Condition cleanse.
Heal.
Invulnerability.

Consume Plasma / Throw Feathers / Blinding Tuft - Siamoth
Gain every Boon.
PBAoE Blindness & Stealth self.
PBAoE Blindness & Stealth self (exactly the same).

Throw Gunk / Exploding Venom Sack / Throw Scale - Warthog
Ground targeted Ethereal Combo field that pulses damage & random Conditions.
Ground targeted Poison Combo field that pulses Poison.
Single target ranged damage, Bleeding, Poison & Weakness. 20% Combo Projectile.
Rock Gazelle - Vulnerability & Dazing Gapcloser

Head Toss
Single target heavy damage & Launch.
Smokescale - Dinosaur that knocks down & Evades

Smoke Cloud
Smoke Combo field.
Spider - Ranged. Immobilizes & Creates Poison Combo Fields

Paralyzing Venom - Black Widow Spider & Jungle Spider
Next attack Immobilizes.

Weakening Venom - Cave Spider
Next 2 attacks 3 x Vulnerability + Weakness.

Deadly Venom - Forest Spider
Next 3 attacks Poison.
Turtle - Ranged. PBAoE Launch & Melee Bleeding

Hunker Down
PBAoE barrier that blocks projectiles & pulses Protection.
Wallow - Bleeds & PBAoE Poison Combo Field

Bloodthirsty Charge
Charge that knocks back, damages & Bleeds.
Wyvern - Cripples & Knocks Back

Lightning Assault - Electric Wyvern
Charge that damages & Launches then PBAoE Lightning Combo field.

Consuming Flame - Fire Wyvern
Evades for a frontal line of pulsing Burning. Fire Combo field for the final 3 Pulses (of 6).

Greatsword
High damage & slow attacks w/ cleave. 2H.

Slash -> Slice -> Enduring Swing
Frontal cleave, damage.
Frontal cleave, same damage.
Frontal cleave, most damage & recovers 15 Endurance.

Typical melee cleave. Would be nice if 2nd did more damage than 1st but less than 3rd. Endurance recovery makes this feel more like a PvP weapon since dodging is required more often in PvP. It’s extra active mitigation which is nice and involved but not needed in PvE.

Maul
Frontal cleave for damage & 5 x Vulnerability. Pet gains +50% Damage on next attack.

Big damaging skill on a low CD even without the CD reset from Hilt Bash. Best used before a Pet’s damaging CD, but since it has 3 skills that it uses automatically it’s somewhat difficult to control. Much more reliable in Soulbeast where you merge w/ your Pet and gain their skills. If pets were better managed / auto attacks don’t consume the buff, it would be better. Or it could just be a flat damage increase rather than a % increase.

Swoop
Gap closer + Combo Leap for damage when in range. Evasion iframes while leaping.

Gap closer w/ inbuilt iframes. It’s a little tricky to time though as there’s a starting animation and the iframe is only 0.5s but it’s an option for those w/ good ping. 

Counterattack -> Counterattack Kick
Block for 3s. If an attack is Blocked, able to Kick within 5s.
Single target damage & Knockback. Evasion iframes.

Since it requires being hit, it’s less of a reliable CC source in PvE and more of a PvP skill, especially w/ the iframes. Still, it’s an extra defensive skill that can provide some extra CC but probably not at the time you need it during Defiance Bar CC phases.

Hilt Bash
Single target damage & Daze. Stun instead of Daze if hit from behind. Refreshes Maul CD on any directional hit.

CC that can also be used for DPS (by refreshing Maul’s CD). Maul only has a 4s CD though so you’re not missing out on too much if you hold this skill, only if you strictly save it for CC will you run into big DPS losses. The difference between Daze & Stun in PvE doesn’t matter since it deals the same CC damage against Defiance Bars; only matters in PvP.

Longbow
Long range damage & CC. 2H.

Long Range Shot
Very long range single target damage. Does more damage the farther away the target is. 20% Combo Projectile.

It’s incredibly long ranged, which could be useful in certain cases? Damage fall off isn’t that bad to warrant not grouping up in melee range for Boons & healing; it’s only 80% of the usual damage. Its only drawback is being single target w/ no piercing.

Rapid Fire
Single target barrage of damage & 10 x Vulnerability. Each shot is a 20% Combo Projectile.

Bunch of single target damage & Vulnerability (100% uptime). Has a good chance of at least 1 Combo projectile too. But overall it’s just a bunch of single target damage. This being single target is fine, the auto should at least hit another enemy.

Hunter’s Shot
Single target damage & self Stealth. Pet gains Swiftness. Combo Projectile.

Damage is weak & Swiftness isn’t useful for Pets most of the time. Stealth can be useful but you’re generally not the one being targeted. It’s a much better PvP skill.

Point-Blank Shot
Single target damage & knockback. The closer they are, the farther it pushes. Combo Projectile.

Does okay damage and it’s CC, so you have a choice between damage or CC. In PvE the distance of the knockback doesn’t matter as all knockbacks deal the same amount of Defiance Bar damage. 

Barrage
Channel for pulsing damage & Cripple in a ground targeted AoE.

Big damaging skill. Requires a channel which is easy to mess up. Other than that, it’s big damage you use on CD. Cripple is also there but again not that useful in PvE.

Shortbow
Mid-long range Condition weapon. 2H.

Crossfire
Single target damage & Bleeding. Longer Bleeding when flanking from the side or behind. 20% Combo Projectile.

It’s what you expect from a ranged Condition weapon. In group content you’re pretty much always flanking so you always get the longer duration Bleed (3s vs 2s). Not sure how properly implemented this is though as not many skills have a flanking bonus (that is to say, if it works great. But some enemies don’t even have a side / back you can hit, will you get the bonus then?) Again the only issue is it’s single target. Even just 1 more target would make it feel better.

Poison Volley
5 x piercing arrows that damage & apply Poison. Longer Poison when flanking from the side or behind.

You can shotgun the same target for 5 x damage & Poison. This only becomes an issue if you’re at range, which you’re generally not as you’re clumped behind the boss for Boons & healing. Same notes about flanking apply.

Quick Shot
Evade backwards & fire a Combo Projectile that damages & grants self Swiftness.

Since this is a Condi weapon and this has no Conditions on it, you generally only use it for the Evasion. It’s only 0.5s so it’s less reliable on higher ping but there’s some skill expression in it. Swiftness is nice and you can have 100% uptime w/ just this skill.

Crippling Shot
Single target Combo Projectile that damages & Cripples. When flanking from the side or behind, Immobilize. Pets next 3 attacks Bleed.

Half CC, half Condition so you have a choice to make. It’s only soft CC though so in PvE you just use it on CD, which makes it a little less interesting but you get more damage ticks so all is right in the world. Same notes about flanking apply.

Concussion Shot
Single target damaging Combo Projectile that Dazes. Stun if hit from the side or behind.

Dedicated CC button. No difference between Daze & Stun in PvE against Defiance Bars so there’s no need to flank. Same notes about flanking apply.

Sword
Short ranged & versatile (offensive, defensive, mobility). Main hand only.

Slash -> Crippling Thrust -> Precision Swipe
Frontal cleave, damage.
Frontal cleave, same damage & Cripples.
Frontal cleave, most damage. Grants Pet Might per enemy hit (max 3).

Bit of a weird weapon in that it’s hybrid, but it doesn’t do better than any of the other dedicated power or Condi weapons so it’s pretty much only used in PvP because of the Evades. Attack combo is what you expect but most of the effects aren’t useful in PvE at all: Cripple not being useful and Might not being enough for the Pet (they usually don’t gain Might from support since they can only hit 5 targets, Pet being the 6th).

Monarch’s Leap -> Serpent’s Strike
Combo Leap at target to damage & Cripple. Serpent’s Strike available for 5s.
Evasive roll behind target to damage & Poison.

Lots of mobility & Evasion makes this a good PvP skill. Damages & Poisons which makes it a sort of hybrid skill, whereas the other 2 only do power damage so it's stuck as a hybrid which isn’t that great in PvE most of the time. Also the Evade is kind of janky since you roll around and then behind the enemy which takes some getting used to vs. a forward roll / dash.

Hornet Sting
Single target damage & Evade backwards. Reset Monarch’s Leap CD if it hits.

Evades + resets the CD of the gap closer + Evade (and Poison) skill for even more Evades. Solidifies the weapons identity as the PvP weapon.

Axe
Mid-high ranged weapon that focuses on damage & CC. Main hand or off-hand.

Ricochet
20% Combo Projectile that damages & grants Might. Can bounce once.

Pretty standard ranged attack. Bounces once so it’s less bad in AoE situations. Might isn’t all that handy since it’s only 5s long but can help sometimes.

Splitblade
5 x piercing 20% Combo Projectiles that damage & Bleed.

Same as the other shotgunning skills, it does more the closer you are to the target since they can be hit by multiple axes. Pierces so it’s not as bad in AoE situations. It’s mostly Bleeding damage but it does decent damage if you manage to shotgun all 5 shots, which isn’t all that difficult in group content situations since you’re in melee range anyway.

Winter’s Bite
Ranged targeted AoE that damages, Bleeds & Chills. Pet’s next attack Weakens.

Does good ranged AoE damage. Has some CC & DoT damage attached to it as well, making it a sort of hybrid weapon (at least the main hand version). Inflicting both Chill & Weakness is also incredibly annoying in PvP since their CDs are longer, they’re slower and the attacks that do actually hit have a chance to only do 50% damage. In PvE it’s just extra damage that outdamages the auto.

Path of Scars
Ground targeted Combo Projectile that damages on the way out before returning to damage & Pull in enemies.

Does okay damage but the main use is the Pull / CC. CC to break Defiance Bars and Pulls to group up adds. Otherwise you can use it for a bit of extra damage since it’s on a 15s CD, though it’s obviously a bit of a risk if you don’t have enough CC for later.

Whirling Defense
Channelled PBAoE damage & 12 x Vulnerability. Grant self Resolution & reflect Projectiles. Counts as a Combo Whirl.

Can either be used offensively for the damage + Vulnerability or defensively for the projectile reflect (and Resolution but it’s only 4s). It is channelled and melee range so it’s both risky and easy to interrupt if you’re not used to it, so there’s extra risk involved but you are rewarded w/ good damage from the skill itself and even more damage from reflecting the projectiles (if there are any). Most mechanics don’t require a reflect but when it does you’ll have the option to take care of it.

Dagger
Off-hand only Condi weapon.

Stalker’s Strike
Single target damage & 3 x Poison while Evading attacks. Double damage & + 2 x Poison when used against movement-impaired enemies.

Strong Condi effects that also grants 1.25s of Evade, making it strong defensively as well. Has synergy w/ Crippling Talon as Cripple counts as movement-impairing. Choice between damage & active mitigation via Evade, but it’s only a 10s CD so you’re not as punished for it.

Crippling Talon
Single target long ranged Combo Projectile that damages, Cripples & 3 x Bleeds. 2 charges.

Decent Bleeding and while Cripple isn’t that useful in PvE, it has synergy w/ Stalker’s Strike. Other than that it’s just a ranged DoT & soft CC, not too exciting. 2 charges means you can technically save it for soft CC but that’s for PvP.

Torch
Off-hand only Condi weapon.

Throw Torch
Long range targeted AoE that damages & Burns.

It’s AoE damage & Burning. There’s nothing else to it so use it on CD or during damage buffs if your class has some. Range helps but that’s mostly for PvP. Good thing it’s AoE as it makes sense thematically and mechanically. Burning vs. Poison so there’s some choice in terms of Traits / Runes / Sigils (item set bonuses sort of).

Bonfire
Places a Fire Combo field beneath you that damages & Burns.

It’s a Fire Combo field that damages & Burns. Combine w/ Axe’s Whirling Defense for a bunch of Fire Bolts that Burn for more damage. Other than that, it’s just damage so use on CD. Requires you to be in melee range so sort of risky but you should be melee range anyway for Boons & healing.

Warhorn
Off-hand only support weapon.

Hunter’s Call
Single target damage & 16 x Vulnerability.

Covers 16 out of the 25 Vulnerability stacks which is amazing, even if they only last 5s by default (and it’s unlikely a support build will have Condition Duration stats). This kick starts everyone's damage at the beginning before they apply their own Vulnerability. Single target is fine as it’s a very powerful debuff, just make sure you tabbed to the correct one.

Call of the Wild
PBAoE Fury, 6 x Might & Swiftness for allies & Daze + Weaken for enemies. Blasts combos.

Big Boon buffs that can have 100% uptime w/ max Boon Duration + Alacrity. The range for the enemy effects is much lower so you’re put in more risk to get the CC off but again, you’re almost always in melee range. Also Blasts and as a support (Healer in the case of Druid), you’ll mostly be blasting either Fire fields for Might or Water fields for healing for more support. Not worth holding for Blasts though as 100% uptime on the Boons is more important. Might be worth holding for a bit for CC if you really need it but Boons are still important.

Healing
Choose 1.

“We Heal As One!” - Command
Heal self & Pet. Gain a copy (its own base duration) of each other’s Boons.

Selfish burst healing option. Certain skills grant Boons to Pets only so you can use this to copy them to yourself (albeit at a set duration. How useful 2s of Protection is up to you). It’s the most basic so we’ll compare the others to this one. Note that Commands are just Shouts that also interact w/ the Pet.

Water Spirit -> Aqua Surge - Spirit
Summon a Water Spirit that pulses PBAoE Regen every 3s at the cost of 7.5% of its own HP.
Water Spirit blinks to you to heal you & your Pet then PBAoE heal allies.

Party healing option. It does actually create another pet you have to keep an eye on since it can die and go on CD. Other than that it’s just pulsing Regen which can be commanded for PBAoE healing. You can be hit by the PBAoE healing but even then it’s less overall compared to other heals, which makes sense since it heals allies.

Troll Unguent - Survival
8s HoT for self & Pet.

HoT option. Heals for a lot more than the other options but since it’s a HoT it comes w/ its own risk of being bursted down before getting full effect. Because of this, it’s better in PvP where there’s more consistent damage going out most of the time. Doesn’t really do anything else so if you need a HoT, take this option.

Healing Spring - Trap
Heal self & Pet. Place a Trap that when triggered by an injured ally creates a Water Combo field that pulses Regen & 2 x Condition Cleanse.

Condi Cleanse option. Uniquely triggers when a non-full-HP ally steps on it, maximising its Regen value. It’s a bit annoying as a Condition cleanse though as that doesn’t happen until the Trap is triggered and you need to be injured for it to trigger. That means if you’re only affected by non-damaging Conditions, it won’t cleanse. This is very rare though as almost all (if not all) Condition applying attacks damage in some kind of way. Can cleanse for a bunch of Conditions if everyone is in range. As such it has the highest CD of all the heals.

Utility
Choose 3.

“Guard!” - Command
Order Pet to redirect 33% of the damage from allies to itself. Gain Might whenever damage is redirected.

Defensive option. It effectively turns your Pet into even more of an HP bar. Note that it requires people to be within range of the Pet to gain the Guard effect, and the range is mid ranged so you might run into issues if your pet is melee and you’re 2 screens away on a Longbow or if your pet is ranged and you’re in melee range. Extra Might is nice but since it only lasts for 5s, it’s only really useful when outnumbered, when multiple allies are being hit or if multihit attacks are going out (since it’s whenever the damage is redirected, irrespective of how big the damage is). If it was more consistent it would feel even better to use.

“Protect Me!” - Command
Gain Protection & Barrier. PBAoE stun break.

CC Defensive option. Party stun breaks are always appreciated since it means most of the time your party doesn’t have to waste a skill on a stun break. They don’t get any other defensive stats like you do though so timing is key. For you it’s pretty good defensively, unless you’re getting chain CC’d and you use it too early. The defensive effects means you can tough it out and then use it after the CC and still survive. Strangely does nothing w/ the actual Pet itself though, making it feel like just a Shout.

“Search and Rescue!” - Command
Pet blinks to a downed ally within range of you, teleports both of them to your side & then begins Reviving them. PBAoE Regen.

Support option. If you need a mid ranged revive that also pulls them to safety, this is an option. The pull is very handy and makes it stand out from other revive Utility skills that simply just revive from range. It can be a bit finicky though as it requires a valid path for the teleports to go off so that’s something to keep in mind. Not really an issue in instanced content though.

“Sic ‘Em!” Command
Commands Pet to target your target, Revealing them & granting +40% Damage & Movement Speed for the Pet.

Offensive option. Use it during burst phases. Reveal is just for PvP so not something to keep in mind. Note for Soulbeasts: you gain the damage buff but it’s reduced to 25% for balance purposes.

Signet of Renewal - Signet
Passive: Periodic healing for self & Pet.
Active: Breaks stun. Grant Resistance & Resolution to Pet. Pulls 13 Conditions from nearby allies (around Pet) to itself.

Defensive Condition option. Breaks you out of stuns but doesn’t do much else to protect you from additional CC. It turns your Pet even more into a secondary HP bar, but I feel kind of bad seeing the Pet w/ every Condition known to man on it. Take it if you need party Condition cleansing, which makes it more of a PvP option. Won’t work if your Pet is defeated of course.

Signet of Stone - Signet
Passive: Gain Toughness for you & Pet.
Active: Immune to damage for 6s. Still vulnerable to Conditions & CC.

Defensive option. It would make more sense if this had the stun break but obviously for PvP balance it can’t have a stun break and immunity on it. You can still be hard & soft CC’d though so something to keep in mind of.

Signet of the Hunt - Signet
Passive: +25% Movement Speed for you & Pet.
Active: 10 x Unblockable attacks + Superspeed for you & Pet.

Mobility option. Unblockable is worthless in PvE so this is effectively just extra mobility. In PvP it would be good against classes that utilise Block as mitigation.

Signet of the Wild - Signet
Passive: Gain Ferocity for you & Pet.
Active: PBAoE pulsing damage & Immobilize.

Offensive option. Damage isn’t worth ever using it, so it’s just Immobilize which isn’t that useful in PvE. Meaning you only use it for the passive in PvE which is boring. At least in PvP you have a choice between damage & some soft CC.

Frost Spirit -> Cold Snap - Spirit
Summon a Frost Spirit that pulses PBAoE Might every 3s at the cost of 7.5% of its own HP.
Frost Spirit blinks to you to PBAoE Chill & pulse shorter Chill.

Might option. Take it if you need help building Might (which you usually do). Active Chill can be useful if you have a Reaper for their Traits but other than that it’s not all that useful, only for the blink to make sure the Spirit is in range to apply the Boons. Same notes about Spirits being a stationary Pet apply.

Stone Spirit -> Quicksand - Spirit
Summon a Stone Spirit that pulses PBAoE Protection every 3s at the cost of 7.5% of its own HP.
Stone Spirit blinks to you to PBAoE Immobilize & pulse Cripple.

Protection option. Take it if you need help building Protection (which you will). Active Immobilize is more useful than the Chill but not on bosses as they’re immune. Again, most value from the active is from the blink. Same notes about Spirits being a stationary Pet apply.

Storm Spirit -> Call Lightning - Spirit
Summon a Storm Spirit that pulses PBAoE Fury every 3s at the cost of 7.5% of its own HP.
Storm Spirit blinks to you to PBAoE damage & Daze.

Fury + CC option. Take it if you need the CC as Fury is provided via Traits and other skills (at least for the common Druid build). Its active is a lot more useful w/ the CC and actually does decent damage too so you could use it as a DPS button. Same notes about Spirits being a stationary Pet apply.

Sun Spirit -> Solar Flare - Spirit
Summon a Sun Spirit that pulses PBAoE Vigor every 3s at the cost of 7.5% of its own HP.
Sun Spirit blinks to you to PBAoE Burn & Blind.

Vigor option. Some classes like having Vigor due to either dealing more damage w/ it or they get more dodges which is part of their specs mechanic. That said, it's pretty niche. Its active does decent Burning damage so it could be an option if you’re going a Condi build w/ some support flavour. Same notes about Spirits being a stationary Pet apply.

Lightning Reflexes - Survival
Break stun + remove Immobilize and Evade backwards, dealing PBAoE damage & gaining Vigor.

Good stun break as it protects you after using it from further attacks + CC. Also can be used as an Evade for iframes though it does roll you back quite far, something to keep in mind for PvE. Damage is negligible, more for PvP chip damage and the Vigor is mostly for PvP as well for more dodging; active mitigation.

Muddy Terrain - Survival
Ground targeted AoE that Immobilizes then pulses Cripple & Slow.

Bunch of soft CC, definitely a PvP skill. Immobilize only occurs on the first hit so you gotta make sure you land it. Cripple & Slow are very annoying to deal w/ so it’s still a strong zoning tool even if you miss the Immobilize.

Quickening Zephyr - Survival
Break stun & grant self & Pet Quickness + Superspeed.

Offensive stun break. Doesn’t protect you from further CC but does make it harder for enemies to run away from you. If you need the ability to chase down enemies then this is an option. Not that useful in PvE though as Quickness is covered by supports and Superspeed isn’t needed generally, meaning you’re using a skill slot for a 35s CD stun break.

Sharpening Stone - Survival
Next 10 attacks Bleed.

It Bleeds, take it if you’re building Condi. Multi hit attacks consume a stack each hit so you can apply a bunch of stacks pretty quickly w/ some skills. Survival in general doesn’t really have a common mechanic as much as it has a common theme which is pretty unique in the skill groupings; something to pad the word count.

Flame Trap - Trap
Places a Trap that triggers for an Unblockable Fire Combo field that pulses damage & Burning.

Fire Condi option. Fire fields are useful but Rangers don’t really have any Traits that interact w/ Burning, especially when compared to Poison (the other Condi option). Take it if you need more Condi damage but it’s much lower in the priority list.

Frost Trap - Trap
Places a Trap that triggers for an Unblockable Ice Combo field that pulses damage & Chill.

Power DPS option. It does decent damage and is 1 of 2 Power specific damaging skills available, so it’s taken by default. Chill & Ice field may be handy for other classes but not so much for Ranger. Unblockable is not that useful either usually.

Spike Trap - Trap
Places a Trap that triggers for Unblockable damage, Bleeding & Launch.

CC option; it’s an Unblockable Launch. The CD is huge in PvE for some reason (45s vs 20s) so there are better CC options, which leaves this to never be used since the Unblockable part is irrelevant and the Bleeding isn’t strong enough to warrant that CD.

Viper’s Nest - Trap
Places a Trap that triggers for an Unblockable Poison Combo field that pulses damage & Poison.

Poison Condi option. Unlike the Fire option, Ranger actually has Traits that interact w/ Poison. Take it if you need extra Condi damage though it’s not really high up in the priority list due to not providing that much Poison; seems like the power budget is in the Unblockable portion & the Poison field.

Elite
Choose 1.

“Strength of the Pack!” - Command
Grant 10 x Stability, Fury & Swiftness to you & Pet. Grant the other Might whenever either of you attack.

Offensive solo option as it’s just Boons. In group content they’ll all be covered so you won’t be getting any use out of this Elite. Selfish DPS option for PvP, though it does get completely screwed over by Boon removal (Strip, Steal, Corruption) as it eats up all 10 stacks if the Stability is chosen (not sure how it prioritises). If it pulsed its effects it’d be a lot stronger in those cases.

Spirit of Nature - Spirit
Summon a Spirit that PBAoE heals (excluding itself) at the cost of 3% of its HP.
Spirit blinks to you and PBAoE revives + 3 x Condition cleanses. Sacrifices 30% of its HP per ally revived.

Support option. Take it if you need the extra healing, Condition Cleansing or Revives. It has a much larger CD than the other Spirits though so you’ll have to make sure it’s consistently being healed if you want to keep the pulsing healing & the relatively shorter CD revive + cleanse (40s). Note that it’s guaranteed to die if you revive more than 3 allies, which is probably worth the cost.

Entangle - Survival
PBAoE Unblockable pulsing damage, Bleeding & Immobilize. Enemies can break free to end the pulsing effects early.

The only offensive Elite, and it’s mostly Condi damage. Take it if you’re DPS, excluding the Elite spec options. Enemies breaking free only really applies to PvP unless there’s a bunch of AoE damage going out. Overall these Elite choices are pretty bad for Power Rangers.

Traits
Non-coloured Traits are auto picked if the tree is chosen. Coloured Traits are a choice of 1. Can only pick 3 trees.
Marksmanship - Burst & Long Range Damage

Opening Strike
You & your Pet gain Opening Strike which deals 5 x Vulnerability on the 1st hit in combat.

Main mechanic of this traitline. It makes your 1st strike widdle the enemy down before they reach you, in this case by applying Vulnerability = more damage. Initial Vulnerability is always nice for group content as less ramping up = more damage.

Stoneform
Use Lesser Signet of Stone when using an Elite skill. Lesser Signet of Stone: Same as Signet of Stone but 5s duration instead of 6s.

Defensive option. You can control when it applies but compared to what it was before (automatic when below 50% HP), it’s a lot more annoying since you don’t exactly want to hold your Elite for this. Definitely more of a PvP change where you’re not using skills on CD for damage. 

Hunter’s Gaze
Gain Might when hitting an enemy below HP thresholds. 1s ICD:
<25%: 3 x Might | <50%: 2 x Might | <75%: 1 x Might

Solo / PvP offensive option. Might granted only lasts 5s and only affects yourself so it’s not that great. Could use another execute effect so it’s more useful in group content as the Might is generally wasted in PvE and the other 2 options are defensive & supportive. Possibly extra bit of damage?

Clarion Bond
Use Lesser Call of the Wild when swapping pets. Lesser Call of the Wild: Boons last half as long and there’s no Daze compared to Call of the Wild. 15s ICD.

Support option as it provides extra Boons, changing your swap pet button into a Boon button. Annoying not being able to keep track of the 15s CD visually. It also provides enemy Weakness which isn’t that helpful in PvE and a Blast which can be useful and most likely will be a Water field from Druid (support Ranger).

Alpha Focus
Opening Strike now also Cripples.

Enemies engaged from range will take longer to get to you, giving you more time to kill them. Not useful in group content.

Brutish Seals
Signet actives grant PBAoE Fury & 3 x Might.

Support option if you’re taking Signets. All of the Signets are pretty selfish though so the hybrid nature (selfish + support) makes it less attractive compared to full selfish / full supportive (Spirits). Also requires you using the Signets on CD for max value which isn’t always what you want, especially w/ the longer CD ones.

Farsighted
+5% Strike Damage for Ranger Weapon skills. Doubled against enemies farther at long range.

Damage option. Note that it only applies to weapon skills, not Utility skills or Pet skills. Even more damage when at long range, which goes against the usual strategy of stacking on the boss's butt for Boons & healing. More of a PvP option in terms of maximising value by picking enemies off.

Moment of Clarity
You & your Pet gain +50% Damage on next attack when you interrupt an enemy. 3s ICD when using CC skills against Defiance Bars. Dazes & Stuns you apply last 50% longer.

Burst damage option. It’s a bit finicky as it requires you to interrupt an attack, meaning it does nothing if you just CC them. It also requires you to time your highest damaging attacks to be after this effect for max value. Additionally, multi hit attacks only have their 1st hit enhanced so it’s not even good for the rapid fire attacks. Overall its inconsistency in terms of getting it and applying it make it a pretty unreliable option, especially compared to the mostly consistent Farsighted.

Precise Strike
Opening Strike always crits.

Extra burst damage. Currently (down the tree) there is no way to regain Opening Strike other than exiting combat which makes it feel like it’s only useful in PvP or solo open world stuff where you can disengage. 

Predator’s Onslaught
+15% Strike Damage for you & your Pet against Disabled, Defiant or Movement-Impaired enemies.

Against bosses, this is a straight up +15% Strike Damage boost as they’re always Defiant (have a Defiance Bar). That makes this the go to option for PvE. Also some CC synergy for PvP + lesser mobs, including the Cripple from Opening Strike.

Remorseless
Regain Opening Strike whenever you gain Fury. Opening Strikes deal +25% Damage.

Currently the only way to regain Opening Strike, which makes it and the whole tree less attractive for longer fights (which almost all boss fights are). There’s no ICD for regaining Opening Strike and no conditional on who gives you the Fury to proc so there are some cases where you get a bunch of them at the same time, which don’t stack so you’ll be wasting a bunch. Would be more interesting if all 3 of these regained Opening Strike in some way to make it more involved in PvE; like CC vs. Fury / Crit vs. Long Range.

Lead the Wind
-20% Longbow + Harpoon Gun skill CDs. Those skills now also pierce and grant Swiftness + Quickness when attacking beyond long range. 15s ICD.

Piercing is nice and you get to use the skills more often, but it’s very specific since it only affects those weapons. Technically the “hitting beyond long range” part is for any weapon but only those 2 have that sort of range, plus Traps but that’s also very specific. It’s nice to have but compared to the other 2 options it’s pretty lacklustre. Boons granted don’t last very long either.
Skirmishing - Mobility & Weapon Swapping

Tail Wind
Gain Swiftness when swapping weapons in combat. 9s ICD (10s CD for swapping weapons).

Little bit of extra mobility and makes weapon swapping (the main mechanic of the tree) better. Generally not that useful in group content though.

Sharpened Edges
You & your Pet have a 33% chance on Crits to Bleed.

Extra damage in the form of a DoT. A bit annoying that it’s RNG on top of RNG but at least most builds build around 100% Crit so it’s technically just 1 layer of RNG, in PvE anyway.

Primal Reflexes
Gain Vigor when successfully Evading an attack. 8s ICD.

Dodging option. Successfully dodging grants you a Boon that allows you to dodge even more. Boon lasts 8s as well so technically you could have 100% uptime of faster dodge regen. Not that useful in PvE though, definitely more of a PvP option.

Trapper’s Expertise
+60% base Duration of Boons & Conditions from your Traps. -20% Trap CDs and the offensive ones apply Cripple.

More CDs = more buttons to press. Only 1 is useful for power builds though, maybe 2 if you take the CC one. In that case, the extra Chill doesn’t matter and the Bleeding is worthless for power builds. Decent damage alternative to the Bleeding one that gains more value the more Traps you take, but they’re pretty different in effectiveness for certain builds so value is limited in that front.

Furious Grip
Gain Fury when swapping weapons in combat. 9s ICD.

More Crits after swapping weapons. Only lasts 5s so you’ll have to get Fury from somewhere else. Like a support, which puts this Trait out of its job.

Spotter
Grant PBAoE Fury every 10s in combat.

Extra Fury. It only lasts 3s, up to a max of 6s if you’re building support. It’s pretty similar to Clarion Bond in that they’re both supportive in mostly DPS trees. This tree does more damage via critting whereas Marksmanship has some extra damage via CC, just choose the one that suits better w/ your build (supports build more CC).

Strider’s Defense
Gain Quickness when successfully Evading an attack. 5s ICD. -20% Sword skill CDs.

More Boons from dodging. Also lets you use Sword skills more often which revolve around dodging so it synergises with itself. Like the other dodge Trait, it’s not that useful in PvE and definitely more of a PvP option.

Hidden Barbs
+33% Bleeding damage for Bleeding you apply.

Offensive option, but not that great for Power builds. Still, not much of a choice out of these 3. Also doesn’t do it in a very interesting way but it's more damage.

Hunter’s Tactics
+15% Damage & +10% Crit Chance when flanking from the side or behind.

Since everyone is always stacked behind the boss, it’s a bunch of free damage and Crit Chance. Positionals are sort of boring though as you don’t really control where the side or behind is but does give you something to keep an eye on and adjust accordingly.

Quick Draw
After swapping weapons in combat, the next Ranger weapon skill will have -66% CD. 9s ICD.

Versatile option. Active CDR is more interesting than the usual -20%. You can sort of track it w/ the 10s weapon swap CD but for Druid, entering Celestial Avatar counts as weapon swapping which may cause some issues in tracking it. It’s a good effect that could use some UI support.

Light on your Feet
+10% Damage & Condition Duration after dodging or using Quick Shot (short bow). -20% Short Bow skill CDs. They also pierce & their flanking conditionals are improved (longer duration Conditions or no longer requiring flanking).

Condition DPS option, but requires a Short Bow. Adds a choice between dodging & keeping up your damage buff which adds some risk vs. reward. Also makes the ranged attacks feel less crappy against multiple enemies. Overall improves the skills too w/ lower CD and applying more Conditions / no longer requiring flanking (that’s for Concussion Shot only).

Vicious Quarry
Fury on you now grants 40% Crit Chance instead of 25% and also grants Ferocity. Gain Fury when hit below 75% HP. 2s ICD.

Power DPS option. Less Precision needed on your gear = more Power / Ferocity for bigger damage. Less interesting compared to the Condi variant but more damage is more damage. Extra Fury from being hit rarely procs but is okay to have since it’s just extra compared to the other effects.
Wilderness Survival - Defensive & Conditions

Natural Vigor
Recover Endurance 25% more quickly.

More Endurance = more dodges = more active mitigation. Stacks w/ Vigor so you can get even more regen. Defensive Traits are usually not that useful in PvE though.

Child of Earth
Use Lesser Muddy Terrain when using a healing skill. Lesser Muddy Terrain: almost the same as Muddy Terrain but the Immobilize lasts 1s instead of 3s. 20s ICD.

On demand soft CC. Since it’s on the healing skill, you’re less obligated to use it on CD. That said, it's a soft CC so it’s mostly a PvP Trait.

Oakheart Salve
Gain Regen when inflicted by Bleeding, Poison or Burning. 10s ICD. Having Regen grants -5% Strike Damage received.

Little bit of extra tankiness. It’s only 5% and it only affects Strike Damage. Good uptime in group content, but generally not that useful, especially compared to the below. 

Taste for Danger
Gain Vitality. You & your Pet gain Expertise based on 7% Vitality.

Offensive option. Makes you slightly healthier as well which is nice. DoTs last longer = less gear stats being spent on Expertise = more DoT damage.

Companion’s Defense
You & your Pet gain Protection when dodging in combat.

Some extra tankiness, rewarded for using your dodge (doesn’t actually have to dodge anything). Makes the active mitigation ability feel better and builds upon the dodge theme of the minor Traits.

Ambidexterity
Gain Condition Damage. Doubled while wielding a Torch or Dagger. -20% Torch & Dagger skill CDs.

Offensive option, if using Torch or Dagger. Synergises pretty well w/ Condition Soulbeast as they gain access to main hand Dagger. Also lets you use those skills more often = more player agency = more DoTs = more damage.

Refined Toxins
While above 75% HP, your attacks apply Poison. While your pet is above 75% HP, their attacks apply Poison. Both have a 5s ICD each.

Another offensive option, if not using Torch or Dagger. It’s more generalist at the cost of strength w/ the 5s ICD. Basically the leftover offensive option.

Shared Anguish
After swapping pets in combat, you & your Pet gain Stability.

Defensive option. Requires swapping pets so you can control when you get the Stability. Since it’s the only defensive option against CC, take it if you need it.

Rugged Growth
Having Protection heals you periodically. Pet periodically heals when it has Protection.

Extra sustain that builds upon the existing minor Traits + synergises w/ Protection from other sources. Not that useful in group content and like other defensive trees, it’s more effective in PvP.

Emphatic Bond
Using a Pet skill removes 2 x Conditions from you & your Pet. 20s ICD.

Condition Cleanse option. Take it if you need to cleanse Conditions. It’s also when you use your Pet Skill, which sometimes you want to use on CD (DPS ones) or you want to save (CC ones) so that adds a decision for you to make.

Wilderness Knowledge
Survival skills grant Fury & remove 2 x Conditions.

Another Condition Cleanse option. Survival skills are generally defensive so when you want to use them, you probably want the Condition Cleanse at the same time so it feels better to use than Emphatic Bond. Only downside is that it doesn’t affect your pet + requires you to use Survival skills. Fury is also nice but reiterates that this tree is the PvP tree since the Fury is selfish and doesn’t affect others.

Poison Master
Using a Pet skill in combat causes your Pet’s next attack to inflict 2 Poison stacks. +25% Poison damage for your Poisons.

Offensive option. Activated after you use your Pet skill so you can also control when you use it. Unlike the Condition Cleanse though, extra Bleeding (hence damage) is always welcome so you’re less inclined to hold it. Extra Poison damage is also nice and Ranger has a decent range of them.
Nature Magic - Support

Rejuvenation
Gain Regen when struck while below 50% HP. 10s ICD.

Extra healing. Doesn’t really interact w/ anything else in this tree though and only affects yourself. While it’s handy, it’s just that. Self-healing.

Bountiful Hunter
+1% Strike Damage per Boon on you. Same for your Pet w/ their Boons.

Offensive option, though if you’re going down the support tree looking for damage Boons you’ll be sorely disappointed w/ the other options. It itself is a pretty boring but effective Trait, but it’s in the support tree which is whack w/ the opportunity cost.

Instinctive Reaction
Gain Quickness when struck while below 50% HP. 20s ICD. You & your Pet gain Healing Power based on 7% Power.

Healing option due to the 2nd portion. It’s just extra stat through a stat ratio. Extra Quickness while you’re low can act as a way to pump out healing before you’re downed but not really useful in group content since you should have Quickness anyway.

Allies’ Aid
Use “Search and Rescue!” (trait version) when you begin reviving an ally (reviving is melee range). The difference is that your Pet doesn’t blink to a nearby downed ally and then pull them to you.

Revive option. Take it if you expect a bunch of people being Downed, otherwise you’re better taking the healing option to prevent people from being Downed in the first place (or the damage option for some reason).

Fortifying Bond
When you gain a Boon, your Pet gains a copy of it w/ its own duration.

Buffs your Pet so it feels less bad when they don’t get any of the groups Boons (since those have a 5 target limit i.e. your party). Sort of synergises w/ Rejuvenation.

Evasive Purity
Dodging removes a damaging & non-damaging Condition from you. 10s ICD.

Condition Cleanse option. Again it’s a PvP option as self Condition cleanses aren’t that helpful in PvE. Activated on dodging which you generally want since you’re trying to dodge damage (or fat fingered).

Spirited Arrival
Grants PBAoE Vigor & Fury when swapping pets in combat.

Extra Boons just for swapping Pets. There’s a 20s CD for swapping between Pets so make sure both your Pets achieve similar goals w/ their skills, otherwise you’ll be stuck w/ the Pet without CC when you need CC for example. Otherwise, extra Boon coverage.

Windborne Notes
Warhorn skills grant PBAoE regen around their target. Heal when you gain Regen.

Extra healing for using Warhorn skills. They have pretty length CDs though and the Regen only lasts 6s so it’s pretty lacklustre compared to other options out of the 3 and compared to other healing options. That said, if you need healing then you need healing.

Lingering Magic
You & your Pet gain Concentration.

Extra Boon Duration for you & your Pet’s Boon applications. Kind of synergises w/ the other minor Traits. Otherwise it’s just more Concentration which means less spent on gear = more healing power or power to heal or damage more.

Nature’s Vengeance
Boons from Spirits last 50% longer. Spirits lose 33% less HP per tick. Spirit activated skills have a 50% larger radius & apply Alacrity.

The Trait that makes Ranger support work, as supports need either Quickness or Alacrity. However, since this is a base Ranger Trait, that means there’s no room for Quickness in any other tree. That includes new specs, new weapon skills, etc. It will have to be added to 1 of the 2 remaining Traits for balance purposes, lest they repeat the Chronomancer issue that plagued the game for years. This also means that Ranger support is locked to healing due to the other Traits in this tree.

The Boon application itself is pretty boring though, as it encourages you to use the Spirit skills on CD. Sure there’s a choice between saving the active or applying the Alacrity but considering that most of the actives are just Conditions that don’t really matter in PvE, it’s just button pressing on CD in the end.

Protective Ward
When taking damage, PBAoE Weakness & gain Protection. 15s ICD.

Defensive option. Not a viable option for the Quickness option as it requires you getting hit. Its effect is okay in a PvP scenario as they both help you survive. Not that interesting but not every Trait needs to be and it fits the defensive nature fine.

Invigorating Bond
Pet skills PBAoE heal. 20s ICD.

Only viable option for the Quickness variant as discussed above. Unfortunately you can only have 2 Pets per combat, meaning there will only be 2 Pet skills used in quick succession. Meaning each Quickness application will have to be ridiculously long to be able to maintain 100% Quickness. Could be better if there were more Pet skills or if it also included the Pet’s automatic skills at a lower CD.

The Trait itself is just extra healing on demand. Note that it uses the Pet’s Healing Power which is by default 0, so it won’t scale even if you’re building Healing Power.
Beastmastery - Pets

Pack Alpha
Pets gain Power, Condition Damage, Precision, Toughness & Vitality. -20% Pet skills CD.

(Almost) all stats up for Pets. Extra Pet skills to use. Pretty basic Trait which is fine since it’s a minor Trait. Stats themselves are for tankiness + basic damage (not Crit Damage or Condition Duration). Extra Pet skills = more player agency (sort of, it affects the auto used skills too) = more damage / utility.

Go for the Eyes
Using a Pet skill also PBAoE Blinds. 12s ICD.

The PvP option as Blind is useless in PvE. You can control when this happens so there’s some agency (only affects the controlled Pet skill, not the auto-use ones).

Potent Ally
You & your Pet grant each other Might when critting. 1s ICD.

Offensive Boon option. Not useful in group content as supports should be granting Might to you already, making this one redundant. More useful for Solo / PvP if you don’t need the Blind. Requires critting to have any effect, which is fine for your Pet as you should always be critting (Power builds) but your Pet isn’t guaranteed to have 100% Crit. Could normalise it by making it grant Might on hit, doubled on crits so it’s not reliant on crits. Adjust ICD if needed.

Resounding Timbre
Commands grant PBAoE Regen & Swiftness. -20% Command skill CDs.

Utility option. Lower CDs = more uses = you know the drill. Actually an offensive option if you’re taking “Sic ‘Em!” since it’s a unique damage buff vs. Potent Ally. Extra Boon utility is nice but not really relevant. 

Loud Whistle
While >= 90% HP, Pets deal +10% Strike Damage. -20% Pet Swap CD.

More damage while at high HP, which you should be in PvE w/ healers + less sources of incoming damage. Swapping pets has a 20s CD for some reason, lower CD is always nice. Maybe worried about being able to swap pets out for tanking? Aggro is a bit janky and unreliable though.

Wilting Strike
Using a Pet skill also inflicts Weakness on enemies hit.

The PvP option as Weakness isn’t useful in PvE. Same notes about choosing when to activate this via controlled Pet skill apply.

Two-Handed Training
-20% Greatsword & Spear skill CDs. +10% Greatsword & Spear skill damage. Gain Fury when you Disable an enemy.

Offensive option if using Greatsword, w/ more damage & lower CDs. More damage + more skill uses = :). Without Greatsword, it’s just Fury on Disable which isn’t useful in PvE because of supports.

Natural Healing
Pet recovers HP every 3s.

Pet sustain option. If not using Greatsword it’s the only option in PvE. Higher Pet HP = less chance of them dying = more reliable DPS. It’s also effectively just a HoT, nothing that actively involves you.

Pet’s Prowess
+30% Pet Movement Speed. Pets gain Ferocity.

More move speed = more uptime = more damage. More Ferocity is just more damage as well. It’s just stats up for the Pet.

Beastly Warden
Using a Pet skill also PBAoE Taunts. 20s ICD.

The PvP option again as Taunt isn’t useful in PvE. Same notes about choosing when to activate this via controlled Pet skill apply.

Zephyr’s Speed
Cast Lesser Quickening Zephyr when swapping Pets. Lesser Quickening Zephyr: Quickness & Superspeed last half as long as Quickening Zephyr. Does NOT break stun. 15s ICD.

Unlike the normal Quickening Zephyr, this version is only the Quickness & Superspeed. And it only lasts 3s. Technically it’s a damage boost but 3s every 15s (and that’s assuming you swap pets on CD) isn’t really worth it. Especially in group content where Quickness is covered. Might be an option in PvP though since there aren’t really any support roles and Superspeed is more valuable there.

Honed Axes
You & your Pet gain Ferocity, doubled while wielding an Axe. -20% Axe skill CDs.

Offensive option. You have some effect without an Axe so it’s not a total loss, but it’s encouraged since 2 of the 3 effects revolve around an Axe. It’s just more damage, nothing too interesting but everyone likes damage.

Druid Combat
Gains access to a 5th Profession Mechanic: Celestial Avatar. This in turn grants access to 5 supportive “weapon” skills and also swaps the effects of any Glyphs you have.
Entering Celestial Avatar requires 100% Astral Force which is gained via healing or damaging. The amount healed or damaged is irrelevant; it fills the bar 1.5% per tick of healing or 0.75% per damage tick dealt. No ICD for ticks, so AoEs are great for building resources. For damage ticks, Condition + Pet damage do not generate anything. Healing full HP allies also does nothing.
Celestial Avatar drains Astral Force for up to 15 total seconds. You can leave early but you lose 50% of the remaining Astral Force. You also cannot gain Astral Force in Celestial Avatar. Being downed resets Astral Force to 0.
Formerly reduced the Pet attributes by 20% as a tradeoff. This lasted for 3 years during the “make base professions viable” phase before being removed. Druids inherently deal less damage anyway since their traitline is support focused.
Last we heard, there were plans to make Druid a viable DPS. No news since as of early June.
Gains access to Staff for 2H support.
Gains access to Glyphs which normally have detrimental effects but are turned into supportive effects while in Celestial Avatar.
Gains access to the Druid traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specialisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Druid Abilities
Celestial Avatar

Celestial Avatar -> Release Celestial Avatar
Enter Celestial Avatar when at full Astral Force to replace current weapon skills w/ supportive ones which will be listed below. Additionally, any Glyphs equipped will swap to their supportive effects. Entering Celestial Avatar counts as weapon swapping for related Traits or Runes / Sigils. Constantly drain Astral Force, leaving Celestial Avatar at 0. You can manually leave early but lose 50% of the remaining Astral Force. See above for more details, no point in repeating everything.

Cosmic Ray
Ground targeted AoE healing.

The spammable skill. It’s just AoE healing. Area is pretty small though, which is why the group hugging the back of the boss is what everyone does.

Seed of Life
Ground targeted Light Combo field that heals + Condition Cleanses allies & Blinds enemies after a delay. Instant cast so can be cast during channels.

Heal + cleanse. The Light Combo lasts for a fraction of a second so it’s very unreliable. Blind isn’t that helpful in PvE. It’s instant cast so it can be used during channelled skills, like skill 4 & 5.

Lunar Impact
Ground targeted AoE healing & Daze that Blasts combos.

Burst healing & CC, so there’s a choice on which one you need more of, though technically you can use 2 in the max timeframe. Also blasts Combos but none of the Combo Fields in Celestial Avatar last long enough or are able to be used w/ this skill (due to being a channel).

Rejuvenating Tides
Channelled PBAoE Water Combo field that pulses healing. You can move during the channel.

Pulsing healing. There’s a Water Combo field but you can’t do anything w/ it as you’re channelling the whole time. The only thing you can do is move + use Seed of Life if you need to.

Natural Convergence
Gain 2 x Stability. Channelled PBAoE that pulses damage, Cripple & Slow. Final tick does the most damage & Immobilizes. You cannot move during the channel.

CC option as the damage is pretty low, even if you were building for damage. This is even more restrictive as you can’t move at all unless you want to break the channel. This takes some getting used to as the previous channel skill you can move. There’s some protection against CC to help you get the channel off, but the CC from this skill isn’t useful in PvE at all so there’s little use for it, especially w/ the risk of not being able to move for its effects.

Staff
Support, AoE & control. 2H.

Solar Beam
Channelled ranged beam that can target enemies or allies. Damages enemies & heals allies struck by the beam in 3 pulses.

Cool mechanic that it can target enemies or allies, though the targeting for allies is pretty janky (clicking on party frames or trying to click on them manually). Damages enemies or heals allies fits the supportive nature. Also does it in 3 pulses which helps build Astral Force quickly. The fact that it damages enemies the beam passes through makes it feel better in multitarget situations too, though the cap is only 3.

Astral Wisp
Attach a Wisp to the target (enemy or ally). Target pulses PBAoE damage & healing.

Also cool that it can target allies (recent-ish changes from end of 2022. Technology from Specter spec). Previously circled as a projectile to damage & heal those hit but was changed to pulsing AoE which is much more consistent and less reliant on a tiny hitbox floating around. AoE pulses = a bunch of Astral Force.

Ancestral Grace
Ground targeted slow Blink that Blasts are the destination for AoE healing & grants your Pet Protection. -5s CD if it heals an ally.

Gap closer, burst healing & a Blast all in one. Protection for the Pet is somewhat irrelevant. Gap closers aren’t always needed so it’s usually just burst healing but there’s sometimes a choice to be made between the 2. Since it’s a Combo Burst, it can combo w/ Water fields (see skill 5) for even more healing.

Vine Surge
Targeted frontal AoE that damages & Immobilizes enemies. Allies hit are cleansed of Chilled, Crippled & Immobilized.

Damage is negligible, especially w/ healer builds so this is exclusively for the CC + cleanse. Note that you the caster technically do not get hit by the vines so you don’t get the cleanse, which makes it somewhat annoying to use. Don’t really see a reason why it shouldn’t in PvE.

Sublime Conversion
Ground targeted rectangular Water Combo field that destroys projectiles to heal allies near it. Grants Regen to allies that pass through the field.

Powerful anti-projectile skill as it not only removes the projectiles but turns them into healing for allies. Can be comboed w/ Ancestral Grace for a Water Blast for even more healing. There’s also a Regen but that requires allies to touch the wall which is a bit risky w/ the whole blocking projectiles thing. Choice between saving it for anti-projectile or using it to combo for healing. Projectile blocking isn’t a very common requirement though so there’s less of a risk in using it for combo healing.

Glyphs

Glyphs of Rejuvenation - Healing
Heal self & Pet. PBAoE heal allies for less.
PBAoE heal allies. Heal self & Pet for less.

Pretty standard heal as there’s no other effect. Sacrifices some self healing to gain the PBAoE heal effect when compared to “We Heal As One!”. The reverse fits the general theme of becoming more supportive in Celestial Avatar. Overall it’s the burst party healing option, but loses out to the Spirit heal since it’s both a party healing option and counts as a Pet = more chances to get Astral Force.

Glyph of Alignment - Utility
PBAoE damage, 3 x Bleeding, Immobilize & Weakness for enemies.
PBAoE healing & 3 x Condition Cleanse for allies.

Condition option. The Conditions inflicted are pretty annoying in PvP so there’s an option for that mode, but the Bleeding isn’t really worth it compared to the base Ranger utilities. The reverse is good healing + Condition Cleansing which could be useful but Celestial Avatar already has a lot of that so it’s mostly redundant.

Glyphs of Equality - Utility
Breaks stun. PBAoE damage & Daze for enemies.
PBAoE stun break, Stability & 2 x Condition Cleanse for allies.

CC option. Pretty good as a stun break since enemies near you will be Dazed and hence unable to CC you again. The reverse is an even more defensive version w/ the Stability & Condition cleanses.

Glyph of Unity - Utility
PBAoE tether to enemies. Damage enemies every time you take damage w/ 0.25s ICD per target and a max tether range.
PBAoE tether to allies. Heal allies every time you are healed w/ 0.25s ICD per target and a max tether range.

Really cool mechanic of sharing damage & HP, even if it’s technically not sharing the damage / healing received but proccing a static damage & healing amount. Damage version isn’t that helpful in PvE as it requires you to take damage. Healing version could see more use but most of the healing in healer builds are already AoE so this just becomes a niche healing CD in Celestial Avatar, which already has AoE heals.

Glyph of the Tides - Utility
PBAoE damage & Knock Back for enemies.
PBAoE damage & Pull for enemies.

Another CC option. Weaker than Equality in terms of Defiance Bar damage. Utility of knocking back / pulling in isn’t useful in boss fights since they’re immune to it, leaving this for only Solo use or PvP. Fights in Solo are usually just AoE-ing down enemies in a couple of seconds so the knock back isn’t that useful. The Pull generally isn’t needed as enemies run towards you already + you need to be in Celestial Avatar which is almost exclusively healing. Probably better in PvP, but the range is short.

Glyph of the Stars - Elite
Ground targeted Water Combo field that pulses healing, 2 x Condition Cleanse & Stability.
Ground targeted AoE (not field) that prevents HP drain to Downed allies. Pulses healing, revive, Stability, Regen & Vigor.

Purely support oriented Elite. Standard version has 2 x Condition cleansing & a Water Combo field whereas the Celestial Avatar version has higher healing, revive, Downed HP drain removal, Regen & Vigor. Flexibility between Condition Cleansing while in normal form and emergency healing + reviving in Celestial Avatar makes it versatile. Used to be channelled, so the removal of that makes it even more versatile as you can now do other things like healing or reviving manually while the effects pulse. Compared to Spirit of Nature it has a much lower CD but at the cost of not fully reviving by itself. Lower CD + more versatility makes it easier to use than something that only passively heals or revives + cleanses.

Traits

Celestial Being
Gain 1.5% Astral Force per heal application and 0.75% Astral Force per damage application. Become a Celestial Avatar once you gain enough (100%) Astral Force. Gain access to Glyphs.

As always, including it because it’s the 1st Trait.

Druidic Clarity
Becoming a Celestial Avatar PBAoE 3 x Condition Cleanses.

Condition Cleanse option. Take it if you really need Condition Cleanses, which makes it lean towards PvP as there’s plenty of cleansing in Celestial Avatar already for PvE purposes. Otherwise, you only get its effects when entering Celestial Avatar which you mostly use for the healing / Condition cleanse so it’s not out of the way in terms of skill usage / “rotation”.

Cultivated Synergy
Using your Healing skill additionally PBAoE heals around you & your Pet.

Healing option. Extra healing on top of your healing, so functionally it doesn’t change anything. Note that it doesn’t work w/ Aqua Surge, only works on the initial summoning of Water Spirit which makes it a lot worse in a build that uses it. Should be changed to include Aqua Surge as it has a 20s CD anyway. Not sure if you can double up healing by being on top of your Pet, no reason not to as the healing isn’t incredibly powerful.

Primal Echoes
-20% Staff skill CDs. PBAoE Daze enemies when swapping to Staff in combat. 8s ICD.

Versatile option. More Staff skills = more support = more buttons to press = more agency, etc. Note that Celestial Avatar counts as a Staff for the Dazing part so you technically don’t need to use a Staff to get some effect out of this Trait. Extra Dazing for extra CC which means your party requires less CC skills = they can take more damage skills. The 8s ICD does mean you sort of have to watch when you enter Celestial Avatar so you don’t waste the Daze before something important, but at the same time it’s only a 1s Daze and if that’s make or break then you should just take an extra CC skill.

Live Vicariously
Actively Healing an ally heals yourself for this Trait’s amount. 1s ICD.

Does NOT include passive healing from sources like Regen so you’ll have to be actively pressing buttons to get effects out of this. Not really sure why not in PvE as there’s a 1s ICD anyway and it’s not like the extra healing would be too strong. Definitely set that way because of PvP and there might not be the technology to separate them too much functionally. That aside, it’s just extra healing; fine for a minor Trait.

Celestial Shadow
Grant PBAoE Superspeed & Stealth when leaving Celestial Avatar.

Party mobility option. While the Superspeed is handy, the Stealth was mostly annoying as it interrupts your auto-attack chain so if you’re not paying attention to a) your character turning invis in the sea of visual effects or b) a small icon appearing in the buff bar at the bottom of your screen or c) not constantly spamming the auto attack button, then you’ll be standing there doing nothing for 3s. Definitely more powerful in PvP, even if it’s just for leaving Celestial Avatar which comes with its own drawbacks (losing Astral Force, losing access to support skills, etc).

Verdant Etching
Glyphs grant PBAoE Protection.

Previously reduced their CDs and casted Lesser Seed of Life for a bit of healing, Blindness & Cleansing. Protection uptime is somewhat difficult to maintain so every bit counts. Every damage mitigated is HP that you don’t have to heal, which means you can spend more time DPSing, even if it’s tickle damage.

Natural Stride
-33% Duration of Immobilize, Cripple & Chilled on yourself. +33% Movement Speed when not affected by these Conditions.

Selfish mobility option. Better in PvP than compared to WvW (zergs) as you’re less likely to be grouped w/ all 5 players for max Superspeed & Stealth value. Has better uptime since the other requires leaving Celestial Avatar whereas this almost always has some sort of benefit, even if they’re just passives.

Natural Mender
+20% Healing to Others. Gain 5 (%?) Astral Force every 3s not in Celestial Avatar.

Further solidifies this spec as the support spec. Tooltip is a bit unclear as to what “5” is and there’s no way to tell if 100 is the max or not. Either way it’s just extra Astral Force generation which is fine for a minor Trait, I just wish it was clearer than “5 energy”.

Grace of the Land
Celestial Avatar skills grant Might to allies within them.

Used to be incredibly problematic since they gave a unique damage buff rather than Might, and that lasted for 2 whole years. An okay source of Might, used to give 3 stacks instead of 1. Now it’s just supplementary to other Might sources (Frost Spirit, both versions of Call of the Wild). Definitely a shell of its former self, but it’s the only offensive support option which is what Druid is and excels at so it’s an easy choice.

Lingering Light
+20% Healing to Others while in Celestial Avatar. +10% Healing to Others for 10s after leaving Celestial Avatar.

Healing option. Game isn’t really built around heavy healing checks like other MMOs though so you don’t really get as much use out of this, whereas this would be a dedicated CD out of 30 buttons in those MMOs. If you really need the healing, take it.

Ancient Seeds
Hitting a hard CC’d or Defiant enemy summons roots that damage, Bleeds & Immobilizes them. 10s ICD.

The only purely offensive option. Has a 10s ICD for any procs so it’s pretty bad in AoE situations. None of the other Traits in this tree are DPS oriented so you’ll be stuck w/ a mostly healer oriented build w/ a single DPS Trait at the end, which isn’t that strong at all compared to other builds due to multipliers in their trees, etc. For this to be good, it has to be incredibly powerful (which would run into issues of healers just taking it anyway) or the previous Trait options need a DPS option so Druids can build DPS, or at least support DPS.

Soulbeast 
In the interest of time, I won’t be going into Soulbeast in detail. May revisit this later, but only played it due to being the only DPS build at the time:
Merge w/ your Pet for extra stats and gaining some of their skills, but obviously at the cost of having another entity w/ you to tank. Any Pet Traits now affect you, sometimes at a reduced effect for balance reasons.
Animal families share skills (Bears, Birds, etc) but each type of animal would have a specific Archetype such as Stout (tanky) or  Ferocious (Power). Each Archetype has its own 3rd ability that fits their role, but I ended up w/ Ferocious all the time since Power DPS is a lot cheaper than Condition DPS.
The Power DPS skill Worldly Impact is very easy to interrupt for some reason, as any movement input in the 0.75s cast time cancels it. Very annoying, should have an option to buffer.
Pets I merged w/ had either CC oriented skills or something to help me survive if Solo.
Weapon is a main-hand Dagger which is Condition based, so I didn’t end up using it much.
Skills are Stances, which are basically just personal buffs. Nothing out of the ordinary for any of the stances, w/ the exception of the Elite finally being a decent Power option for Ranger.
Traits obviously revolve around Beastmode (merging), as well as Stances and dealing damage, etc. The usual, nothing too interesting or whacky.
Overall I definitely felt more squishy than when I have a Pet out, but it generally doesn’t matter since you usually kill things before they reach you or you’re doing group stuff in which case I preferred Druid.
Untamed
Did not play Untamed enough, so in the interest of time I will be skipping it. Did not interest me either as it leaned further into the Pet (at least in theory) and also one of their Profession Mechanics is a giant green fart cloud around the Pet. Also heard it was pretty clunky and uses a Hammer.
Thief
Thief Combat
Didn’t really enjoy the archetype for base Thief, as it’s pretty much just Rogue but without the dashing flavour.
There’s no magic until Deadeye and Specter so it was pretty low in my priority list because of that.
Standard 2 weapon skill bars, swapping in combat has a cooldown.
Profession mechanic is Stealing skills from enemies for use.
Unique combat in that their weapon skills don’t have CDs, but use up a resource called Initiative which regenerates through combat + certain skills & Traits.
That does mean you end up spamming the same skill  though. Whether or not that’s more interesting than pressing a bunch of other buttons is up to each person.
Additionally, the 3rd weapon skill (for Dual Wielding weapons) depends on what your main and off hand weapons are (no effect on 2H obviously). There are skills for no off-hand but won’t be including them as they’re strictly worse.
Stealth attacks also upgrade the 1st weapon skill if used when affected by Stealth.
Lowest HP and medium armour due to Stealth and Blinks / Evades. Relying on Evasion on higher ping sucked though, even if it sounds fine in theory.
Thief Abilities
Stolen Skills
There are way too many to list but will put some notable things here:
For base Thief (and Daredevil), you Blink to the enemy and then steal the skill.
In PvP, each class has its own unique stolen skill.
NPC skills range from damaging to receiving Boons to CC, etc.
Raids have their unique skills.
Strikes (effectively replaced Raids, think FFXIV Trials) also have their own skills.

Stealth Attacks & Dual Wield Attacks will be added in their respective weapon sections.
Short Bow
Mid-high range 2H that focuses on Conditions.

Trick Shot
Targeted ranged 20% Combo Projectile that damages & Bleeds Poisoned enemies, bouncing up to 3 times.

The usual ranged auto attack. Requires target to be Poisoned to have any damaging Conditions though which makes it a bit weaker in Solo play when it’s already outclassed by other weapons in general. Some synergy w/ Choking Gas but it already feels bad being one of the only skills that requires something extra for its full effect. Bouncing is nice though. If they want to keep the synergy, make it Bleed by default and either double the stacks or increase the duration if the target is Poisoned.

Surprise Shot - Stealth Attack
Combo Projectile that damages, 3 x Bleeds & Immobilizes.

Stealth version that guarantees not only Bleeding but 3 stacks as well as Immobilize. As expected it’s a straight up upgrade from the base version.

Cluster Bomb -> Detonate Cluster
Ground targeted Blast AoE that damages & Bleeds. Can be activated midair for:
4 Smaller explosions that individually do less damage but can hit the same target for more damage & 4 x the Bleeding.

Interesting design as you have a choice between a Blast finisher or possibly more damage. The reason why it’s possibly more damage is because it’s hit box reliant. The projectile travels in an arc and the spread of the smaller bombs is lower if exploded from a lower height. Meaning you either need a big hitbox to guarantee all hits to hit the target or to be at range and detonate it at the end of the arc. Anything hitbox size reliant is dumb and this is no exception. Use it if you need Bleeding but it seems to be generally weaker than the Poison skill and a lot more annoying to maximise DPS.

Disabling Shot
Evade backwards from targeted enemy and damage & Cripple via a Combo Projectile.

Defensive skill as you get 0.5s of Evasion iframes, even at range. Obviously that comes at a damage cost as not only are you using time for the animation, you’re using up Initiative on it. Use it if you need to dodge something and you’re out of dodges. Cripple is irrelevant in PvE.

Choking Gas
Ground targeted Poison Combo field that pulses damage & Poison. Unblockable and Dazes on initial  impact.

Generally seems a lot better than Cluster Bomb since it doesn’t have the dumb hitbox shenanigans and Thief has Poison related Traits to synergise with. It does cost 4 Initiative while the other costs 3 so maybe there’s some mathematical reason to use the other one, but from a quick glance this seems strictly better.

Infiltrator’s Arrow
Ground targeted AoE that blinks you to the target area + AoE Blinds.

The only reason why anyone even uses this weapon: a bunch of Blinks. Only useful when mounts aren’t available and you don’t expect to be fighting anytime soon since it costs 6 whole Initiative. Overall this weapon needs something since right now it’s relegated to being 2 Blinks before having to recharge Initiative.

Sword
Short ranged & versatile (offensive, defensive, mobility). Main hand only.

Slice -> Slash -> Crippling Strike
Frontal cleave, damage.
Frontal cleave, same damage.
Frontal cleave, most damage, Cripples & Weakens.

The usual melee combo. Only complaint is the 2nd hit not doing more than the 1st, though I’m only now realising this is more common than I thought. 3rd hits effects make it feel like this is a PvP weapon, which is only reinforced by skills below.

Tactical Strike - Stealth Attack
Single target damage, Blind & 10 x Vulnerability. Daze instead of Blind if hit from behind.

Blind / Daze makes this even more of a PvP weapon. Damage is actually weaker than the 3rd hit so you need to make sure you don’t mess up the combo (not sure if it breaks it or not, probably does).

Infiltrator’s Strike -> Infiltrator’s Return
Blink to target for AoE damage & Immobilize. Grant self Swiftness. Can reactivate for:
Return to original position & cure 1 Condition.

Blink, Swiftness and return Blink + Condition Cleanse? PvP. Note that you can’t use it to Blink again while the return is up and that’s 15 whole seconds.

Flanking Strike -> Larcenous Strike - Dual Wield w/ Off-Hand Dagger
Evade & cleave for damage. Unblockable.
Single target & steal 2 Boons. Bonus damage if no Boons. Unblockable.

Does decent damage but the main features are the Evade & Boon steal. That again reiterates the role of a PvP weapon, especially w/ the Unblockable clause.

Pistol Whip - Dual Wield w/ Off-hand Pistol
Single target damage & Stun. Evade and then channel a cleave.

More useful in PvE than the other option as CC & damage are always welcome. It does consign you to either keeping this on the 2nd bar solely for CC or being forced to use this channelled skill as your Initiative spender, where most of its power budget is in the CC and the Evade + the damage is on a channel which can be interrupted by movement, very annoying.

Dagger
Short range & fast. Note that Dagger is main hand (1, 2, 3) & off hand (4, 5). Meaning you can mix and match and not necessarily have to take all 5 Dagger skills at once.

Double Strike -> Wild Strike -> Lotus Strike
Frontal hit, 2 x damage to 2 targets.
Frontal hit, same damage to 2 targets + 2 x Bleeding & Endurance.
Frontal hit, most damage to 2 targets + 2 x Poison.

Usual melee weapon. This actually works for both Power & Condition builds, each using a different Initiative spender. Best way to look at Thief weapons are PvP (Sword), melee DPS (Dagger), ranged DPS (Pistol) and Shortbow ().

Backstab - Stealth Attack
Single target damage. Doubled if from behind.

Huge Power damage but requires Stealth, which can be gained through Utility skills or Cloak and Dagger.

Heartseeker
Combo Leap to damage a single enemy. Deals more damage below 50% HP and even more below 25% HP.

Does a bunch of damage if below the 1st threshold. Since it’s only power damage, it’s only used by power DPS. Leap is irrelevant in PvE.

Shadow Shot - Dual Wield w/ Off-hand Pistol
Single target unblockable Combo Projectile that Blinds. Blink to target to damage.

Mobility skill if using an off-hand pistol. Extra mobility never hurts and the Blind could be useful if it wasn’t single target. You can really tell which skills and weapon combinations I didn’t use huh. 

Death Blossom - Dual Wield w/ Off-hand Dagger
Evade & Combo Whirl over target, damaging & 3 x Bleeding nearby enemies.

Main spammable skill for Condition builds due to the Bleeding. There’s an Evade attached to it too which can be used by Power builds too at the cost of damage if your normal dodge isn’t up. Otherwise it’s spam spam spam for Condi builds, very fun (not really).

Dancing Dagger
Mid-high range Combo Projectile that damages, Cripples & Torments. Bounces up to 3 times.

Does decent damage and actually out damages Heartseeker while above 50% HP. Other than that it’s just damage as Cripple isn’t worth mentioning in PvE.

Cloak and Dagger
Single target damage & 5 x Vulnerability. Gain Stealth.

Stealth access but it has a big 5 Initiative cost so need to make sure you have your damage buffs up for a big Backstab. Personally I find Stealth very annoying to play w/ as I accidentally break it w/ a non-Stealth Attack. Plus never really cared for Stealth in games.

Pistol
Mid-high range fast projectiles. Note that Pistol is main hand (1, 2, 3) & off hand (4, 5). Meaning you can mix and match and not necessarily have to take all 5 Pistol skills at once.

Vital Shot
Single target 20% Combo Projectile that damages & Bleeds.

Normal ranged attack. Annoyingly it doesn't pierce or bounce so it’s awful for AoE. There is a Bleed but there’s no Bleed anywhere else unless you’re taking off-hand Dagger, which locks you into that if you want to use a main-hand Pistol.

Sneak Attack - Stealth Attack
5 x single target Combo Projectiles that damage & Bleed.

Strictly better version of the auto attack; does the same thing otherwise.

Bola Strike
Single target Combo Projectile that damages, applies 5 x Vulnerability & Immobilizes.

Soft CC. Pretty much never use this as it’s less damage and less CC than Head Shot. Only upside is it has 5 x Vulnerability which is covered by other players.

Shadow Strike -> Repeater - Dual Wield w/ Off-hand Dagger
Single target melee attack for damage & Torment & Blink backwards. If you hit something, fire a Combo Projectile that damages. Activate again within 4s for:
5 x 20% Combo Projectiles that damage & Bleed.

Somewhat awkward as it’s melee range compared to the ranged attacks of the other 2 skills. For Condi builds, it would be very annoying blinking backwards every time you want to use this skill. This is the only time I’d consider having an empty off-hand as it’s just the 2nd attack, meaning you’re not stuck having to Blink backwards to DPS.

Unload - Dual Wield w/ Off-hand Pistol
8 x 20% Combo Projectiles that damage & grant self Might. Refund some Initiative if all projectiles hit.

Pretty much spray and pray. Hold down the button and the enemy is usually dead after 2 or 3 casts. If not, have fun auto attacking. Base Thief isn’t very exciting but this was the most effective way to play ranged at the time.

Head Shot
Single target Combo Projectile that damages & Dazes.

CC skill. Use it if you need CC at the cost of damage. There’s really nothing else to be said about it.

Black Powder
Place a Smoke Combo field beneath that pulses Blindness. Fire a Combo Projectile that damages & usually combos w/ the previous Smoke field to Blind.

Blindness & Stealth (via Smoke Combos) are more of a PvP thing, though there’s some use w/ skipping mobs in dungeons. That said, not useful in the main instanced content and it’s very expensive at 6 Initiative cost.

Healing
Choose 1.

Hide in Shadows - Deception
Stealth & remove Burning, Poison, Bleeding & Confusion. Gain Regen & heal self.

Strong heal, but there is a 1s cast time which is something to be aware of. Removes the Conditions before the healing so the Poison won’t reduce the healing. Stealth can be used defensively or offensively (via Stealth Attacks), which gives you an option between using it as part of your DPS rotation or keeping it as a heal / escape. Regen is also there but it’s just a delayed heal, no interactions w/ Thief Traits. Only issue is the cast time so watch out.

Signet of Malice - Signet
Passive: Heal whenever you attack.
Active: Heal self.

Passive healing option. Somewhat similar to Ele’s Signet of Restoration, but w/ the exception that it works when applying Conditions & attacks that are AoE will proc multiple times. As such, the active is the weakest of all the heals; a tradeoff for constant sustain. Take it if you need constant healing and can go without the Condition cleanses.

Withdraw - Trick
Remove Chilled, Cripple, Immobilize & Torment. Evade backwards & heal self.

Another defensive option as it cleanses mobility related Conditions + Evades backwards. Since you have iframes, the heal is consequently weaker. Purely defensive vs. Hide in Shadows.

Skelk Venom - Venom
Heal self. Grant PBAoE 5 x Venom buff that heals each attack.

Party healing option as all of the Thief’s Venoms are applied to allies nearby. Potentially heals the Thief the most but comes with the caveat of requiring 5 hits and doesn’t come with any other utility (Stealth, Condition Cleanses, iframes). If pure healing is needed for you and your group then this is the option to take.

Utilities
Choose 3.

Blinding Powder - Deception
Breaks stun & grants self Stability. PBAoE Blind enemies + Stealth for allies. Blasts combos.

Deception’s theme is stealth, blinks and general bamboozlement. This fits the theme pretty well as the stun break version. Stability lasts 1s which makes sense as you’re Stealthed for 3s. Doesn’t get much use in PvE though as both Stealth & Blindness are more geared towards PvP.

Shadow Refuge - Deception
Ground targeted Dark Combo field that pulses healing & Stealth.

Healing option. It’s a bit weird in that if you leave before it expires, you lose the Stealth & are Revealed, but if you stay for the full duration you get 11s total of Stealth. Also the tooltip is missing the fact that the pulses partially revive Downed allies for some reason. The heal is okay and the revive is handy, but the main strength is the 11s of Stealth which again doesn’t really get much use in PvE other than skipping combat which is itself pretty niche, not relevant in (most?) boss fights.

Shadow Step -> Shadow Return - Deception.
Breaks stun. Blink to targeted area. Reactivate for:
Return to the starting location, curing 3 Conditions.

Pretty simple stun break Blink, except you can return to the original location + Cleanse 3 Conditions. Other than handling some mechanics, there’s rarely any requirements for returning to your original location immediately to warrant taking this skill in PvE as you should be able to just run back (balance for other classes, etc). Again, it’s better in PvP.

Smoke Screen - Deception
PBAoE Smoke Combo field that blocks missiles & pulses Blind for enemies.

Useful if you require projectile defence, otherwise you don’t take it in PvE like other similar skills. Blindness is also not that useful. Smoke Field can be used to Blast Stealth but again, only useful for skipping trash mobs and they’re only in specific content.

Prepare Pitfall -> Pitfall - Preparation
Place a controlled (only triggers when you reactivate) Trap beneath you.
Unblockable AoE damage, 2 x Vulnerability & knock down. Pulses damage.

Preparations are pretty similar to Traps, except instead of requiring an enemy (or ally) to step into it, you manually detonate it again. CD starts from when you place the trap. Makes it unique and more versatile vs. Traps and can be annoying manually detonating it all the time.

Hard CC option, and it’s 1 of only 2 non-Elite CC options Thief has. Take it if you need AoE CC. Damage isn’t enough to warrant this as a DPS skill.

Prepare Thousand Needles -> Thousand Needles - Preparation
Place a controlled Trap beneath you.
Unblockable damage & Immobilize. Pulses damage + Poison, Bleeding then Cripple.

Condition DPS option. Sometimes Immobilize is stronger than Disables as you can’t stun break out of it (for PvP). Otherwise it pulses a bunch of Poison & Bleeding, mathematically better than other options even w/ the cast time and 3s ICD between preparation and detonation. Same notes about Preparations apply.

Prepare Shadow Portal - Shadow Portal - Preparation
Place a controlled Trap beneath you.
Breaks stun. Creates a 1 way portal from where you currently are to the initial location. Allies who take the portal are Stealthed & enemies near the exit are Weakened.

Party mobility option. Unlike Mesmer’s portal, it can only be taken by 5 total people so its uses are quite literally limited. Also requires you to place it where you want to eventually go later and portals are pretty annoying to use since it uses the all purpose interact (F) key, which can cause issues if there’s something else interactable on top of the entrance. Notes about Preparations don’t really apply as you’re using it for your allies rather than against enemies.

Prepare Seal Area - Seal Area - Preparation
Place a controlled Trap beneath you.
Creates a Dark Combo field that blocks projectiles & prevents enemies from entering or leaving.

Zoning option. Protects against ranged and prevents melee from entering (unless CC immune). Another projectile protection skill, but it’s a higher CD + requires preparation so it’s not as good as Smoke Screen due to the power budget being in preventing enemies from entering as well. Makes it stronger in PvP.

Assassin’s Signet - Signet
Passive: Gain Power.
Active: Gain 3 x the Power for 5s.

Offensive option. Really neat design for a Signet as you basically want to use it during burst phases as an offensive CD, while leaving it alone during downtime. How often you use it will depend on how often burst phases are and how often your damage spikes (if it’s just once every now and then, then it’s much stronger vs. constant high damage attacks).

Infiltrator’s Signet - Signet
Passive: Regenerate 1 Initiative every 10s.
Active: Break stun & Blink to target.

Stun break, though its passive is kind of weird. If there’s no target it will just be a stun break, in which case you’re better off choosing another stun break. With a target it will be very good for chasing enemies down, making it a decent PvP pick. The passive just doesn’t really fit w/ the active and seems like it was just added on quickly. It’s also very weak as most skills cost 3+ Initiative. If its passive was the Movement Speed one then it would fit better, though having different effects isn’t unheard of and does make it more versatile. If only the passive was actually useful.

Signet of Agility - Signet
Passive: Gain Precision.
Active: PBAoE 100 Endurance & 3 x Condition Cleanse.

For Power DPS, you keep this off cooldown and it’s just a stat boost. You’re then given an option to keep your damage up or use it to cleanse Conditions in an area around you + fully recharge Endurance for most allies (Daredevil have 150 max) which means more dodges = more mitigation. It’s the only party Condition Cleanse skill that Thief has so it’s definitely an option if needed, but support Thief without Specter is kind of crappy anyway (plus they have their own cleanse).

Signet of Shadows - Signet
Passive: +25% Movement Speed.
Active: Ranged targeted AoE Blindness, Weakness & 10 x Vulnerability.

Mobility / debuff option. Movement speed is not needed in PvE due to Swiftness. Conditions are largely PvP oriented as Blindness & Weakness don’t do much in PvE and Vulnerability is already very common. Strong ranged Condition option in PvP.

Caltrops - Trick
PBAoE area that pulses Bleeding & Cripple. Unblockable.

Tricks are more thematic than mechanically related.

Zoning option. Damage is lower than some other Condition options due to power budget being placed into the Cripple & Unblockable aspects, making it stronger in PvP.

Haste - Trick
Breaks stun. Grant self Quickness, Fury & Swiftness.

Pretty weak stun break as it offers no protection after using it. In exchange it gains offensive Boons which could be useful in Solo / PvP but since they’re always covered by support, it’s simply an inferior option in group content.

Roll for Initiative - Trick
Breaks stun. Evade backwards, cleanse Crippled, Chilled & Immobilize + gain 6 Initiative.

A much better stun break as you get Evasion iframes + Mobility Condition cleanses. Also grants 6 Initiative which is pretty big so it can be used defensively or offensively to gain enough Initiative to finish off enemies, even w/ the annoying rollback (especially for melee).

Scorpion Wire - Trick
Long ranged single target Combo Projectile that damages & Pulls. 2 charges.

Useful if you need a Pull as it’s the only option for Thief. Other than that there is a better CC option (the only other Utility option is Pitfall). Damage is negligible and being a Combo Projectile is definitely not worth taking a skill over another.

Devourer Venom - Venom
PBAoE 2 x Venom that Immobilizes.

Soft CC option. There’s also a Trait that applies Poison whenever you Immobilize an enemy (Immobilize from allies from this Venom counts as you for this Trait) so it actually acts as a pseudo damage option too if you have that Trait. Otherwise it’s extra soft CC. It’s PBAoE so it’s fire and forget when everyone is stacked and it’s only 2 stacks so only 2 hits required to get full effect.

Ice Drake Venom - Venom
PBAoE 4 x Venom that Chills.

Softer CC option. Chill is pretty annoying in PvP, which is the only place this would see use. Same notes about being PBAoE and having X stacks apply.

Skale Venom - Venom
PBAoE 4 x Venom that Torments & applies Vulnerability.

Offensive option. Can be decent if you have Torment related interactions (Specter), otherwise it technically loses out in damage to Devourer Venom if you have that Poisoning Trait due to half of the effect being Vulnerability which is already covered by other players. Otherwise it’s another damaging option, slightly weaker because of the Vulnerability.

Spider Venom - Venom
PBAoE 6 x Venom that Poisons.

Offensive option. Purely damage. Has the most stacks and base Thief has Poison Traits. Take it if building Condi and in group.

Elite
Choose 1.

Thieves Guild - Deception
Summon 3 x Thieves to fight for you for 24s.

Offensive option. While they only deal power damage by themselves, they do gain your Venoms so they technically can be a part of Condition builds. They’re also the only purely DPS option for all Thief specs so you’re pretty much stuck with this one.

Basilisk Venom - Venom
PBAoE Venom that stuns. Unblockable.

CC option. Does a huge amount of Defiance Bar damage as it’s 5 separate stuns. Take it if you need CC at a cost of damage.

Dagger Storm - Trick
Channelled Evasion that Combo Whirls + reflects projectiles & throws out projectiles randomly that damage, Bleeding & Cripple. Can move at double speed during the channel.

Defensive option. While it does damage & Bleed, it also reflects projectiles, Evades & Cripples. This combined w/ the fact that it’s channelled (meaning you aren’t doing anything else like DPSing) makes it a poor DPS choice and strictly for PvP defensiveness. 

Trait
Non-coloured Traits are auto picked if the tree is chosen. Coloured Traits are a choice of 1. Can only pick 3 trees.
Deadly Arts - Poison & Damage

Serpent’s Touch
Stealing inflicts 2 x Poison. While Downed, attacks apply Poison.

A little bit of extra Poison when Stealing, which you should be doing on cooldown anyway. The Downed effect is (hopefully) not relevant most of the time.

Dagger Training
Gain Power, double while wielding a Dagger.

Power DPS option. Strictly a stats up, even if you’re not using Dagger. There’s really nothing else to say, take it if you’re power DPS.

Mug
Deal damage & heal when Stealing. Cannot crit.

Trading option. Since it damages (can’t crit) and heals, it’s a lot better in PvP since you have less Power, Precision & Ferocity in PvP (hence a Trait that only increases Power is less effective).

Deadly Ambition
Gain Condition Damage. Apply Poison when hitting an enemy w/ a Dual Wield attack.

Condition DPS option. A lot more interesting than its Power counterpart as it makes you want to use the Dual Wield attack as the Initiative spender more.

Lotus Poison
Weaken targets when you Poison them. 10s ICD per target.

Little bit of extra Weakness, 40% uptime. Exposed Weakness (minor Trait below) makes it useful for DPS and there’s also a couple of other Traits from other classes that also improve their DPS. By itself not too helpful though as Weakness is weak in PvE, which is fine for a minor Trait that also interacts w/ a later minor Trait in the same tree (meaning you’ll always have the other effect).

Even the Odds
5 x Vulnerability when Stealing. 5 x Might when Stealth Attacking.

Solo / PvP option as the effects granted are redundant in group content. Stealing has a 25s CD and Stealth attacks aren’t very common in combat, so its effectiveness is limited even in those types of content.

Panic Strike
Immobilizing enemies Poisons them. Hitting an enemy below 50% HP Immobilizes them (20s ICD).

Condition DPS option. Makes Devourer Venom & Thousand Needles decent Condi skills as they apply a bunch of Immobilize or already have Conditions on it. Otherwise it also occasionally procs against low HP targets.

Revealed Training
Gain Power, 50% more while Revealed.

Power DPS option. Stealth Attacks Reveal you as you’re breaking out of Stealth, so it makes your Stealth Attacks hit harder. This obviously requires Stealth in your build to make full use of so you’re a little locked in terms of Utilities & playstyle (have to remember to activate your Stealth Attack as it’s not automatic). Otherwise it’s also a general Power increase.

Exposed Weakness
+2% Strike Damage per unique Condition on the target (max 24%).

Bunch of extra Power damage without doing much on your end. Synergises w/ the Poison & Weakness from this tree, as well as the Conditions from every other tree and class. Very unlikely you’ll consistently get the full 24% but it’s still a free damage increase in group content. Also note that unlike other damage increase stats, this is multiplicative rather than additive, making it much stronger.

Potent Poison
+33% Poison Damage & Poison Duration. Other Deadly Arts Traits that apply Poison apply an additional stack.

Condition DPS option. Simple damage & duration increase for Poison, making Poison much more valuable on Thief. Also adds an extra stack of Poison for Serpent’s Touch, Deadly Ambition & Panic Strike for more Condi DPS.

Improvisation
Stolen Skills have 2 charges. Randomly recharge an equipped Utility skill when Stealing (15s ICD).

Versatile option. 2 charges on Stolen skills is good, more use out of the skills which are consistent in PvP & group PvE content. Less useful in open world PvE as there’s a bunch of random skills. The recharge being random is very annoying, especially if it chooses a skill that’s not even recharging (there’s no protection against that). Needs protection against the above case or at least some way to control it, like the highest CD or something. Decrease the recharge if needed to account for consistency.

Executioner
+20% Strike Damage to enemies below 50% HP.

Power DPS option. Extra damage when executing enemies, that’s all it is.
Critical Strikes - Critical Hits

Keen Observer
+15% Crit Chance while >= 75% HP.

Extra Crit Chance while at higher HP, which is almost always the case in group content w/ healers. Basically means less Precision is needed so you can build more Power / Ferocity for DPS.

Assassin’s Fury
Gain 3 x Might when gaining Fury. 2s ICD.

Not that useful in PvE as expected since Might is covered by supports. Could be useful in PvP as Twin Fangs’ conditionals are pretty hard to achieve in PvP and you don’t get that many Boons there.

Signets of Power
Signet actives grant 2 Initiative.

Resource option. Not only does it require using Signets, it also requires you to choose this Trait and it barely gives you any Initiative anyway so it’s very niche. Still if you can survive long enough w/ a bunch of Signets to make use of the Initiative in PvP, it might be an option.

Twin Fangs
+7% crit damage (not the stat) while >= 90% HP. +7% Crit Chance while flanking from behind or the side.

Easy DPS choice for PvE as you have a healer for the HP conditional (though it should be 75% to match Keen Observer) and it’s much easier to flank a target that’s not constantly trying to dodge and move around like in PvP. When the conditionals are met, it’s just more and stronger crits. Note that it doesn’t increase the Crit Damage stat, but the damage you deal via crits (i.e. multiplicative not additive). That makes it incredibly more powerful than what’s listed.

Unrelenting Strikes
PBAoE Fury when critting an enemy. 8s ICD.

More crits from Critting. 50% uptime without any Boon Duration so it’s purely supplementary. There was talk about making Deadeye a viable support DPS spec and it’s a Power spec so this tree could be an option in the future (Specter is Condi based so this tree isn’t worth it for their support builds).

Sundering Shade
Stealth Attacks inflict 5 x Vulnerability & grant Fury. 1s ICD.

More PvP oriented as the effects are usually already present in PvE. Additionally, Stealth attacks aren’t that common in most PvE builds vs. PvP builds.

Practiced Tolerance
Gain Ferocity based on 10% Precision.

More crit damage the more crit chance stat you have. Take it if you need damage, simple.

Deadly Aim
Pistol & Harpoon Gun skills pierce but deal -5% Damage.

Not only do you miss out on the extra damage from the other options, but you actively lose damage for choosing it. Piercing (or at least a bounce or 2) should be base kit anyway so this Trait just feels awful even without the damage down. Don’t think there’s a single Trait in the game that reduces damage other than this one.

Ferocious Strikes
+10% crit damage (not the stat) against enemies that are >= 50% HP.

More damage at the beginning half of fights. Also increases crit damage rather than the Crit Damage stat, which makes it even more powerful than it lets on (multiplicative). Interesting that it only affects enemies above the HP threshold while the other effects are while you’re healthy or the enemy is lower HP. Lets you bring enemies to that low HP threshold quicker / phase quicker.

No Quarter
Critting under Fury grants 2s of Fury, 2s ICD. Fury grants Ferocity.

DPS option. While the Fury being granted isn’t that useful in group content, the extra Ferocity (i.e. crit damage) is. Take it if you purely want damage.

Hidden Killer
Guaranteed crits while Stealthed. Lingers for 2s after being Revealed.

PvP option. PvE builds already revolve around having 100% crit so you’ll rarely get any use out of this Trait unless you’re low HP (for Keen Observer), not flanking (for Twin Fangs) and without Fury, which all are entirely possible for PvP.

Invigorating Precision
Crits heal for 4% of the damage, increased to 10% while under Fury.

Sustain option. Not that good in PvP as it requires you to crit, which is pretty rare compared to PvE. Also requires you to have Fury which isn’t always the case with Boon removal, steal & Corruption. You do miss out on the extra Ferocity from No Quarter but if you need the sustain it’s an option, even w/ a healer.
Shadow Arts - Stealth & Survivability

Merciful Ambush
Heal when entering or exiting Stealth, including Stealth granted to allies. Stealth yourself & your target when reviving an ally. 10s ICD.

Adds a bit of sustain to Stealth, playing into the Thief theme. But since Stealth is pretty rare and also has the forced Revealed debuff when exiting it, it’s too limited to be used as a main source of healing. Also combined w/ the usual res Trait, thought it doesn’t really do much beyond 2s of Stealth (which heals for a small amount).

Shielding Restoration
PBAoE Barrier when using a Healing skill. 10s ICD.

Sustain option. Lowest CD is Signet of Malice w/ 12s but it’s not a support healing skill. The only support heals are Skelk Venom and later Well of Gloom for Spectre and both of these are 20s or more. Could be useful if you need extra sustain via damage mitigation but doesn’t actually build well w/ actual support builds.

Shadow’s Embrace
Remove a damaging Condition when you enter or exit Stealth, including Stealth granted to allies.

Condition Cleanse option, take it if you need cleansing from damaging Conditions. However since it’s a single Condition, a damaging Condition & you’re pseudo locked behind Revealed, it’s a pretty poor cleansing option compared to other classes.

Hidden Thief
Stealing Blinds. Stealth Attacks Weaken, 2s ICD.

Debuff option (which makes it a PvP option). Don’t think many Sneak Attacks last 2s so not sure what the ICD is for, but I guess it’s to future proof so that an enemy can only be Weakened once per Stealth Attack. Again, Blind + Weakness aren’t useful in PvE so it’s a PvP option.

Meld with Shadows
Gain Superspeed when entering or exiting Stealth.

This does NOT include the Stealth given to allies, so it’s only you. Would’ve been nice to have some extra utility for support builds & could’ve just restricted it to PvE only since it would be pretty strong in PvP, but the technology doesn’t exist I suppose.

Shadow Savior
Completing a Thief Blink heals you. Nearby allies are healed for double.

Little bit of extra healing, but requires you taking weapons w/ Blink skills and Utilities w/ Blinks, somewhat locking you into those. The healing isn’t that much though so it can be used as supplementary healing vs. a main source so you’ll feel less bad about not taking as many Blink skills as you can. Gives you a choice between mobility or healing, or in the best cases you get both (more prevalent in PvP).

Leeching Venoms
Venom skills lifesteal. Gain 3 x Spider Venom (Poisons) when entering or exiting Stealth.

Damage & sustain option, but requires you taking Venom skills. Neither scale very well though and Venoms are inherently better for Condition builds, where this Trait has no interaction w/ other than the 3 stacks you get from entering & exiting Stealth. Could be a lot better if allies also gained the stacks (maybe 1) from your Stealth so it has more party synergy since this is the support-y tree. Otherwise it’s just more trading tools (damage & healing) from Stealth which is more for PvP. Regular Venom use is on CD (except for the CC one) so often the heal is wasted. At least when you’re purposefully Stealthing for the heal from Merciful Ambush you’d be able to make use of the lifesteal healing.

Cloaked in Shadow
Gaining Stealth PBAoE Blinds. Blinding enemies lifesteals from them.

PvP oriented trading tool. Blind isn’t useful in PvE as per usual so you’re less likely to use skills that do, hence less likely to proc the lifesteal. It also only affects you so it can’t even be used as a party utility Trait. Good for trading in PvP though.

Shadow Siphoning
Stealth Attacks life steal. 1s ICD.

Synergy w/ the Stealth since it’s the Stealth tree. Only affects you but that’s fine since it’s a minor Trait. If it affected allies then it’d just be a baby version of Leeching Venoms.

Cover of Shadow
Gain Protection when entering or exiting Stealth, including Stealth granted to allies.

Extra defensiveness to synergise w/ the other party Stealth Traits. Only lasts 2s (4s from both entering & exiting) and there’s the Revealed issue too so it can be a bit finicky to apply lots of compared to other support specs.

Shadow’s Rejuvenation
Gain 2 Initiative entering Stealth. Gain 1 Initiative exiting Stealth.

Resource option. Obviously only affects yourself as it would either be busted w/ full Thief parties or useless when there aren’t any other Thieves. Fits the Stealth theme. Take it if you need extra resources, not much else to say. Being frontloaded doesn’t really help much as you’ll want to use the Stealth Attack first, which doesn’t cost any Initiative. Using anything else breaks you out of Stealth for no extra benefit (sans Traits taken in here).

Rending Shade
Steal 2 Boons from enemies hit by your Stealth Attacks. Hitting an enemy without a Boon causes AoE Fear around the target.

PvP option as it’s both Boon stealing & Fear, both of which aren’t useful in PvE. Synergises w/ Stealth via the Stealth Attacks, that’s pretty much it.
Acrobatics - Dodging & Mobility

Expeditious Dodger
Gain Swiftness when Dodging.

Unless it’s PvP or you’re in the very niche role of kiting something, this tree is pretty useless in PvE since you’re better off killing the enemies than trying to out live them w/ Dodges, so it’ll be a quick skim for this tree. More mobility when Dodging (no successful Evasion needed) which isn’t useful in PvE since Swiftness is very common.

Instant Reflexes
Gain 2s of Evasion after using an Elite skill. 30s ICD.

On demand dodges. Base Elites have long-ish (at least 1s) cast times so it’s a little janky for those ones. Spec Elites only have a 0.5s cast time so they’re a lot more safe, though not as useful in 1v1 situations as they’re either CC or Stealth which sort of renders the Evasion useless.

Vigorous Recovery
Gain Vigor when using a Healing skill.

Extra dodges for after using your Healing skill, which you usually use when you’re taking damage / under fire so it works well w/ itself, if a bit boring. Obviously no effect in PvE most of the time.

Pain Response
Gain Regen & remove all damaging Conditions when struck below 75% HP. 16s ICD.

Automatic anti-Condition defensive Trait. Not much to say as you don’t have to do anything for it. Obviously requires you to get hit so it’s a little risky but that’s not too hard when Solo. PvP has a 60s CD so good luck with that.

Feline Grace
Gain Vigor upon successfully Evading an attack.

Pretty nice Trait as it rewards you for dodging something rather than pressing it randomly. Again, not that useful in PvE though.

Guarded Initiation
Remove a Condition (Vulnerability, Weakness, Slow or Confusion) when hitting an enemy while >= 75% HP.

A more active Condition Cleansing option, except it only affects the above 4 Conditions which don’t really have any relation to each other, apart from being Conditions. Confusion is covered by Pain Response so the other 3 are just leftovers not covered by the other Traits in this tree. HP requirement is only relevant in PvP, but so is the entire tree.

Swindler’s Equilibrium
Gain Power, doubled when wielding a Sword or Spear. Successfully Evading an attack w/ a Sword or Spear wielded recharges 50% of Steal’s max CD, 10s ICD.

Offensive option. Don’t need to Evade w/ Sword skills, only have it actively equipped when dodging will be enough. More Steals = more Blinks (and possibly other effects from Traits) and more stolen Skills which is Thief's thing, even if I find it personally lacklustre compared to something like Necro’s Shroud.

Hard to Catch
Gain 8 Endurance when Blinking.

8 whole Endurance. From a limited conditional of Blinks. Not sure why you would ever take this Trait w/ that value. On paper it’s decent though, giving more Endurance = dodges through active mobility which fits the theme, just needs to be more impactful.

Endless Stamina
Vigor is 50% more effective on you. Gain Concentration.

More dodges! Concentration is just there for longer lasting Vigor you grant yourself, as there’s no other source of party Boons in this tree to warrant this being called a support Trait.

Assassin’s Reward
Heal each point of Initiative spent.

Sustain option. Doesn’t really fit the Dodging theme though but whatever. Take it if you need sustain, which is more prevalent in PvP. It’s solo healing so no party utility.

Upper Hand
Gain 1 Initiative & Regen when successfully Evading an attack. 2s ICD.

Resource option at the cost of less sustain which is also in a less reliable form (a HoT and a Boon). 2s ICD is just there so you don’t get super rewarded for dodging a bunch of attacks at the same time which is fair. Just wish it was better than 1 Initiative and a weak Regen which is susceptible to being removed or worse in PvP.

Don’t Stop
While under Swiftness, movement-impairing Conditions have -80% Duration when applied to you. Gaining Swiftness removes 1 of those Conditions.

Mobility option. Makes you extremely mobile if you have a constant source of Swiftness. This is the case in PvE but rarely you’ll need the cleansing, and in PvP you’ll need it more but there’ll be far fewer sources of Swiftness.
Trickery - Stealing

Kleptomaniac
Stealing grants 2 Initiative.

Extra resource for Stealing (which you do on CD). More resources for more of your most damaging weapon skills = more damage = more dopamine activated.

Uncatchable
Leave Lesser Caltrops behind when dodging. Lesser Caltrops: same effect as Caltrops but less Bleeding, Cripple, number of targets affected, duration, is blockable and isn’t a Trick for Trait purposes.

Technically an offensive zoning tool but every aspect of it is nerfed from the normal version making it feel awful to use. Only reason I can think of it being nerfed that much is due to Daredevil having 3 dodges making it too strong, in which case an ICD or a 2 zone cap would’ve been better or than super nerfing it. Still, it’s the only selfish DPS option and is decent for Condition builds.

Burst of Agility
Use Lesser Haste when flanking an enemy from the back or side. Lesser Haste: same as Haste but w/ a 60s CD instead of 24s.

Effectively just Quickness, Fury & Swiftness on a 60s CD which is useless in PvE. Can’t even make use of the stun break as it requires you actually hitting something.

Thrill of the Crime
Stealing grants PBAoE Fury, 5 x Might & Swiftness.

Support option. Combined w/ the Steal CDR, Alacrity & some Boon Duration you’ll be able to provide 100% uptime of the above Boons, which you get from something you use on CD anyway.

Preparedness
+3 Max Initiative. Gain Expertise.

More Initiative which allows for more burst in the opening and other burst phases. Expertise for Condi builds as they get less from the burst (still get more skills but they take time for the full effect).

Bountiful Theft
Stealing grants PBAoE Vigor. Also “steals” 3 Boons from target and grants a copy of those in a PBAoE too.

More support. Also doesn’t actually steal Boons, rather removes 3 Boons and grants a copy w/ fixed duration & stacks around you so it’s not as strong as you think it is. Probably to normalise its effects in PvP for 25 x Might vs. 1 stack.

Trickster
Tricks remove 2 Conditions.

Condition Cleanse but requires taking Tricks. They’re mostly defensive in nature anyway so it works (i.e. you’ll most likely want the cleansing when using these skills anyway, vs. something offensive where you’d possibly waste 1 of the effects.

Pressure Striking
Interrupting enemies applies 2 x Torment. 3s ICD when using CC skills against Defiance Bars.

PvP option as interrupt procs don’t happen that often in PvE, especially w/ the 3s ICD. 

Lead Attacks
+1% All Damage per Initiative spent in combat, max 15%. -15% Steal CD.

Bunch of extra damage for using your damaging skills, naturally increasing your DPS. Stacks are only given at the end of the skill though so something to keep in mind. Also no point in using the weaker skills to build up stacks as you’re using up resources to build up the stacks in the first place which would’ve just been better spent on the damaging skill. More Steals = more Stolen skills & other Steal effects.

Quick Pockets
Gain 3 Initiative when swapping weapons in combat. 8s ICD.

Resource option, take it if you need more Initiative. It’s not a whole lot though and there is an ICD (which is lower than the swap CD so not sure why it’s even there, Thief doesn't have a swap CD reducer off the top of my head).

Sleight of Hand
Stealing Dazes the target. -20% Steal CD.

Bit of CC but the main effect is the big CD reduction on Steal for even more Boon support. Unfortunately they don’t really provide enough Boons at the moment to compete w/ other support builds (cough Firebrand).

Deadly Ambush
Stealing applies 3 x Bleeding. +25% Bleeding damage.

DPS option. Specifically for Condition. Amount given through the limited Steal is pretty low so that effect is supplementary rather than the main source of Bleeding. Most of its benefit is from the +25% Bleeding damage which can help if you’re going down this tree (which you will for Condition builds as its 1 of only 2 that affects their DPS).

Daredevil
Didn’t play as much Daredevil as I didn’t really like the aesthetic (melee using dodges offensively, risk for reward).
Risk reward concept is neat, except dodges are really needed on higher ping since Stealth is janky and Thieves have hardly any HP in the first place.
Improves dodges via Traits for either Condition, Power or mobility effects. Can also dodge 3 times now instead of 2 before needing Endurance. Hence for max damage, you’ll want to use as many dodges as possible (especially w/ a Trait that increases damage dealt the lower your Endurance is).
Staff is the weapon, and for Power DPS the main Initiative spender locks you into an animation and charges you forward, which is not good for survivability purposes and feels bad to use.
Utility skills are Physical which are about CC & physical damage, not something I’m keen on and isn’t that great in PvE anyway.
Traits revolved around dodging + Endurance & being in melee as expected.
Overall I didn’t feel like I gained much out of this spec compared to others.
Also its icon is a boot.
Deadeye
Played it a lot more compared to Daredevil.
Focuses more on single target w/ Deadeye’s Mark replacing Steal.
You still steal skills, but they’re not random and fit into the 9 class archetypes as best as they can.
Stolen skills all give you a Boon and the target a Condition so it’s more predictable rather than a heal vs. CC.
The only issue w/ this is if the target dies, your skill is gone. Your “Steal” CD is reset via a Trait but you’ll have to retarget and reuse it which can cause issues if you tab target onto the wrong one (happened many times).
Using Initiative skills on the marked target builds Malice, and then using the Stolen Skill at max Malice will Stealth you for a free Stealth Attack. Preferred this gameplay loop a lot more to dodge spamming.
Weapon is a Rifle, which is great for picking off single targets but absolutely awful in AoE since it has 0 cleave aside from 1 piercing skill. This feels terrible in an action game and even the piercing one kind of sucks since it only hits in a straight line.
Weapon’s main mechanic is that you can kneel to root yourself in place for more single target damage. Pretty cool risk reward but still feels bad in non-single target situations, which is pretty often.
Also upgrades Stealth Attacks to have an additional effect when used at max Malice, which you should be aiming for anyway for the free Stealth.
Utility skills are Cantrips, so you can kind of argue it’s magic. With a gun. They’re mostly defensive in nature though, i.e. not used in PvE DPS situations unfortunately.
Traits revolved around Marking enemies and Malice as expected.
Specter Combat
Pretty cool aesthetic w/ the Shadow magic.
Not super keen on the single target aspect of the skills, especially on allies where you’re forced to click on them if they’re not in your party, and if they are you have small, barely customizable party frames to click on.
Swaps Steal for Siphon which can be used on enemies or allies. This removes Stolen skills in exchange for Slow, 5 x Vulnerability & 25 Shadow Force (new resource) when used on enemies and Barrier & reduced recharge if used on allies + tethers if you’re in Shadow Shroud.
Gains Shadow Shroud, using Shadow Force to gain access to new weapon skills which are Condition based and support your tethered ally. Additionally acts like Necro’s Shroud, replacing your HP w/ Shadow Force.
Weapon is Scepter for ranged Conditions & support.
Utility skills are Wells but w/ a Thief twist. You blink to the target location before dropping a Well, interacting w/ Blink Traits and the general mobility of Thieves.
Gains access to the Specter traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specialisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Traits are based around Conditions, support & Shadow Shroud.
Specter Abilities
Shadow Shroud

Siphon
Replaces Steal. If used on an enemy, gain 25 Shadow Force + Slow & 5 x Vulnerability the enemy. If used on an ally, grant them Barrier, have half the usual CD and if you’re in Shadow Shroud tether to that ally for Shadow Shroud skills.

Enter / Exit Shadow Shroud
Enter Shroud to gain access to new weapon skills while draining Shadow Force. Additionally grants Barrier to your tethered ally. Also receive -33% damage while replacing your HP bar w/ Shadow Force. If no previously tethered ally, randomly choose one within range.
Exit Shroud, breaking the tether.




Haunt Shot
Ranged targeted AoE that damages & Torments. Gain Might per enemy hit. Heal & grant Might to your tethered ally per enemy hit.

Basic ranged auto that fits the Condition & support theme of the spec. Note that the Might is only to 1 ally, making it very mediocre support wise. In fact the only support that this spec grants is Alacrity (via a Trait) and Barrier, which barely makes it better than support Scourge which is dead in the water. If the Might was party wide it might be better, can keep the healing & Barrier to the tethered ally only. Since it’s targeted you won’t really get to control how many enemies are hit, that will be based on hitbox and enemy AI shenanigans.

Grasping Shadows
Ranged targeted AoE that damages, Cripples & 2 x Torments. Cleanse Conditions based on the number of enemies hit. Cleanse Conditions & heal your tethered ally based on the number of enemies hit. Blasts Combos.

The usual Ranged AoE skill. There’s no real risk in using it on CD for damage as the CD is 3s, so even if you time it incorrectly while needing the Cleanse, it won’t be long until it’s back up again. Same note about being targeted AoEs apply.

Dawn’s Response
Ground targeted Combo Leap that damages & Fears. Grant Barrier to yourself & your tethered ally based on the number of enemies hit. Heal tethered ally based on the number of enemies hit.

Since this has 0 Condition damage attached to it, the base damage is pretty low while locking you in an animation and you’re more likely to be building Condition, support or hybrid, there’s no reason to use this skill on CD for damage as it loses out on DPS to the others + you’ll be wasting the Barrier. There’s a 1s Fear attached to it which could be useful in CC break phases but note that it needs to tick to have any effect, meaning if you have a bunch of Fear in your party, your extra 1s won’t help if it lasts longer than how long the phase lasts for, either due to timing out or being broken immediately by real CC. So you’re best off saving it for mobility (short range) or the Barrier. Since it’s ground targeted you have more control over how many enemies are hit, but it’s pretty short range so keep that in mind.

Eternal Night
Frontal cleave that damages, Chills, Weakens & 4 x Poisons. Heal yourself & tethered ally based on the number of enemies hit.

Bunch of damage (high base damage, good scaling and Poisons a lot) so you’ll want to use it on CD. There is a heal attached to it but if burst healing is needed, it’s going to be needed for AoE most of the time so you’ll have other tools for that. It is melee though so something to keep in mind with (as is the next skill).

Mind Shock
Delayed PBAoE that damages, Stuns & Blasts combos. Grant yourself & your tethered ally 3 x Stability, w/ bonus duration based on the number of enemies hit. Heal your tethered ally based on the number of enemies hit.

Decent damage, CC, Stability & Blast. While there’s no Conditions associated w/ this skill it has good base damage and scaling so it might still be worth using on CD. You may need to hold it for CC though and it does have a 16s CD so there’s some risk involved in using it solely for damage; decision to be made. Note that it does have a 3s delay before exploding, something to keep in mind especially w/ CC phases.

Scepter
Main-hand only ranged damage & support.

Shadow Bolt -> Double Bolt -> Triple Bolt
Single target ranged damage & Torment for enemies, or Barrier for allies.
2 x single target ranged damage & Torment for enemies, or 2 x Barrier for allies. Values are the same except damage is slightly higher.
3 x single target ranged damage & Torment for enemies, or 3 x Barrier for allies. Damage is higher & Torment lasts longer but Barrier is the same per hit.

Typical ranged Condition & support skill. Same annoyances about being single target + having to click on allies apply. Damage ramps up fine, would’ve been fine if it was literally the same but double and triple too (which is the case for the Barrier anyway). Offering only Barrier for the ally seems kind of mediocre though, possibly a heal or a Regen would’ve been nice.

Shadow Squall - Stealth Attack
Enemies: 8 x single target ranged damage & 8 x Poison.
Allies: 8 x single target ranged healing & 8 x Regen.

Very rarely will you gain Stealth as the Condition / support builds use Venoms & Wells, none of which give Stealth. However if you do get Stealth, you get a bunch of Poison or a bunch of healing & Regen. Changing it to Poison isn’t too bad as Thieves have Poison Traits. Note that the Regen stacks in duration so it’s not a bunch of burst healing outside of the pure healing. Same grievances about single target & clicking on allies apply.

Shadow Sap
Enemies: Single target ranged damage & Weakness. Grant PBAoE 5 x Might.
Allies: Barrier & Protection.

Support ish option for Initiative spending. Specters have 3 less Initiative compared to other Thieves (discussed in a Trait later) so you’re less inclined to be using it on suboptimal skills. Enemy option only provides Might (tooltip says self granted only but it gives in a PBAoE) since the Weakness is useless in PvE and for Condi builds in general. Ally option is also single target so unless the “tank” is taking major damage / messing up a lot, it’s not that helpful (Spectre is the only support that’s single target oriented, meaning you’re meant to be able to survive without Specters as raids have existed for years before them).

Twilight Combo - Dual Attack w/ Off-hand Dagger
Enemies: 2 x single target projectiles. Damage + Chill & Poison then damage + 3 x Torment.
Allies: 2 x single target projectiles. Barrier + Swiftness then Healing.

Damaging option. Does more Condition damage than the others as it’s just the 2 projectiles (no multi part skill or channels). Also grants more Barrier & healing than the others due to the same reasoning. Only issue is that it’s single target + ally targeting is annoying, again. Oh and that it’s literally just 2 projectiles, not interesting.

Measured Shot -> Endless Night - Dual Attack w/ Off-hand Pistol
Enemies: Blink away from target & shoot for damage & Immobilize. Pierces.
Allies: Blink to the target & shoot for healing. Pierces.

Enemies: Channelled beam that damages, Slows & Torments. Pierces.
Allies: Single target channelled beam that grants Barrier, Regen & Quickness.

Mobility option. While the secondary skill is pretty strong, it requires you to go through the 1st skill which wastes time & moves you, requires a channel so you’re unable to do other things, and both of the skills cost Initiative which you barely have any of anyway. Seems like a lot of the power budget is in the Blinks which could be handy if you have Blink related Traits like the healing one, but it’s very costly and often not that needed compared to just choosing the highest DPS option (Twilight Combo). There’s an argument in also paying attention to the regular off-hand weapon skills, but w/ very little Initiative & being balanced around using Shroud skills, it’s not important.

Wells

Well of Gloom - Healing
Blink to target location to heal self & drop a Dark Combo field that pulses healing & Cripple.

Does good healing compared to the others, only losing out to Skelk Venom. Also provides some party healing, also losing out to the Venom. What this does have is a lower CD, a Blink, being a Well & a Dark Combo field. There are interactions for all of those, so if you need any of them for whatever build you have then it beats out on the Venom which only provides healing which is rarely an issue. Stealth & Evades aren’t usually needed in PvE group content.

Well of Bounty - Utility
Blink to target location to drop a Dark Combo field that pulses Boons in the following order: Stability, 8 x Might, Fury, Vigor & Resistance.

Support option. Used to behave in a similar way to Sorrow where it provides Boons that are missing. Previous order was this: Regen (can’t grant easily to a party), Protection (same), Resistance (same, and rare), Swiftness, Vigor, Quickness (same), Alacrity, Fury, 1 x Might (!), Resolution (same), Stability (same, and rare), Aegis (same, and rare), Might again. If the list wasn’t so long and if Thief wasn’t bad at providing more Boons, it wouldn’t have been a bad idea. Also the final Might is a very lacklustre “reward” and providing Quickness & Alacrity via a generic, low opportunity cost skill is a bad idea (recall Chronomancer horror days).This current iteration makes it far less reliant on other classes and is much more consistent. Small choice between constant Boon uptime or saving it for the Stability.

Well of Tears - Utility
Blink to target location to drop a Dark Combo field that pulses damage. Unblockable

Power damage option. Mediocre base damage but the scaling is decent. Only issue is that You’d have to build Power on a Condition based spec, making it feel (and probably be) inefficient. Same notes about Blinks & Wells apply.

Well of Silence - Utility
Blink to target location to drop a Dark Combo field that pulses Condition Cleansing. Gain Shadow Force per Condition removed. 1st pulse also Dazes.

Cleansing + CC option. While the Daze only affects the 1st pulse, it lasts for 2s so it’s actually pretty strong against CC bars. That said, if you really need CC just take the CC Venom, that completely eats up CC bars. Same notes about Blinks & Wells apply.

Well of Sorrow - Utility
Blink to target location to drop a Dark Combo field that pulses damage & Conditions. Conditions applied will depend on whether or not they already have it in the following order: Poison, 2 x Bleeding, 2 x Torment. If all are present, apply Torment.

Condition damage option. This isn’t as bad as it’s only checking for 3 Conditions, and they effectively do the same thing (damage). If Bounty only checked for offensive Boons, it’d work better but be way more unbalanced (being able to provide all offensive Boons = Chronomancer of old). Only bad thing is that the final Torment where all Conditions are present is weaker than the Torment that’s applied when there’s no Torment, it just feels sort of bad but is probably numerically sound.

Shadowfall - Elite
Blink to target location to drop a Dark Combo field that pulses damage & Pull, increasing in Pull strength per pulse.

AoE CC option. Compared to the Venom, it’s a lot clearer on how it’s being applied vs. the 5 enhanced attacks which could go anywhere. It is strictly for multi target though, w/ some synergy w/ Well + Blink traits but they’re more like bonuses w/ the 75s CD.

Traits

Specter
Steal is replaced w/ Siphon and Initiative is decreased by 3. Gain Shadow Force through spending Initiative & Siphoning. Gain access to Shadow Shroud, Scepter & Wells.

As always, including it because it’s the 1st Trait.

Second Opinion
Gain Healing Power, doubled when wielding a Scepter. Gain Healing Power based on 7% Condition Damage.

Pure healing option. All 3 choices are related to sustain / survivability which is interesting in that it’s different to most other trees. If there were no offensive interactions w/ any of them, then it would force you to be building hybrid or effectively waste a Trait. Fortunately the Barrier granted to allies gives them Torment on next hit, making the Barrier option the offensive one.

Take this option if you need more healing, gained via the usual stat increases (weapon conditional & stat conversion).

Shallow Grave
If your tethered ally takes a lethal blow, consume your Shroud to prevent their death & heal them. If you would take a lethal blow, enter Shroud if above 20%.

Single target death immunity option. This is much more useful in PvP as you’re unlikely to be needing immunities while in grouped content (where you’ll be taking group damage or messing up). This comes at a DPS cost too as it’s consuming your Shadow Force to heal or to take the lethal damage you would’ve taken.

Consume Shadows
Gain Consume Shadows stacks every second in Shroud, capped at 5. Exiting Shroud consumes all remaining Shadow Force & PBAoE heals based on the number of stacks gained. Allies at full HP gain Barrier instead.

Healing + Barrier option. Stacks just means you need to be in Shroud for 5s, preventing you from constantly entering & exiting Shroud for optimal healing. Exact healing ratio is 10% of Shadow Force consumed per stack. Main reason it’s the offensive option though is due to the Barrier applying Rot Wallow Venom.

Dark Sentry
Apply Rot Wallow Venom to allies (not including you) you grant Barrier to, 1s ICD. +20% Healing to Others. Rot Wallow Venom inflicts Torment on next hit.

Hybrid minor Trait so it works for both DPS & support builds (and hybrid). Extra Healing to Others means bigger Barriers on them, which works w/ the Barriers you’re granting for the Venom. Only issue is the 1s ICD, which only makes you space out your Barrier skills by a second which is a bit annoying w/ only counting in your head to keep track. The Venom does stack on itself though, saving from more weaving. The Torment only lasts a second and if the damage is an issue in PvP, lower the duration.

Larcenous Torment
+10% Torment damage. Gain 0.5% Shadow Force when Tormenting enemies outside of Shroud.

DPS option. All these options have something to do w/ Shadow Force generation, each playing into their respective methods of dealing damage, supporting, etc. This just makes Torment more powerful in both damage & resource generation = more Shroud = more damage.

Amplified Siphoning
Gain an additional 10% Shadow Force (35% total) when hitting an enemy w/ Siphon. Double the Barrier granted by Siphon.

Siphon / Steal option. If you use it on an enemy, you get more Shroud time for more damage + single target sustain. If you use it on an ally, you get more single target sustain + a lower CD, which can interact w/ the Steal Traits (e.g. more Boons for allies). It’s more versatile but does require you targeting an ally which just highlights how annoying targeting is in the game.

Traversing Dusk
PBAoE healing when Blinking. Gain Shadow Force per ally (5% + 1% per ally) in that radius. Wells grant Alacrity on their first pulse.

Support option. Makes Blinks / Wells a lot better w/ the healing, resource gain and Alacrity. Makes the whole spec viable as a support as it gives Alacrity. Obviously comes at the cost of Torment damage though and requires you using Wells, which you can take 3 without impacting too much of your build (healing + Boon + Condition) but does lock you into those. Which isn’t too bad, a bunch of Blinks and AoEs, even if they’re lost in the sea of circles this game has.

Panaku’s Ambition
Gain Barrier when using a Stealth Attack. Granting allies Stealth also grants them Barrier.

Not that great of a Trait as you rarely gain or grant Stealth. That said, the Barrier given from the ally Stealth is pretty big so it’s decent if you’re purposefully building Stealth (i.e. PvP). Not that great in PvE though as it requires sacrificing damage or Boon uptime and messes up auto attacks pretty easily which is annoying.

Strength of Shadows
Gain Expertise based on 13% Vitality. -2% Strike Damage received per Condition the enemy has on them. Rot Wallow Venom’s Torment lasts 1s longer (total 3s).

Offensive option as it increases DoT durations in general via Expertise (which means more gear stats being spent on something else) and increasing Rot Wallow Venom’s base duration by 50%. Also makes you tankier but that’s generally not an issue in PvE. Pretty good for trading in PvP though if you can Condition bomb someone.

Hungering Darkness
Every second In Shroud, transfer a Condition from your tethered ally to yourself & cleanse a Condition from yourself. Each Condition removed this way heals you & grants your tethered ally Barrier.

Condition Cleanse option. It only affects 2 people and only does 1 Condition a second, so it’s not that great at cleansing Conditions in PvE where it usually affects multiple people. Much better in PvP where you can act as a pocket support.

Shadestep
Siphon grants you Barrier when targeting enemies + partially revives allies when targeting them. Blinking breaks your Barrier & grants it to allies, proportional to the number of allies affected.

Support option. Plays into the Blinking theme again which is always fun, jumping around the area. Proportional line probably means it gets weaker the more allies there are for balance purposes. Not really useful in generating large amounts of Barrier in 1 go since it only lasts for 5s, so the one you have on yourself will need to be shared within that time and you can’t build on top of the one you already granted. Barriers could work better like in other games where they last for longer; keep it low in PvP.

Revenant
Revenant Combat
Magic warrior aesthetic, except it’s by channelling the power of certain characters that I don’t have any real attachment to since they’re from the 1st game (I’m guessing).
The specs are just more of the same in that regard, a bunch of characters I don’t care too much about.
Standard 2 weapon skill bars, swapping in combat has a cooldown.
Has Energy costs to skills and a CD, which makes it much more annoying to manage compared to 1 or the other.
Mostly melee, the ranged option absolutely sucks (Hammer) both aesthetically and functionally.
Profession mechanic is swapping between 2 of said channels, resetting Energy to 50 (out of 100) and swapping out their Utilities, which are set per Legend channelled.
There’s an additional profession mechanic which changes w/ Elite specs (or lack of).
Medium HP and highest armour, making them pretty tanky. Their healing sucks though as you technically have access to 2 heals, making it pretty easy to run into a situation where you’re stuck w/ a single subpar heal because you just swapped Legends as part of your damage (resetting Energy).
Revenant Abilities
Legend Channelling
The first Profession Mechanic is swapping between your 2 equipped Legends, gaining access to the other one’s skills and resetting your Energy to 50. The second for base Revenant is:

Ancient Echo
Gain 25 Energy & an effect based on the current Legend:
Assassin: 2 x Unblockable | Centaur: Regen | Dwarf: 3s of 50% damage reduction |
Demon: Resistance

Never actually get to see this as no one uses base Revenant. Also this was added in 2019, long after I played Revenant (as other specs). Helps w/ Energy issues, but none of the other specs get an Energy equivalent (in fact they cost Energy).

Assassin Stance

Enchanted Daggers - Healing
Small self heal & gain 6 daggers. Each hit deals extra damage and heals you, 0.5s ICD.

Overall this Legend is very offensive oriented w/ the damage & mobility, so the heal is the same. It trades healing for damage, which sometimes can cost you being Downed. ICD should just be removed in PvE where it doesn’t matter if you deal burst damage or not.

Phase Traversal - Utility
Blink to target to damage & gain Quickness. Next 2 attacks are Unblockable.

Offensive Blink. Quickness & Unblockable aren’t that useful in PvE though so this often goes unused in favour of other Blinks.

Riposting Shadows
Breaks stun. Evade backwards, remove movement-impairing Conditions & gain Fury.

Defensive Evade. Pretty useful as a stun break as it comes w/ the 0.75s of iframes. Somewhat annoying though as it has a hefty 30 Energy cost. Might just be because I don’t play this class often but it’s not something I’ve ever gotten used to.

Impossible Odds -> Relinquish Power
-6 Energy Upkeep (base is 5). +50% Movement Speed and each attack deals an extra strike, 0.25s ICD. Reactivate to end effect.

Damage stance. Overall lowers your Energy upkeep to -1, meaning you slowly drain Energy while dealing extra damage per hit. 0.25s ICD makes sense so it’s not completely busted on super quick attacks which is pretty niche. Gives you a choice between damage (keeping this on) or safety (keeping it off, generating more than 50 Energy for the other utilities and weapon skills). Actually it might be alright if either weapon skills OR utility skills cost Energy + CDs, not both.

Jade Winds
Delayed PBAoE damage, 6 x Vulnerability & Stun.

Pretty strong AoE stun. The issue is that it costs 50 whole Energy so you’ll never see this used in PvE, especially compared to CC from one of the Staff skills (which scales w/ enemy hitbox >_>). Also has a channel of 1s so it’s just incredibly frustrating to get working.

Centaur Stance

Project Tranquility -> Ventari’s Will - Healing
Create a Tablet at present location that pulses healing every 3s & interacts w/ the other Utility skills. Empower the next non-healing Centaur skill (also granted when first entering Centaur stance). Reactivate it while summoned to move it to the ground targeted location.

Healing / support stance, so all of the abilities are based around that. This skill itself isn’t that powerful as it’s the basis of the other 4 abilities; the pulsing healing is both weak and takes a while.

Protective Solace -> Diminish Solace - Utility
-6 Energy Upkeep. Create a Light Combo field around the Tablet that blocks enemy projectiles. If Empowered, grant Protection. Reactivate it to end the barrier and put it on a 5s CD.

Not that useful in PvE as projectile blocking isn’t always needed and the Protection is only from the initial activation, so it can’t be used for pulsing Protection. Good to have but mostly ignored; Light Combo field is definitely not worth using this skill for.

Natural Harmony - Utility
Delayed burst healing around the Tablet. If Empowered, healing is increased by 25% and also recovers 15 Endurance.

The real healing skill, sort of. The heal is pretty weak as it’s reduced due to the 2 healing skills Revenant’s have, it being a party heal and the fact that 2 of the other skills also have healing components, which isn’t great in PvE due to want of burst healing vs. sustained healing most of the time. Also grants Endurance if Empowered which can be handy in PvP, not so much in PvE.

Purifying Essence - Utility
AoE 3 x Condition Cleanse around the Tablet & heal per Condition removed. If Empowered, remove an additional Condition.

Condition Cleanse. Heal for almost the same as the above if 3 Conditions are removed, to give you an idea of how weak that heal is. Use it if you need to Cleanse, not much else to say.

Energy Expulsion - Elite
Destroy the Tablet, knocking down enemies + healing & cleansing a Condition from allies. If Empowered, knock down lasts an additional second (now 4s). Also Blasts at YOUR location.

Strongest heal and CC combined, giving you a choice between the 2. Also has a Condition cleanse added onto it but not mentioned in the flavour text which is always weird, seems like it’s added on later as an afterthought. Pretty strong CC w/o a major downside outside of Energy Cost, as you can just reform the Tablet at no cost. Blast being where you are is a bit weird but makes sense for ease of use.

Demon Stance

Empowering Misery - Healing
Heal self, increased per Condition on you.

Condition spec, both offensively and defensively. As such, the heal is based around how many Conditions you have. It’s actually a decent amount of burst healing, especially compared to the previous 2 so it feels a lot safer to use.

Pain Absorption - Utility
Breaks stun. PBAoE Resistance. Absorb 1 Condition from nearby allies, gaining Resolution + additional 1s per Condition transferred.

Defensive option. Eats up the Conditions from your allies, synergising w/ the heal. Additionally the Boons granted lessen the effect of the Conditions on you. That said it doesn’t really do much against actual CC, the cost of the party utility.

Banish Enchantment - Utility
Targeted AoE 3 x damage, Chill & 3 x Boon Removal. Unblockable.

PvP option as the damage is pretty low + non-Condition and the Chill, Boon Removal & Unblockable aspects are wasted in PvE. Reasonable cost and it’s AoE though, making it better than certain other skills.

Call to Anguish - Utility
Ground targeted Combo Leap that deals AoE damage & Chill while Pulling enemies to the centre of the landing zone.

Mobility + CC option. Sacrifices damage (no damaging Conditions) in favour of a Leap, some CC or both if you’re timing it well, so a choice is presented in terms of Energy management.

Embrace the Darkness -> Resist the Darkness - Elite
-6 Energy Upkeep. Become a Dark Combo field that pulses damage & Torment. Using a skill that costs Energy will empower the next pulse to inflict 2 x Torment. Reactivate it to end the skill.

The main spender for Condition builds. It’s not just pulsing damage though, as it requires some interaction to get max value (weaving skills to get the double stack of Torment). Does require you to space out skills by 1s though, wouldn’t have killed to let this effect stack in PvE or reduce the ICD to 0.25s like the Power version.

Dwarf Stance

Soothing Stone - Healing
Heal self & remove 5 Conditions. Gain Resolution.

Defensive stance, so the heal is built around that. Best heal around by far in terms of healing & it eats up a bunch of Conditions. Could be pretty strong when comboing w/ the Demon version, though obviously at the cost of damage as one does Condition damage and the other does Power.

Inspiring Reinforcement - Utility
Ground targeted frontal AoE that creates a Lightning Combo field, initially damaging & Weakening enemies. Pulses Stability for allies.

Pretty strong Stability skill as it pulses a bunch for allies. Not much else to it though, as damage is only on the initial portion and Weakness is really only for PvP. It is a Lightning Field though which is pretty rare, though kind of weird as it’s not really Lightning.

Forced Engagement - Utility
Ranged targeted AoE damage, Slow & Taunt. Take -33% damage from affected enemies.

Mostly makes you tankier, as the Slow & Taunt aren’t useful in PvE. Damage isn’t that great either. Would be excellent in other MMOs, not so much in this one (in PvE, very disruptive in PvP even at the medium range. Annoyingly targeted though).

Vengeful Hammers -> Release Hammers - Utility
-6 Energy Upkeep. PBAoE damage that heals you per instance of damage. Additionally, -20% all incoming damage. Unblockable. Reactivate to end the effect.

You can get 3 hits per target, so it can deal pretty good AoE damage + healing & you’re tanky the entire time too. Really good for situations that call for all 3, which is usually PvP (or Solo) though.

Rite of the Great Dwarf - Elite
Breaks stun. PBAoE -50% damage taken buff.

As a stun break, it’s pretty weak as you’re still vulnerable to CC and there’s a 1.25s cast time. Its effect is pretty strong though, but not required in PvE at all (otherwise Revenants using this skill are required, hence anything beyond just Protection isn’t needed).

Hammer
Long ranged 2H weapon that focuses on damage & CC.

Hammer Bolt
Slow, targeted AoE attack that damages and is a guaranteed Combo Projectile.

Overall this weapon is pretty slow and doesn’t do as much damage as the slow animations would imply. The combination of these 2 makes it feel pretty bad to use, especially compared to the other weapons & utility skills which are much faster. If you need range, it’s the only option though.

Coalescence of Ruin
Ground targeted AoE damage that explodes in a line. 0.5s ICD per target.

Pretty janky as it often fails if the terrain is uneven (majority of the open world) or goes in a weird direction. Other than it failing, it’s just ranged damage. Appreciate it having an ICD vs. reduced damage per hit like some other multi striking AoEs, though it could just not have that in the first place.

Phase Smash
Slow ground targeted AoE that damages, Chills & Blasts. You act as the projectile and return to your previous location at the end, Evading the entire time.

Not that useful in PvE as the majority of the power budget is on the Evade (it’s slow + you can’t do anything during the entire thing). Much better in PvP.

Field of the Mists
Frontal Dark Combo field that is always in front of you & blocks projectiles.

Pretty much the same as Dragonhunter’s Courage skill, except only projectiles. Decent to have but not needed often, much more prevalent in PvP.

Drop the Hammer
Ground targeted AoE damage, knock down & Blast.

Okay damage but again, it’s slow and obviously part of the power budget is the CC. Choice between damage & CC but overall Hammer has the downsides for being ranged (ranged tax) & slow (feels bad to use).

Staff
Melee 2H weapon focused on support & CC.

Rapid Swipe -> Forceful Bash -> Rejuvenating Assault
Frontal cleave, damage.
Frontal cleave, more damage.
Frontal cleave, most damage. PBAoE heal & Combo Whirls.

Okay damage as it’s mostly focused on the heal for its power budget. It used to drop tiny orbs that healed when picked up, thankfully that was removed for a normal PBAoE heal. Still requires being in melee but doesn’t require tracking balls.

Mender’s Rebuke
PBAoE damage & Weakness then delayed healing. +50% Healing if an enemy was hit.

It’s what you expect from a support weapon, damage & healing. Weakness is good for PvP, not for PvE as always. Enemy conditional not really necessary, seems to be a PvP reason. Use it if you need a bit of damage or healing (5s CD, so either isn’t too risky).

Warding Rift
Channel that Blocks attacks. PBAoE damage & Blindness at the end.

Purely defensive as the damage is minimal and the Blindness is worthless in PvE. Pretty good in PvP though as the small bit of damage can eat up Blindness / Aegis. Use it if you need to block.

Renewing Wave
PBAoE healing & 2 x Condition Cleanse. Creates a healing orb per ally Cleansed. Blasts combos.

Purely supportive as it only heals & cleanses. Unfortunately, it has the dumb ball thing. Use it if you need to heal / Cleanse.

Surge of the Mists
Frontal charge that damages & Knocks Back per hit. Evade during the charge.

The sole reason to take Staff, as the CC is huge if you get all hits off. Yes, it is hitbox reliant. Yes, you can charge off of arenas. Would be a lot better if the effects were normalised so you don’t get a mega CC just from 1 skill, though it would require rebalancing the whole thing as it’s quite literally the only reason to take this weapon (apart from super niche healing builds w/ its dumb orbs).

Sword
Short ranged & versatile (offensive, defensive, mobility). Main hand & off-hand.

Preparation Thrust -> Brutal Blade -> Rift Slash
Frontal cleave, damage & Vulnerability.
Frontal cleave, more damage & 2 x Vulnerability.
Frontal cleave, most damage & creates an additional explosion per target hit.

Typical melee DPS cleave. Explosions technically make it so the highest single target DPS is having 3 enemies squished together being cleaved since there’s a small explosion radius, but the damage isn’t that high compared to the autos so it’s not that big of a deal.

Chilling Isolation
PBAoE damage & Chill + Combo Whirl. Second hit deals damage, more if it only hits 1 enemy.

Essentially just a damaging skill; Chill and Combo Whirls aren’t that useful in PvE. Damage varies from decent AoE or huge amounts of single target depending on how many you hit. Only time that it’s annoying is if there’s 2 targets that completely flatline the 2nd portion of the damage. Would feel better if it could scale down linearly rather than a drop off from 1 to 2. Other than that, it’s damage so use on CD.

Unrelenting Assault
Blink to target & attack nearby enemies, gaining Might per enemy hit. Evade during the entire time.

Power budget is split between damage, self Might, Blink & Evade. As such, it’s pretty weak in terms of damage and more often than not you won’t need the Might, Blink or Evade in PvE. There are some decent plays you can make w/ the Evade to dodge mechanics sometimes but you need to keep in mind the cast time + ping.

Shackling Wave
Long frontal cleave that damages multiple times & 8 x Vulnerability. Also Immobilizes, increased duration per enemy hit.

AoE damage w/ some soft CC & Vulnerability. The Conditions aren’t needed in PvE, so it’s strictly just for the damage, and since it out damages the auto attack, use it on CD.

Deathstrike
Blink to target enemy, gain Fury and damage them. Deal a 2nd more powerful attack if the 1st hits.

Gap closer & damage. Cooldown is pretty long and the damage is pretty high, so there’s a cost in saving it as a gap closer when you generally don’t need them in PvE. The range is mid-ranged as well so you’re better off just using it on CD as damage, making 3 of the 4 skills use on CD damage skills.

Mace
Main hand only melee weapon that focuses on Condition damage.

Misery Swipe -> Anguish Swipe -> Manifest Toxin
Frontal cleave, damage & Torment.
Frontal cleave, more damage & same Torment.
Frontal cleave, most damage that also bounces to enemies behind. Poisons.

Basic auto chain for melee Condition damage (each does damage and applies a damaging Condition). Only thing that makes it different is the bouncing damage to targets behind. It’s unique and can synergise w/ any on-hit type of effects from Traits or Runes / Sigils, but by itself doesn’t do anything for Condition builds.

Searing Fissure
Frontal Fire Combo field that pulses damage & Burning. Initial hit does the most damage & has 3 x the Burning.

Pretty standard Fire Combo field; damages & Burns. Synergises w/ the next skill for a Fire Blast combo.

Echoing Eruption
Short leap (not combo, animation) to deal damage that cascades outwards, each damaging, 4 x Tormenting & Weakening. Each attack counts as a Blast.

Leap is just animation lock w/o the Combo benefits, but that’s probably because the skill Blasts 3 times. It’s a bunch of damage & Torment so use it on CD for Condition builds (+ Weakness for PvP and some Trait conditionals I suppose).

Axe
Off-hand only melee weapon that focuses on Condition damage.

Frigid Blitz
Ranged targeted unblockable projectile that damages & Chills + Slows enemies on the way. When it reaches the target, Blink to it and deal more damage.

Strictly mobility for PvE. There is a Trait that makes you Torment enemies that you Chill, but it’s somewhat weak and uses up Energy on something subpar. Power budget is wasted on the Blink, Unblockable and Chill / Slow in PvE. Also bugged (?) to make you take damage from any AoEs between starting location and Blink’s end.

Temporal Rift
Delayed frontal AoE damage, 4 x Torment & Pull.

It’s a bunch of damage & Torment. There’s a Pull but if you need CC, just swap to Staff and use that CC skill since it blows up CC bars. Obviously that comes w/ its own opportunity cost as you’re stuck in Staff for a while, but does let you freely use this skill as a damaging Condition skill. Pull is pretty handy for non-boss situations though as it Pulls enemies into the firing line of the Mace & Axe skills + frontal charges, etc.

Traits
Non-coloured Traits are auto picked if the tree is chosen. Coloured Traits are a choice of 1. Can only pick 3 trees.
Corruption - Condition Damage & Resistance

Invoking Torment
Use Invoke Torment when switching Legends. Invoke Torment: PBAoE damage & Torment.

Extra damage & Torment for when you switch Legends, which should be on CD for DPS purposes (resets Energy to 50). Gameplay loop is to use Energy, swap, repeat. Energy use is either through big chunks via skills, or drained via the upkeep skill.

Acolyte of Torment
+10% Torment damage.

Offensive option. Take it if you want to deal more Torment damage, nothing else to say as it’s very simple.

Demonic Defiance
Gain Resistance when using a Demon skill. 5s ICD.

Defensive option. Note that Resistance only stops the effects of non-damaging Conditions, so soft CC and the like.

Replenishing Despair
While using an upkeep skill, gain 1 Energy Upkeep but apply Torment to yourself every second.

Resource option. Really interesting design as it provides a clear upside and downside, but the downside also interacts w/ the Demon Heal & Permeating Pestilence for the Condition transfer to enemies. Risk vs. reward.

Seething Malice
Gain Condition Damage.

Another boring yet effective Condition DPS increase.

Abyssal Chill
When Chilling an enemy, apply Torment on them.

Could be more useful in PvP where you want the Chill as well as the Torment, vs. PvE where you’re just using the Chill for Torment. Otherwise it’s just trying to be a DPS Trait while being held down by the non-DPS nature of Chill.

Demonic Resistance
-20% Strike Damage when affected by Resistance.

Defensive option, take it if you need to be tankier. Resistance is somewhat uncommon compared to other Boons though so its effectiveness is limited. Also becomes less reliable in PvP where your Boons get destroyed pretty easily depending on the matchup.

Pact of Pain
+15% Condition Duration you apply. +10% Condition Duration on Conditions received.

Risk vs. reward DPS option (less gear stats spent on Condition Duration, more spent on Condition Damage). Conditions aren’t that common in PvE so the risk isn’t actually that bad, plus if there are Conditions being applied it’s usually in an AoE so cleanses would be brought, removing the risk again. Cool design that fits w/ the theme of risk reward that the Corruption tree is going for.

Yearning Empowerment
+10% Damaging Condition Duration you apply.

Similar to the Condition Damage, a boring yet effective Condition DPS increase (less Condition Duration needed, the more Condition Damage can be taken). 

Diabolic Inferno
Invoke Torment also applies Poison & Burning.

Offensive option. I like that all 3 choices affect Invoke Torment as it makes the choice a lot clearer for what you need; not all choices need to be like this as that does make it a little boring. Offensive option as it’s literally just more damaging Conditions.

Fiendish Tenacity
Invoke Torment grants Resistance, 5s ICD. Resistance heals you every second.

Defensive option. Can potentially get 100% uptime on Resistance if you have Alacrity + are building Boon Duration, but that falls into some weird hybrid build of support + Condition DPS + tank that might not really fare well since you’re spending your gear stats on a bit of everything. Still, it does help pad your Resistance uptime to help w/ sustain and potentially be tankier if you take the other Resistance Trait.

Permeating Pestilence
Invoke Torment transfers 3 x Conditions from you to enemies. 10s ICD, ignores Blind & is Unblockable.

Cleansing option. Has some synergy w/ the self-inflicting Torment Trait but there’s still risk involved as that is applied every second and this has a 10s ICD. Since it deals w/ Condition Cleansing + transferring, it makes it a more PvP oriented Trait, especially w/ the Blind ignore & Unblockable parts.
Retribution - Tankiness & Resolution

Enduring Recovery
+25% Endurance recovery.

More Endurance = more dodging = more active mitigation, much more involved than a flat damage reduction, allowing for more skill expression.

Planar Protection
Cast Dome of the Mists when using a Healing skill. Dome of the Mists: Dark Combo field that blocks projectiles & Weakens enemies. 20s ICD.

On demand projectile blocking. It’s linked to the heal skill which is generally fine as most of the time, if you need healing you probably want the projectile blocking. May require you to preemptively use it to block, wasting the heal though depending on which one you have (or if you have the Centaur one, it will proc when you move the Tablet), so there’s a decision to be made there.

Close Quarters
-10% Strike Damage received from enemies beyond low-mid range.

Tanky option, except it only works on ranged enemies. Good for PvP but less so in PvE where most enemies are melee or you want to be in melee so this Trait would have no effect in those situations.

Spiritual Resolution
Gain Resolution when using an Elite skill. 10s ICD.

Resolution uptime option. Protects against damaging Conditions but also has synergies w/ other Traits further down, including extra tankiness + damage. ICD is there because some Elite skills have activate + deactivate components, both of which count as “using” an Elite skill. So there’s some interesting min max opportunities there (i.e. keep the skill active for 10s then reactivate / deactivate).

Unwavering Avoidance
Gain Vigor when successfully Evading an attack.

Rewards Vigor for more dodging after successfully Evading an attack. Note that it’s from Evades, so it can be procced off of weapon skill Evades (Sword) for a bit more flexibility. 

Eye for an Eye
Gain Protection when CC’d, 35s ICD. Gain 5 x Might when breaking out of a stun.

Tankiness option. Automatically activates so its effect is accordingly weaker than something active. Protection will help against strike damage but not so much against Conditions. Extra bit of Might is fine but it only works when breaking out of a stun, not letting it expire. All of these effects are useful in PvP rather than PvE (hardly get CC’d, less likely to be using stun breaks, Boons are already applied via supports).

Resolute Evasion
Gain Resolution after dodging.

Dodging option. Doesn’t require an attack to be dodged so you can just use it twice in a row for an extra 4s of Resolution, which is definitely not the way to go as you just wasted 2 dodges for pretty much nothing. If you really need Resolution, there are better options. Design wise it’s fine though, as dodging (active mitigation) resulting in a defensive buff makes sense.

Dwarven Battle Training
+10% Strike Damage against Weakened enemies. Disabling enemies Weakens them.

Damage option. Weakness as the debuff makes sense as it sometimes reduces the damage dealt by the enemy, fitting w/ the tankiness theme. Proccing Weakness is pretty rare though as CC skills are somewhat uncommon understandably and doesn’t even work against bosses since they’re CC immune most of the time. Still, it’s the only offensive option here.

Determined Resolution
-10% Strike Damage received when affected by Resolution.

Extra tankiness for having Resolution. Makes Resolution reduce both Condition Damage & Strike damage, sort of mixing up the identity of the tree though. This made a bit more sense before Retribution (thorns) was turned into Resolution.

Vicious Reprisal
While affected by Resolution, +10% All Damage dealt & gain Might when hitting enemies (1s ICD). +50% Resolution Duration on self.

Damage option. Improves Resolution again to increase your damage (and give yourself Might but not that useful in PvE, ICD to normalise the attacks). Also makes Resolution last longer on you, making it less annoying to maintain on yourself. Makes you overall tankier and stronger, though not in a really exciting way.

Versed in Stone
Rite of the Great Dwarf additionally reduces Condition Damage. When hit below 50% HP, cast Rite of the Great Dwarf (45s ICD). Gain Power based on 13% Toughness.

Tankiness option. Automatically casts it when you’re in danger which is fine as an emergency effect. Makes you want to use Dwarf stance to maximise the value you get out of this Trait (by giving you access to the improved active version). Also makes you stronger passively through the stat conversion, which Toughness makes you stronger against Strike Damage (fits the theme).

Steadfast Rejuvenation
Heal every second per point of Energy Upkeep currently in use.

Sustain option. Doesn’t really fit w/ the Resolution or Strike Damage reduction theme the tree has going on but does synergise well since the longer you’re alive the more you get out of the heal (since it’s proccing more). Does make you choose between damage (using skills that cost Energy) or healing (leaving the Energy to maximise upkeep time), giving you a choice.
Salvation - Healing & Support

Healer’s Gift
In combat, the end of your dodge PBAoE heals.

Little bit of extra healing after a dodge, which may be needed if others didn’t dodge whatever it is you’re dodging. The heal is pretty small but it’s a minor Trait so that’s fine. Used to drop an orb which was incredibly hard to see.

Invoking Harmony
+20% Healing to Others for a duration after swapping Legends.

Healing option. More healing after swapping Legends is nice, especially since you’re doing it on cooldown for the Energy anyway.

Blinding Truths
PBAoE Blind when using a Healing skill. 3s ICD.

PvP option, Blind is useless in PvE. Pretty useful in PvP though. 3s ICD due to the skills w/ an activation + deactivation, normalising their effects so you’re not bound to using those skills for max value.

Eluding Nullification
In combat, the end of your dodge PBAoE 1 x Condition Cleanses.

Cleansing option. Take it if you need Cleansing, if not then healing is the default option. It is linked to your dodges though and you can only get 2 out in a short amount of time so it’s not that great against large bursts of Conditions vs. other skills, making it less great in PvE (but still decent in PvP).

Life Attunement
Gain Healing Power. Gain Concentration based on 7% Healing Power.

More healing & Boon Duration via stats, nothing else to say.

Words of Censure
Blinding, Immobilizing or CCing enemies PBAoE heals. 0.25s ICD.

Formerly dropped orbs instead of PBAoE heals, so that’s already an improvement. ICD is a bit weird in that AoE attacks can proc multiple times, but there’s an ICD after that. So it only accounts for single target rapid attacks, not AoE vs. single target cases. Take it if you need extra healing.

Resilient Spirit
In combat, gain Barrier per Boon you have (max 5) every 3s.

Tankiness option. The effect is capped at 5 Boons which is pretty easy to get in group content. Since it’s just pulsing Barrier depending on your Boons, it’s not completely interactive but not just passive either (since you need to maintain the Boons). However, since it only grants you the Barrier, there’s no real need for it in PvE unless you’re doing a specific tanking role, in which case you’re usually far away from the others. If you need solo survivability like in PvP or solo roles, then it could be a good option. Otherwise, there are more party oriented options.

Fortified Blessing
Grant Protection when cleansing a Condition from an ally. 0.25s ICD.

Extra Protection from Cleansing. Obviously has no effect if there’s nothing to Cleanse though. Not sure why there’s an ICD considering it’s only 2s of Protection. If it’s a PvP issue then keep the ICD there (would say reduce the duration but it’s already at 1s).

Serene Rejuvenation
+20% Healing to Others. Centaur skills apply Boons: Protective Solace (dome): Swiftness | Natural Harmony (heal): Vigor | Purifying Essence (cleanse): Regen | Energy Expulsion (knock back): Resistance.

More healing to others = less healing skills to be used = more time damaging or buffing. Also improves Centaur skills (which you should be using as a healer anyway). The Boons given don’t entirely match their effects (e.g. the heal doesn’t grant Regen) and they don’t last that long anyway, so it’s more of a supplementary Boon rather than a main source, play around it sort of effect.

Generous Abundance
PBAoE heal when using a Legend skill (Utility). Heal around the Tablet when using a Centaur skill (excluding moving the Tablet skill + Dragon activation skills).

Healing option. Makes Centaur skills even better at healing (and the others too, but it feels like they’re added just so you’re not terribly punished for continually swapping Legends which is what you’re otherwise encouraged to do). Take it if you’re healing, which you probably are if you’re in this tree (sans PvP but I don’t care about that).

Unyielding Devotion
-15% Strike Damage received for 2s after healing. Lasts for 5s if healing an ally.

Tankiness option. Take it if you need to be tankier, which again usually only applies to PvP or solo roles. Works w/ any form of healing, from the skills to the heals from previous Traits.

Invigorating Dismissal
Grant 4 Endurance when cleansing a Condition from an ally.

Dodge (hence cleansing) option. More Dodges = more healing & possibly cleansing, synergising w/ the earlier Traits. 4 endurance is pretty abysmal to look at though, even if it is balanced (you need 50 to dodge). Might be better if it was frontloaded so it’s less strong in a full group and a bit better when alone, PvP balance aside.
Invocation - Legend Swapping & Fury

Invoker’s Rage
Gain Fury when swapping Legends in combat. 10s ICD.

Fits perfectly into the theme of swapping Legends & Fury. It’s active / involved but is also something you’re already doing, nothing else to say.

Cleansing Channel
Swapping Legends removes 1 Condition.

Cleansing option. It’s active / involved but it also only removes 1 whole Condition. Might be a balance thing but comparing it to the others, it feels very lacklustre. Take it if you need Condition Cleansing at the cost of the other choices.

Rising Tide
+10% Strike Damage while above 75% HP.

DPS option. You’ll almost always be above the threshold in PvE so it’s just a straight up damage boost. Bit less reliable in PvP but you’ll want the other Traits there anyway.

Glaring Resolve
Gain Stability & heal yourself when breaking stuns.

Defensive / stun break option. Makes the crappy stun breaks without protection against CC a lot better, at the cost of damage of course. Another PvP option as you’re more likely to get use out of the heal + Stability there than you are in PvE, especially since you’ll be missing out on the damage in a mode where the best defence is killing everything.

Ferocious Aggression
+10% All Damage dealt while under Fury.

Damage boost for having Fury, which is what Fury does anyway so it works. If crit heals existed, then this should also increase healing done to match. Affects all damage so it’s less crappy for Condition builds.

Spirit Boon
PBAoE Boons when swapping Legends in combat. 
Assassin: 2 x Might | Demon: Resistance | Dwarf: Stability | Centaur: Regen| Dragon: Protection | Renegade: Resolution | Alliance: Vigor

Support Boon option. Most of these Boons (everything except Might & Regen) are somewhat uncommon, so it’s nice to have a little bit of padding. It’s the default option simply because the other 2 are pretty redundant in group content. Gained via swapping Legends which fits the theme and it’s something you’re already doing.

Rapid Flow
Heal self & gain Swiftness when using a skill w/ an Energy cost. 5s ICD.

Sustain & mobility option. Not that useful due to healing & Swiftness not being super important in PvE. Defensive option for PvP / solo play. Practically get 100% uptime by simply using your skills. 

Incensed Response
Gain 5 x Might when granting self Fury in combat.

Self Boon option. Not that useful in PvE due to supports. Offensive option for PvP / solo play. No ICD so you can quickly grant yourself max Might (i.e. the pulsing Fury from Dragon stance).

Contained Temper
Gain Fury when CCing an enemy. 1s ICD.

Fury granted is actually decently long compared to the ICD (8s vs 1s) so it’s not a bad Trait. That said it’s pretty useless in PvE due to Boons being provided by support. Pretty good in PvP though, unless you’re up against Necro, Mesmer, Thief, etc.

Song of the Mists
Swapping a Legend in combat uses a skill based on the Legend.
Assassin: PBAoE damage & 8 x Vulnerability. Gain Quickness based on # of enemies hit.
Dwarf: PBAoE damage & Weakness. Gain Barrier based on # of enemies hit.
Demon: PBAoE damage, Slow & 2 x Torment.
Centaur: PBAoE healing.
Dragon: PBAoE damage, 2 x Burning & Chill.
Renegade: PBAoE damage, 2 x Bleeding. Gain Kalla’s Fervor (damage buff) stacks based on # of enemies hit.
Alliance: PBAoE damage. Gain Endurance based on # of enemies hit.

Versatile option. The effects from each Legend match their Legend. However compared to the double crit from Fury Trait, it falls very far behind in damage. The utility granted from the effects can be useful in PvP though (Quickness not being freely given, Weakness + Barrier, Slow, healing, Chill, Endurance, etc). Requires a bit of timing & in PvP you’re less inclined to swap on CD (since you want time to use the utility skills rather than pumping and dumping just the DPS ones), it works out fine.

Charged Mists
Swapping Legends in combat while at or below 10 Energy grants an extra 25 (total 75).

Resource option. Most of the skills & rotations are focused around 50 Energy, so the extra Energy isn’t all that needed. Plus there’s cooldowns in addition to the Energy cost, so even w/ the extra Energy you won’t be able to use it on the damaging skills. More useful in PvP though as more Energy = easier access to the PvP oriented utility skills.

Roiling Mists
+25% Crit Chance while under Fury (total 50%).

Huge increase in damage since you require far less Precision for the crit chance, allowing you to build more Power for damage or Ferocity for crit damage (or whatever else you want). Pretty basic though as it’s a passive effect on a Boon which are mostly passive buffs (given to you by a support).
Devastation - Strike Damage & Lifesteal

Expose Defenses
First attack in combat applies 5 x Vulnerability. Reset when using an Elite skill.

Bit of extra burst Vulnerability to get the ball rolling. Doesn’t last very long & Elites have a decent CD most of the time, so it’s not really meant to be a permanent debuff, which is fine for a minor Trait. Can min max w/ the activate-deactivate Elites though for a bit of skill expression, since each part counts as using an Elite skill.

Aggressive Agility
Movement skills remove Immobilize.

Movement skills = gap closers. Normally you’re locked from using them while Immobilized (rooted), this allows you to use them & cleanse the Immobilize. Super mobility, great for PvP, less so for PvE.

Unsuspecting Strikes
+20% Strike Damage to enemies above 80% HP.

Damage option. Take it if you want to deal more damage at the beginning of fights. In PvP the HP range seems to hover below this threshold, making it only really useful when initially poking someone vs. in PvE where it’s the first 20% of a fight.

Battle Scarred
Lifesteal on 5 attacks after using your Healing skill via “Battle Scars” effect.

Sustain option. Scales pretty poorly w/ stats so you’re mostly stuck w/ the base damage & healing for the 5 attacks. Default option if you’re not up against a lot of Immobilize in PvP (which is probably not the case but I don’t PvP).

Destructive Impulses
+5% All Damage dealt. Another +2.5% if wielding an off-hand weapon.

More damage for simply existing. Full effect if not using Hammer, Staff, Shortbow or Greatsword, and even in those cases you have the majority of the effect anyway. Boring but it’s a damage increase so not really complaining here.

Assassin’s Presence
PBAoE Fury every 10s in combat.

Exactly the same as the Ranger version. Previously gave Ferocity instead, changed to stop bringing classes just for their unique buffs. Homogenisation was the result and it’s a good thing those Traits are gone, but it’s literally the same thing as the Ranger one. Could’ve at least had the Ferocity increase for the Revenant while under Fury or something to keep a bit of that flavour (and range can have a bit of Precision instead).

Notoriety
Might grants more Power but less Condition Damage (instead of 30 each, it’s 40/20). Gain 2 x Might when using a Legend skill in combat.

Offensive option for power builds, which is fair since this is the power tree. Take it if you want damage and you’re going a power build. Its main effect is passive though so not very interesting. A bit of might for using any “utility” skills which can be useful when ramping up at the beginning of the fight but not that useful in the long run since supports provide the Might.

Thrill of Combat
Gain Battle Scars every second in combat.

Sustain option. It’s through lifesteal though, meaning the healing is wasted when you’re attacking at full HP. Would be a lot better if there was some way to overheal into a Barrier or something, possibly even through this Trait (not much of an issue in Battle Scarred since you’re using your healing skill = you’re low, less likely to waste the healing).

Targeted Destruction
+0.5% Strike Damage per Vulnerability stack the target has (max 12.5%).

In group content, this is a free +12.5% Strike Damage increase on top of the normal Vulnerability effects. Just more damage multipliers for strike damage, fitting this tree’s main focus. 

Brutality
Gain Quickness when swapping weapons in combat (9s ICD). While under Quickness, your attacks remove Stability (1s ICD).

PvP option, as it provides Quickness (covered in PvE) and it rips off Stability without wasting your precious CC skills (only relevant in PvP). If you’re up against a lot of Stability then this would be a good option.

Swift Termination
+20% Strike Damage to enemies below 50% HP.

Execute damage. A bit more useful in PvP compared to the above 80% one since there’s a bigger range. Take it if you want more damage. Like the above 80% Trait, it’s more damage but implemented in a somewhat boring way. But it’s damage so who cares?

Dance of Death
Each stack of Vulnerability applied grants a stack of Battle Scars. Double healing from Battle Scars while under 50% HP.

Sustain option. While this tree only has 1 way of applying 5 x Vulnerability, there are plenty of weapon and Legend skills that also apply Vulnerability. Huge source of Battle Scars, especially compared to Thrill of Combat which pales in comparison and could really use that overhealing effect mentioned there. Sacrifices execute damage & “CC” by extension of Stability removal for sustain. Better in PvP since it’s all lifesteal; it’s the game mode where you constantly want to be damaging & healing simultaneously.

Herald Combat
Trades Ancient Echo (on demand Energy & utility) for Facet of Nature for pulsing support effects depending on the current Legend for -2 Energy Upkeep. This does make Energy management much more annoying.
Gains access to the Dragon Legend skills, which focuses on either providing Boons to allies.
Dragon Legend skills are unique in that they’re all Energy Upkeep skills, except deactivating (Consume) them has an additional effect.
Dragon skills being 2 button presses introduces an extra chance of messing up, especially on higher ping. Often found myself missing a Consume for whatever reason.
Gains access to Shield which focuses on survivability, so it’s rarely used in PvE.
Gameplay for DPS is fine okay. You basically just use the damaging Consume skills on CD and continue w/ your DPS rotation, similar to base Revenant.
Gameplay for support sucks since Quickness is granted when using Consume skills, which means you’re always using the skills on CD. It also continues pulsing their Boons for a couple of seconds, meaning there’s less of an opportunity cost in doing so.
Legend is a Dragon that’s directly tied into the story (which is about killing Dragons) so I at least know about this character compared to the other 4 which are from previous games or books. Makes it a bit more personalised, especially since Legend skills sometimes uses their voice acting.
Gains access to the Herald traitline. This uses up 1 traitline and is unique from other Elite specialisations (they all use the 3rd tree slot).
Herald Abilities
Facet of Nature

Assassin
PBAoE lifesteal w/ a 0.5s ICD. 
Consume for PBAoE damage & 2 x Boon removal, both of which are Unblockable.

Lifesteal & damage fits the Assassin’s theme, like the Devastation tree. Boon Removal sort of fits, even if it’s just on the 1 Assassin skill. MAYBE the 1 Trait but that’s Stability only. Makes sense for it to be the active rather than the passive, due to obvious balancing issues & Boon Removal being a more of an on-demand thing rather than a weak pulse (at least in PvP, not that useful in PvE).

Centaur
PBAoE healing every 3s. 
Consume for PBAoE 2 x Condition Cleanse, healing per Condition cleansed.

Healing & Cleansing for the Healing & Cleansing Legend. Healing being the passive fits; you don’t always want healing or Cleansing,  but you want healing more often.

Demon
PBAoE Condition transfer from allies to self. 
Consume for PBAoE Condition transfer from self to enemies. Gain 5 x Might per Condition transferred.

Matches the mechanics & theme of the Demon tree + skills w/ the Condition transfers. Makes sense that the transfer to enemies is on the active since that’s the order of how you want it (take ally Conditions -> push them to enemies).

Dwarf
PBAoE -10% Damage taken. 
Consume for PBAoE 2 x Stability.

Tankiness & Stability, both of which the Dwarf tree & skills have so it fits. Stability is much more important as an on demand thing, so it makes sense it’s the Consume effect and not the other way around.

Dragon
PBAoE +20% Boon Duration from any source. Can bypass the regular 100% cap.
Consume to increase the duration of all Boons on nearby allies by 2s.

Fits the general support theme of Dragon stance. Pretty strong that it can bypass the 100% Boon Duration cap, but that’s mostly due to the fact that it’s not always up to warrant such restrictions (since you want to use the Consume for the Quickness from Traits, which is what the support build should be doing). Passive & active are in their correct spots obviously, can’t really make a passive pulse of +2s on all Boons be balanced.

Dragon Stance

Facet of Light -> Infuse Light - Healing
PBAoE 4s Regen every 3s.
Consume for a small heal & to convert all incoming damage into healing.

It’s a very all or nothing sort of heal, as it requires decent timing to get any effect. Obviously that’s made easier w/ fight knowledge, not always the case when you’re playing casually on a class you don’t play often. There’s also not really a choice in the heal, as you choose Legends for their entire package, not just choosing a single heal like other classes. Potentially powerful, sometimes whiffs very hard which is good, rewards good plays.

Facet of Darkness -> Gaze of Darkness - Utility
PBAoE 3s Fury every 3s.
Consume to break stun & PBAoE Blind, Reveal & 10 x Vulnerability.

It’s a really good skill as you primarily want it to stay as a Facet for the permanent 25% (or 50% w/ the Trait) crit chance buff. You then want to use it when you’re CC’d to escape further damage, which would lead to being downed = less DPS (so overall it’s kind of a DPS skill). That said, it’s pretty weak against CC immune enemies as the Blind doesn’t do anything to protect you from further CC, so you get thrown around. A lot. Which feels awful.

Facet of Elements -> Elemental Blast - Utility
PBAoE 3s Swiftness every 3s.
Consume for a ground targeted AoE that pulses damage & Conditions (Weakness -> Chill -> 3 x Burning).

You’re happy to use this on CD as Swiftness is not very important to maintain and it deals decent damage. Damaging effects are back loaded in that it pulses and only the Burning does damage, so you still need to watch out where you place it unless you want enemies walking out. Otherwise, it’s an AoE damage skill, nothing crazy.

Facet of Strength -> Burst of Strength - Utility
PBAoE 12s 1 x Might every 3s.
Consume for 2 x frontal cleave that damages & grants a +15% damage buff to self if it hits.

Totally fine w/ using this on CD as it’s a single stack of Might. Plus compared to the active 15% damage boost for 10s, it’s a no brainer. The only thing you have to watch out for is the 1s cast time, meaning it can be interrupted, go on CD and not give the damage boost. Very annoying and especially apparent in later zones where every mob and their mother has a CC skill for no reason. Being thrown around without your consent is not cool. Otherwise, use it at the beginning of your burst window for obvious damage reasons.

Facet of Chaos -> Chaotic Release - Elite
PBAoE 3s Protection every 3s.
Consume for a slightly delayed frontal cone of damage, Launch & Superspeed.

Permanent uptime for Protection is very valuable, except it comes w/ a hefty 4 Energy Upkeep, impacting your ability to do anything Energy related. The active does good damage & CCs, so you’re presented a choice between damage or CC. This would be more impactful if Staff and its mega CC didn’t exist. So for DPS, use it on CD. For support, also use it on CD for Quickness via a Trait; kind of boring in the end.


Renegade Combat

Renegade Abilities

Vindicator Combat

Vindicator Abilities

Warrior
Warrior Combat

Warrior Abilities

Berserker Combat

Berserker Abilities

Spellbreaker Combat

Spellbreaker Abilities

Bladesworn Combat

Bladesworn Abilities

Engineer
Engineer Combat

Engineer Abilities

Scrapper Combat

Scrapper Abilities

Holosmith Combat

Holosmith Abilities

Mechanist Combat

Mechanist Abilities
